,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Scientist II - Permanent Full Time Opportunity,-1,"Data Scientist II – Permanent Full Time Opportunity*
Location - Hunt Valley, MD *
Due to rapid company growth and recent acquisitions, his is a newly created Data Scientist opportunity within a publicly traded industry leading organization which was just ranked as one of the top employers to work in its market. Serving as an innovative and practical problem solver, the Data Scientist will join a growing team and will offer the unique ability to function as a thought leader and work directly across a variety of disciplines including: Data Science, User Experience Research, Data Visualization, Business Analysis, Data Engineering, and Software Development. This is a full-time permanent opportunity offering a competitive compensation package including a base range of $100,000 to $130,000 plus excellent benefits, career mobility, and the ability to join a company culture dedicated to being an industry leader in data management innovation. The Data Scientist position will be fully remote through Covid-19 restrictions and then will join a team located at the company's corporate HQ in the Hunt Valley, MD area however will offer work from home flexibility a few days per week.
Data Scientist II – Job Description*
Work closely with data engineers to obtain and use large amounts of data to test and report on business forecasting, capacity, utilization and provide data-backed recommendations
Create models and processes that minimize the cost by forecasting service management workloads, improving capacity planning, and optimizing resource utilization
Engage with business leaders to understand their specific needs and present complex findings, both verbally and visually. Have opportunity to partner with business units to provide immense value to our business by enabling quantitative decision-making across the organization.
Analyze application and infrastructure performance in order to prevent, detect, and mitigate business center incidents
Utilize Consumer telemetry layer to provide insights for organization.
Utilize advanced mathematics and statistical analyses to generate insights for organization.
Perform machine learning for enriching content.
Track operations and constantly look for ways to make things work better, faster, and smoother.
Identify, search, and analyze patterns in data in order to find opportunities working alongside our Product Development, Process Management, or Engineering teams.
Data Scientist II – Job Requirements*
3+ years of data taxonomy, BI, data migration or data lake integration experience.
Proven experience using one or more data modeling tools (including, but not limited to, SQL, Spark, ElasicSearch, Hive, Azure Data Lake, BigQuery, etc.)
Proven experience using object-oriented programming languages (including, but not limited to, Python, JavaScript, Java, Scala, etc.) and functional data science tools such as R, or others
Experience with data visualization tools (including, but not limited to, Matplot, Splunk, Kibana, DataStudio, Tableau, Cognos, etc.)
Experience with advanced statistical modeling
Experience with Consumer telemetry, infrastructure monitoring, and process improvement preferred
Machine learning and artificial intelligence experience preferred
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $135,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
The Data Scientist position will be fully remote through Covid-19 restrictions and then will join a team located at the company's corporate HQ in the Hunt Valley, MD area however will offer work from home flexibility a few days per week.

Location:
Cockeysville, MD 21030 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"Veritas Partners
3.0","Cockeysville, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
1,Principal Data Scientist - eCommerce Modeling - Visa Predictive Models,$97k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"As the world's leader in digital payments technology, Visa's mission is to connect the world through the most creative, reliable and secure payment network - enabling individuals, businesses, and economies to thrive. Our advanced global processing network, VisaNet, provides secure and reliable payments around the world, and is capable of handling more than 65,000 transaction messages a second. The company's dedication to innovation drives the rapid growth of connected commerce on any device, and fuels the dream of a cashless future for everyone, everywhere. As the world moves from analog to digital, Visa is applying our brand, products, people, network and scale to reshape the future of commerce.

At Visa, your individuality fits right in. Working here gives you an opportunity to impact the world, invest in your career growth, and be part of an inclusive and diverse workplace. We are a global team of disruptors, trailblazers, innovators and risk-takers who are helping drive economic growth in even the most remote parts of the world, creatively moving the industry forward, and doing meaningful work that brings financial literacy and digital commerce to millions of unbanked and underserved consumers.

You're an Individual. We're the team for you. Together, let’s transform the way the world pays.

We are currently seeking an energetic and passionate principal data scientist to drive analytical projects and to ensure that Visa Predictive Models deliver the world-class quality that our clients have come to expect.

The Visa Predictive Models team is responsible for building and maintaining consumer behavior and risk models to solve business problems for Visa’s clients. We work with one of the richest payment and consumer behavior data sets in the world. So if you like digging through mounds of complicated data, creating insightful attributes and building AI for prediction then you need to apply to this team!

The team closely collaborates with other analytic stakeholders to clarify the business problem in order to determine the most appropriate analytic approach that provides meaningful results to customers. Responsibilities include projects on time and within scope with an in-depth knowledge of big data and cutting edge data mining techniques as well as the use of predictive, classification, machine learning and alternate analytic algorithms for modeling and segmentation.

The successful candidate will be based in either Arlington, VA or Foster City, CA.

Responsibilities:

· Perform model validation for newly developed eCommerce models, generate performance analysis, interpret and present validation and model governance results to non-technical audience.

· Compile complex predictive model packages for production deployment; support model installations, and monitor and calibrate production models

· Define financial and analytic metrics to measure development and production outcomes and produce performance reports and dashboards

· Develop the next generation eCommerce modeling

· Propel analytic product development via conducting statistical analyses on various data sources; and add values to products by being innovative and applying the analysis

· Support sales and marketing efforts with sound statistical and financial analysis; execute ad-hoc analyses to meet the fast-changing market demands

· Develop business requirements and appropriate statistical analysis/prototypes to meet critical business needs

· Work on cross functional teams and collaborate with internal and external stakeholders

· Promote big data innovations and analytic education throughout the Visa organization

Basic Qualifications

· Master’s Degree in a quantitative field, such as Statistics, Mathematics, Operational Research, Computer Science, Economics, or Engineering

· 6+ years of working experience in a predictive modeling, data analysis or data visualization function

Preferred Qualifications

· Strong communication skills to work with internal and external clients

· Proven ability of handling multi-tasks in a dynamic environment

· Attention to details and problem-solving skills

· Candidates with a PhD in a quantitative field, such as Statistics, Mathematics, Operational Research, Computer Science, Economics, or Engineering preferred

· Hands-on experience with deep learning preferred

· Experience with Spark (Scala or Python) preferred

· Past marketing modeling experience in financial industry preferred

· Experience with Agile methods and tools (Jira, Git, Jenkins & Artifactory) for the production deployment of software or predictive models preferred

Visa will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with EEOC guidelines and applicable local law.",3.8,"Visa Inc.
3.8","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1958,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
2,AI/ML Data Scientist,-1,"Now Hiring an AI/ML Data Scientist

As an AI/ML Data Scientist, you will be applying new and innovative methods to address some of our most important intelligence problems. This is a remote position.
Knowledge and experience in designing and implanting AI apps and agents that use the Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services, Azure Bot Service, Azure Cognitive Search, and data storage options
Analyzing requirements for AI solutions
Experience with NoSQL databases
Experience with applying Data Science techniques to overhead imagery (computer vision, object detection)
Experience in understanding of programming language such as Python
Ability to work autonomously and collaboratively as part of a team to both teach and learn every day
Continuously looking for opportunities to learn, build skills and share learning.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Profile of Success
5 years of relevant experience with Data Science and Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning
Desirable Skills
Experience with NoSQL databases
Ability to provide subject matter guidance
Ability to Manager personal project priorities and deliverables
About AIS

AIS, Dedicated to Our People

AIS employees can spend their entire career at AIS doing challenging, rewarding work and reach their desired level of achievement and responsibility. We offer the opportunity to move up, without the obligation to move out of a position where one excels. We are committed to our employee's success; however, they define it.

It's our dedication to our employees that inspired our leadership to invest in our future and become partially employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Program (ESOP).

Our employees are our greatest strength, and we do all that we can to serve them. We invest in technology as early adopters, allowing us to create transformative and innovative solutions for our customers while exposing our team to cutting edge technology.

We hire outstanding individuals who are committed to curiosity, passionate about emerging technology, and who are excited to find innovative solutions for the biggest tech challenges facing international brands and government agencies today.

We Invest in Individuals Committed to Innovation

AIS is seeking professionals of a certain character and level of excellence. People that we can learn from and that we can help grow to achieve their personal career goals. We are looking for:
Smart people with a passion for technology
Strong technical capabilities with a consultancy mindset
Close involvement with local technical communities
A willingness to think outside of the box to provide innovative solutions to clients
Ability to solve challenging technical business problems
Self-directed professionals
Our Core Values
Client Success
Continued Learning and Technical Excellence
Strong Client Relationships
Citizenship and Community
AIS is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Applied Information Sciences is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, religion, color, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis covered by law. Employment decisions are based solely on qualifications merit, and business need.",4.5,"Applied Information Sciences
4.5",Virginia,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
3,Research Scientist - Autonomous Systems,-1,"Job Description:

Our Unmanned Systems group is looking to add a talented Research Scientist with a background in autonomous systems, artificial intelligence, scientific computation, and/or mathematical modeling. The successful candidate will be passionate about designing, developing and applying cutting-edge technologies for prototype autonomous systems.

In this position, you will see your ideas control autonomous vehicles in the most challenging environments. The successful candidate will be part of a team that designs and implements software and hardware solutions addressing critical challenges to develop some of the most autonomous systems on or off the planet. You will integrate into, and lead, dynamic and highly-motivated project teams, and use new ideas from across multiple fields to push the boundaries of the possible for intelligent systems.

Required Qualifications:

Ph.D. in computer science, mathematics, physics, or applicable engineering field, or equivalent training and experience; would consider a BS degree with 5+ years relevant industry experience OR an MS degree with 3+ years relevant industry experience in;

autonomy and autonomous decision making
automated planning
optimization
scientific computing
mathematical modeling
programming experience in C++ and/or Java

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in R&D environments and with rapid software prototyping
Ability to improvise and think “outside the box” to develop technical solutions
Excellent communication skills, both written and oral
A track record of publications and/or successful proposal writing is strongly desired
Experience with Federal S&T and R&D sponsors (DARPA, IARPA, ONR, NASA) and contract vehicles (BAAs, SBIRs) is a plus
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED, active DoD clearance a plus

Position Location: Reston, VA

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Metron takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",3.0,"Metron, Inc.
3.0","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
4,ML Platform and Data Engineering Lead - DAB,$104k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Enterprise Data Backbone

Enterprise Data Backbone - The Enterprise Data Backbone provides the most user-friendly real-time data for all our internal and external stakeholders, accessible through self-service tools.

We will transform the way we gather and use insights by integrating completely new types of data to better support our patient and others in the healthcare system. We will build capabilities to gather real world data outside of clinical trials in ways we have not been able to do so far.

We will make data more easily accessible across Takeda and find a way to share it so that we don’t keep re-inventing the wheel. We will push ourselves to think beyond our normal constructs of clinical trials or today's supply chains.

We will explore a future where we get data from all corners of the world – digital communities, wearable devices, social media, surveys, for a, consumer data combined with hospital, pharmacy and EMR data. We will unlock innovation across the development life cycle supporting accelerated clinical development, reducing clinical trial costs, etc.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

The Head of ML Platform and Data Engineering is the backbone of the data program at Takeda and will oversee and drive the strategic innovation and design of data, consisting of data engineering, data science and AI within Takeda and with a strong impact on the IT Organization. Is a seasoned leader in technical, innovative, transformational aligned strategy and will participate in and influence leaderships debates and teams around the organization on the effect and effectiveness of data program whilst articulating the impact on IT.

Drive and lead the overall transformative data strategy combining existing sub-function strategies to accelerate the enterprise effectiveness, focused on data engineering, data science and AI solutions and drive the change within the IT organization, all focused on how data can shape the future of Takeda and the technical pathway to do so.
Shape and lead the design do data productized, re-usable and scalable solutions within Takeda into a technical portfolio and drive the further development of IT as a change enabler; guide and orchestrated an aligned IT approach and implementation from Cloud, Architecture, Service Delivery to other IT functions.
Proactively aligns with the business, from R&D, PDT, Manufacturing, Commercial, Corporate functions to understand current and future data opportunities and collaborates with business and IT leaders to identify, design, plan and prioritize a data strategy, roadmap and technical product portfolio on data engineering and science to solve identifies issues.
Drive, lead and prioritize the technical data program agenda for the business within the whole of Takeda and IT. Lead the identification of large business opportunities and orchestrate technical IT plans end efforts to completion on time and repeatable business solutions.
Oversee the development of scalable IT solutions, time to market and data innovation through terms of service strategy, data architecture and service delivery.
Lead the development of data skill set and aligned competencies within Takeda to ensure the organization is ready for the next data era and new experts can support the implementation of repeatable data engineering, science and AI-solutions.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Drive and lead the design a multi-year data strategy to create new data products and drive measurable competitive advantage for Takeda. Determine the investments necessary in terms of people and technology to achieve these objectives
Explore data engineering, data science and AI developments and translate these to the data strategy to keep Takeda on the cutting edge of data optimization.
Orchestrate all data efforts within IT and the business and align the business to the IT agenda aligned with new capabilities and methods.
Lead the design of a data engineering, data science and AI organization around data domain expertise and data science specializations to drive the effective leverage of methodologies, tools, and talent on business problems
Promote identification of new internal and external data sources; approve selection and integration
Explore the ecosystem (internal, external) and inject new insights for data into IT and the business and use specific designed used cases and lead the sharing of research findings broadly within Takeda.
Drive and articulate the broader need of data engineering and data science and aligned re-usable and scalable tooling for implementations; deploy world-class data and AI capabilities
Lead the design of performance determinations and requirements for data programs and project and act as the business owner on data engineering, science and AI.
Partner within Takeda and IT to orchestrate and align the data agenda to drive data program standardizations, data adoption and effective data implementations.
Advise business leadership team on data and AI opportunities to utilize and to collaborate, thus shaping Takeda’s data story and collaborate with business leaders develop a consolidated data portfolio and projects aligned with overall IT and Takeda strategic roadmaps and with a strong focus on scaling up projects.
Build and manage a strong network internally and externally with strategic and data experts and data technology partners with strong cloud, digital, architecture AI, cyber security and analytics capabilities.
Explore and utilize strategic partnerships, evaluate business opportunities and elevate used cases to drive data drive business changes and optimization
Oversee the different re-usable and scalable data model functions design for different scope and organization complexity and identify and address issues through model and implementation drift.
In consolidating the data program, data portfolio of data projects continuously to evolve the data agenda and implementations for Takeda towards a top industry data standard. Own the lifecycle of data engineering and data science services required by various business organizations across Takeda
Manage spend and value targets for data program implementations and track the monthly performance and report progress.
Lead the development of a Data Enablement team to drive delivery, implementation and adoption of data engineering, science and AI solutions
Ensure effective and overall data strategy in collaboration and alignment with business and IT leaders
Oversee model data delivery with a sense of business urgency utilizing a product management mentality; identifying and delivering capabilities that can be built once, but deployed in markets/scenarios
Lead the identification of synergies across the data implementations across Takeda and develop appropriate capabilities to reduce cost
Lead the standardization and codification of AI&D approaches and methods for developing and maintaining algorithms codified
Approve new policies and standards, and promote their maintenance, dissemination, and utilization across the organization
Stimulate and promotes new data and AI capabilities to upskill the current workforce of experts and implementation specialist in close collaboration with our IT leadership.
Support recruitment and onboard top talent within or to Takeda to build pool of practitioners

DIMENSIONS AND ASPECTS

Technical/Functional (Line) Expertise

Broad technology skills in data, AI/ML and ability to translate knowledge into solutions which transform the customer’s experience.
Experience socializing and serving as a liaison between the EDPP and business partners to demonstrate the value proposition of the service delivery framework to leadership
Leadership (Vision, strategy and business alignment, people management, communication, influencing others, managing change)
Experience of designing, and evaluating organizational transformations and delivering large scale change that adds value from data and information
Proven experience of providing strategic and technical leadership to large complex organizations
Knowledge of the contemporary digital landscape of organizations and experience of bringing leading technology and process optimization practices to an organization to drive sustainable improvements in business performance
Experience leading agile teams leveraging scrum methodology

Decision-making and Autonomy

Proven track record of driving change in processes and organizations, while maintaining working relationships with key business customers.
Versed in Risk management possessing ability to identify, analyze, track, manage and resolve risks issues that impact project

Interaction

Demonstrated success in the areas of IT Business Partnership & Relationship Management, Value Realization, IT Vendor Management/Governance
IT Project/Program Management, IT Service Management
Collaborating and Influencing
Negotiates with a genuine give-and-take approach, where both act as true peers and decisions are shared.
Spends time identifying all stakeholders necessary and meets or connects with all of them, neglecting no one to shape a collective consensus.
Identifies opportunities to build relationships that will help others achieve their objectives and reaches out to those people or new people.

Leading People

Collaborates and openly debates with the team to manage projects, solve problems, discuss challenging
issues, or learn more about critical issues as a group.
Delegates roles thoughtfully to free self to work at a more strategic level.
Collaborates with each employee to establish clear, challenging performance goals and metrics for the year.
Designs a performance management process to monitor projects and deliver results that exceed expectations.
Periodically reviews team progress against plans, focuses attention beyond the project to the full year

Innovation

Leverage digital technologies to drive business results
Captures voice of the customer and provides operating model which optimizes and socializes service delivery

Complexity

Leads, transforms and deliver functions – finance, resourcing, operations , training, change management etc.
Able to operate in an environment of ambiguity and uncertainty, while continuing to advance goals and objectives based on available information.
Acts to surpass goals, seizing opportunities to push the envelope.
Sets continually higher goals that are ambitious but realistic for self and team, geared to overall organizational objectives.
Focuses on new business opportunities that enable business development targets to be exceeded.
This leader’s primary objective is to unify a talented team of data and data scientists and engineers and focus their efforts on the delivery of productized AI use cases prioritized by critical business needs and the creation of enterprise value. This will be measured by improved business focus, exponentially increased output and specialization, and the creation of natural business demand for shared data and AI capabilities.
Creation of a customer-focused, central hub and service organization for all data science activities, enabling Takeda to leverage its scale and reach.
Establish the cultural footprint for a team that must play a growing and sustainable role in the continued success of Takeda.
Develop and communicate the data science strategy for Takeda, including a vision for tools, processes and technology, self-service capabilities, the productization of analytical tools and services.
Established a functioning environment that allows various Takeda users to embed data and data science capabilities

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Essential

Bachelor’s Degree in computer science, mathematics or engineering is required;, graduate degree in relevant field is desired.
10+ years of data and analytics leadership experience
Technical experience across a variety of analytics functions and capacities
Experience with advanced data techniques including advanced qualitative and quantitative data mining, complex predictive modeling and other real-time pattern detection methods. In-depth exposure to machine learning, algorithms, statistics, visualization, data engineering, natural language processing, data platforms and engineering.
Experience working in globally matrixed organizations
Team leadership of more than 50 employees
A demonstrated ability to unify and lead teams within a matrixed organization.
Standardization of disparate approaches to Data and AI/Data Science
Established partnerships with top academic institutions or industry/domain leaders
Previous healthcare / life science / pharmaceutical industry experience preferred
Reference-able leadership, management, or key influencer experiences required
Previous experience managing large programs and budgets preferred
Ability to think outside the box for creative strategies
Tenacity, perseverance, and courage
Experienced within Agile methods and leading Scrum teams

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
5,Quality Control Scientist III,$37k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Quality Control Scientist III

Join our team in Milwaukee, WI. We are expanding this site to provide R&D, manufacturing and operations support for catalog and custom TheraPure components.

Biosciences Division / Milwaukee, WI

How will you make an impact?

The Quality Control Scientist III is responsible for (1) performing and interpreting analytical assays related to finished (bulk) product, in-process product, raw materials and other samples in QC lab in accordance with the quality and departmental procedures, (2) development and validation of new analytical methods for products and raw materials, (3) improvement of existing analytical methods for products and raw materials.

What will you do?

Perform and troubleshoot chemical assays (e.g., KF, UV-Vis, HPLC, NMR, etc.) following standard procedures and maintain records according to ISO and/or other applicable standards
Evaluate need for improvement in documentation, and implement improvement, when needed
Maintain lab equipment according to procedure. Maintain expertise in equipment use and troubleshooting. Identify and recommend the need for new equipment
Provide training to associates, foster achievement of goals as coach for team members and act as role model in implementation and improvement of safety practices/procedures
Perform laboratory investigations. Execute experiments to troubleshoot assays, resolve customer complaints and confirm out of specification results
Provide technical expertise to management and interdepartmental teams. Work with cross-functional teams to prepare for new product launches
Plan and execute validation protocols for existing or new analytical methods
Write technical reports. Prepare and deliver technical presentations
Support and actively participates in the continuous improvement processes.
How will you get here?
Education:
B.S. in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry, or a related science; Advanced degree, preferred
Experience / Skills:
Minimum of 5 years of laboratory experience in industry. Quality Control experience, preferred
Strong understanding of analytical principles, theory and operation of various analytical instruments and techniques (HPLC, NMR)
Ability to work on complex problems of diverse scope, and exercise judgment within broadly defined practices and policies
Strong understanding of analytical data, proficiency in troubleshooting, capability in method development
Ability to use computers and MS office (Word, Excel) knowledge
Good written communication skills, teamwork and interpersonal skills.
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Ability to regularly handle chemicals, solvents, and potentially hazardous substances
Physical Requirements:
Be mechanically adept and able to apply mechanical fundamentals to properly operate, the equipment within their area of responsibility
The employee is occasionally required to walk, sit, stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, and crawl and frequently lift and/or move 50 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move more than 50 pounds with assistance
Specific vision abilities required for this position include close vision, distant vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus and differentiate between basic colors.",3.6,"Thermo Fisher - America
3.6","Milwaukee, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
6,Data Engineer,$85k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineers develop, construct, test, and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems. They clean, prepare, and optimize data for consumption through the design and construction of massive reservoirs for big data. They solve problems associated with database access and integration and unstructured data sets to provide clean, usable data for customers and IT counterparts. These engineers serve as integrators between data architects, data scientists, and other data consumers. They apply knowledge of scripting tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build the data pipelines that enable faster, better, data-informed decision-making within the Agency.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) serves as the world leader in providing timely, relevant, accurate and actionable geospatial intelligence (GEOINT). NGA's civilian, military and contract personnel evaluate imagery, maps, charts, multiple layers of foundation data - such as terrain, elevation and gravity - and the full spectrum of visible and invisible light in order to help users visualize what is happening at a particular place and time. NGA is in search of Data Engineers who understand data, data architectures, data pipeline infrastructure, cloud solutions, and security best practices. Data Engineers create data infrastructure and integrated data pipelines; transforming, enriching, and delivering data for consumers. They may work independently and/or as part of a team of data and non-data professionals on projects of varying complexities. They will design logical and physical data models for data warehousing; develop robust data models, data dictionaries, and data flow diagrams. Data Engineers must be able to operate at the tactical and strategic level while working in a dynamic and sometimes ambiguous environment to deliver impactful results. They will leverage their strong interpersonal skills to effectively communicate with mission owners at varying levels inside and outside the Agency. As a Data Engineer, you will be tasked against the Agency's biggest data challenges in support of missions such as National Intelligence, National Security, Military Operations, and Disaster Relief and Preparedness, for a diverse audience including the Department of Defense, the Intelligence Community, and senior government officials up to and including the United States Congress and the President of the United States. Other duties may include: \* Utilize a variety of languages and tools (e.g., scripting languages) to build data pipelines to pull together information from different source systems. \* Design, construct, install, test, and maintain highly scalable data management systems; \* Develop data set processes for data discovery, modeling, mining, and production. \* Integrate and prepare large, complex data sets that meet functional /non-functional business requirements. \* Design and implement high performance data pipelines for distributed systems and data analytics for customers. \* Build, deploy, operate, and maintain big data analytics infrastructure. \* Orchestrate large PB sized data storage and compute clusters across bare-metal and cloud. \* Deploy and manage infrastructures based on Docker, Kubernetes, or OpenStack, and public Clouds such as Azure, AWS or Google Cloud Platform. \* Create tool-chains for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing AI workflows. \* Experience with engineering data pipeline from collection and processing to visualization of SQL and NOSQL cyber security data sources for threat analysis and modelling. \* Work with Agency data and machine learning experts to improve functionality in our data and model life cycle management capabilities. \* Develop enterprise interoperable coding and data standards and create processes to ensure use of enterprise-wide data architecture capabilities. \* Solve problems and deliver solutions with database access and data integration, define data conflation, fusion, and de-confliction rules. \* Collaborate with data architects, data scientists, data stewards, and customers to enable more efficient and effective data-informed decision-making. \* Apply expert knowledge of scripting, tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build databases and data pipelines. \* Accomplish data cleansing, preparation, storage, and security. \* Web-based data creation and editing through iD editor or JDSM. \* Data conflation activities through Hootenanny. \* Upgrades to the UI and system capabilities to enhance user experience. \* Use business analytics and data validation to improve campaign focus and output. \* Establish and sustain a NOME User Forum. \* Create and brief presentations around the community and conferences. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated proficiency in applied programming and/or manipulation of data with a programing language such as Python, R or Java. 2. Demonstrated experience working with one or more database management systems, e.g. relational (Oracle, MySQL, Postgresql, etc.), noSQL (MongoDB, Accumulo, etc.), graph (Allegrograph, JanusGraphy, Neo4J, etc) to include experience with database retrieval methods and optimizations. 3. Demonstrated experience working with a range of data storage/access options, e.g. File(S3, FTP,etc.) and/or API(WFS, FeatureServer, Elasticsearch, SDK, etc.). 4. Demonstrated experience enabling access to data by way of databases or dashboards. 5. Demonstrated experience cleaning, filtering, transforming data, and/or enriching data. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Science, Information Systems Management, Mathematics, Operations Research, Physical Sciences, Statistics, Technology Management, or a degree that provided a minimum of 24 semester hours in one or more of the fields identified above and required the development or adaptation of applications, systems, or networks. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. -OR- C. Experience: A minimum of 4 years of experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. -AND- IT-related experience demonstrating each of the four competencies: Attention to Detail, Customer Service, Oral Communication, and Problem Solving.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Experience as a proven innovator and strategic problem solver. 2. Familiarity with Department of Defense (DoD) and Intelligence Community (IC) activities, functions, and organizational structures 3. Knowledge and understanding of NGA operations, data infrastructure and architecture 4. Familiarity with cloud services as applied in the DoD and IC. 5. Knowledge of simplification and optimization of data automation workflows; streamlining of extract-transform-load (ETL) operations. 6. Knowledge of emerging technical skills, tools, and best practices.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $64,948 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $64,948.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
7,"Machine Learning - Computer Scientist, Senior",$124k-$210k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking a Senior / Lead Computer Scientist to cultivate and lead highly skilled technical staff to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics. As our Computer Scientist you will promote and provide MITRE-unique value across multiple sponsors. Additionally, you will be expected to initiate and contribute to various research projects & efforts across MITRE and in collaboration with academia, industry and sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Provide thought leadership and collaborate with academia, industry and MITRE Technical Centers, portfolio and program divisions in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Work with department leadership to develop and evolve an enduring, adaptive and forward-looking strategy and capability advancing the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, and Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and provide technical guidance and quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes, strong leadership and transition of research results to sponsor operations
Provide exemplary leadership, caring mentorship, and collaborative technical advice to staff related to Department domain knowledge or capabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Cybersecurity, Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or related field
5 + years applicable experience including machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Hands on work experience will include tools / packages such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Outstanding presentation skills, both development & delivery, are required for both MITRE facing and Sponsor facing communications
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government clearance are preferred
Proven experience with cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
8,Senior Data Engineer,$95k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.6,"Brain Corp
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Data Scientist-Senior,$107k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Over 10 years of experience and a MA/MS degree.

Typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently.

Oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
10,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,$70k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
11,Associate Clinical Scientist,$42k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Associate Clinical Scientist will serve as a clinical scientist providing pharmacology support and execution of the development, update and maintenance of the TRHC?s clinical decision support system (CDSS) of drug-drug interactions based on drug pharmacokinetics properties. The successful candidate will have a working knowledge of clinical pharmacology, drug metabolism, drug transporters, and related pharmacokinetics principles. This person will work in collaboration with other research and clinical scientists in the Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development institute for the integration of generated information and of knowledge into the overall program strategies, to improve the efficiency of the TRHC?s CDSS, improve our mechanistic understanding and provide scientific rationale. This individual will also work in close collaboration with the TRHC academy to provide advanced training and review educational programs related to the TRHC?s CDSS. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a high-impact clinical pharmacology team and collaborative setting.

TRHC Scientific Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development Institute (SPPRDI) is committed to the development of proprietary products, their validation and recognition by the scientific and regulatory communities to optimize medication regimen in order to improve patient outcomes, reduce utilization of various healthcare services, lower healthcare costs, and manage risk.
Accountable and responsible for ensuring maintenance and update of drugs into the CDSS.
Performs, integrates and interpret PK analysis including pre-clinical and clinical studies.
Interpret enzymatic assays, in vitro/ex vivo drug metabolism studies. Integrate metabolism and transporter data to provide mechanistic interpretation into the CDSS.
Fully knowledgeable about PK?s drugs; to address, identify and resolve scientific issues.
Contributes to expert pharmacology input into educational training programs and materials.
Complies with all applicable regulations, maintains proper records in accordance with SOPs and policies
Education:
PharmD or MD equivalent and PhD from an accredited institution in Clinical pharmacology, Pharmacokinetics, Drug metabolism, or other relevant fields or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience:
Experience in clinical pharmacology research.
Experience in research (post-doctoral formation/fellowship; up to 2 years) would be advantageous.
Specific Skills:
An in depth knowledge of drug metabolizing enzymes and transporters would be considered highly beneficial.
Demonstrated ability and strong understanding with preclinical and clinical PK data.
Demonstrates ability to drive for results independently.
Participates in team for ensuring valid methods and in assessing review process.
Applicant should be organized, self-motivated and capable of working autonomously and in a collaborative environment.
It would be advantageous for the candidate to have knowledge on pharmacogenomics.",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Orlando, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
12,Data Engineer with Top Secret,$90k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Opportunity: Our team is seeking a talented Top Secret cleared Data Engineer to work in our NW Washington DC location.

This role supports DHS’s Office of Intelligence and Analysis (I&A). I&A is responsible for developing DHS-wide intelligence through managing the collection, analysis and fusion of intelligence throughout the entire Department. I&A disseminates intelligence throughout DHS, to the other members of the United States Intelligence Community, and to first responders at the state, local, and tribal level.
What You'll Get To Do as a Data Engineer: *
Create and maintain data pipelines and transformation flows in a cloud environment
Data management/mapping among multiple distinct data sources
Cloud management and server administration of domain services
Big Data infrastructure services and cross domain data transfer
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Active Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility
BS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline from an accredited college or university and ten (10) to fourteen (14) years of progressive experience, or an MS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline, and eight (8) to twelve (12) years of progressive experience, or a Ph.D. degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline and four (4) to seven (7) years of progressive experience.
Familiar with ETL technologies, MapReduce, JSON/XML transformations and schemas
Familiar with AngularJS
Familiar with Apache NiFi and Java (NAR) NiFi Archives
Knowledge of Amazon Web Services (AWS Cloud)
Programming languages – Java/JEE, Javascript, Python, Groovy, Shell Script
HTTP via REST and SOAP
Datastores – HDFS, MongoDB, S3, Elastic, NoSQL, RDBMS
Build and Configuration Management Tools – Maven, Ansible, Puppet
Working knowledge with public keys and digital certificates
Linux/Unix server environments
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have: *
Master’s level education
Familiarity with: jQuery, XPath, XQuery, Spark, Impala, Sqoop, Hive/Pig, Python, Gradle, Maven, PL/SQL, Unix Shell, C++/C, AngularJS, Spring, JSON, XML/XSLT/HTML, JPA/Hibernate, Spark, Accumulo, MapReduce, Storm/Kafka, HSpace, Pig, Servlet/JSP, LDAP
About OneGlobe: *
OneGlobe LLC was founded in 2005 to provide quality Information Technology solutions that exceed expectations. We focus on IT System Modernization using agile software development practices and DevSecOps to deliver intuitive and maintainable systems that we help our customers improve their processes and capabilities.

We provide full service IT solutions and have the skill to identify, plan and perform cost-saving steps throughout the system lifecycle to enhance system efficiency, while optimizing the value that we deliver to our customers. Our team has the drive and right mindset to feel ownership on the projects they work. They partner with our customers to give the extra effort sometimes required to deliver success.

We provide highly competitive benefits package to include: extensive medical/dental/vision, 7% of your annual salary toward 401(k), Paid Time Off (PTO), $5K annually toward ongoing education and training, and more. We also have monthly social and tech events!

See additional positions at: http://www.oneglobeit.com/#careers

OneGlobe is a proud equal opportunity employer. We are a drug free, EEO employer committed to a diverse workforce. We will consider all qualified candidates regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity, family responsibilities, disability, political affiliation or veteran status.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NiFi: 5 years (Preferred)
Java: 5 years (Preferred)
Hadoop: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
ETL: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
13,Sr. Data Engineer,$69k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Datascan is a provider of wholesale and audit intelligence in the automotive industry. Datascan’s solutions are the most comprehensive in the industry, providing banks, independent finance companies, and captive financial institutions with clarity critical to their success – helping them manage risk while increasing productivity and profits. All of our solutions are web-based and delivered from our state-of-the-art DataScan-managed data centers.

Job Description


The Data Engineer will be working on creating solutions to implement and operationalize a data lake, with full support for ingestion of data from various sources. Additionally, the Data Engineer will implement security and governance controls within the data, manage a cataloging solution, and automate solutions for transforming data sets using state of the art big-data technologies (Hive, Spark, etc.).

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain one or more data lakes to support scalable ingesting, manipulation, and reporting of data.
Manipulate data to produce and maintain new data elements using repeatable, automated processes.
Combine and transform data into usable sets by other individuals in the organization, for example, data scientists and business users.
Build new software from the ground up utilizing industry standard best practices
Job Requirements
Experience working within AWS ecosystem (AWS S3, Glue, EMR, Redshift, Athena, QuickSight) or comparable cloud environments (Azure/GCP)
Experience extracting, ingesting, and transforming large data sets
Experience with working with multiple kinds of databases (relational, document storage, key-value, timeseries) and their associated query languages -- specifically understanding when to use one vs. another.
Experience with big data platforms such as Hadoop and Spark
Experience utilizing enterprise data warehousing systems such as Redshift.
Strong coding skills (Python, Java, C# are all reasonable)
Lots of experience working with common data formats and manipulating data within them -- JSON, CSV, Parquet
Experience working with Infrastructure as Code tools such as Cloudformation, CDK, or Terraform.
Experience handling sensitive data and governing access to it.
#LI-KN1

#WeDoITBetter",3.2,"DataScan
3.2","Alpharetta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
14,Data Scientist,-1,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

As a data scientist at Triplebyte, you'll have the opportunity to work on a variety of challenges to help us scale. You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring. Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering. You'll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,"Triplebyte
3.2",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
15,Data QA Engineer,$48k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description: Data QA Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA
Department: Quality Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Software Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a self-motivated mid-level Data QA Engineer to lead the testing framework design, development, automation for our big data infrastructure leveraging latest technologies such as Hadoop and Spark, both on-premise and in the cloud. This position requires experience in testing and automation of data pipelines, data services, data warehouses, business intelligence and machine learning platforms, especially around unified consumer transactional, demographic and behavioral data.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools/technologies such as SQL/NoSQL, Python, and Tableau to validate products, data pipelines and data deliverables. If you have experience in automation, quality engineering of data centric applications/systems, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Design and implement Test Automation frameworks using Python, node.js, SQL, javascript and React JS.
Develop test strategies, plans, test cases and engineering best practices related to software test engineering, both manual and automated testing with a specific focus on data quality
Work closely with data engineers, data scientists and analysts to inform solution designs in terms of testability.
Building and automating testing frameworks around data ingestion pipelines for master data management, deep-learning, and predictive analytics
Build and maintain testing frameworks for big data environments that are highly secure, scalable, flexible, and performant using appropriate SQL technologies.
Lead data governance and data profiling efforts to ensure data quality and proper meta data documentation for data lineage.
Creating quality metrics to evaluate data pipelines, products and customer deliverables.
Collaborate with diverse technical and non-technical teams located across multiple time-zones on client deliverables and technical support
Participate-in and contribute to design and code reviews
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on data analytics.
3+ years of experience in data integration / data engineering
3+ years of experience in data modeling and architecture
3+ years of experience in QA automation
Experience in working with large scale Enterprise data warehouse, data integration, data migration and data quality verification
Hands-on testing experience in working Hadoop, Spark and other Big data technologies is highly preferred
Knowledge of data pipelines using SQL, Hive, Spark, Spark ML
Excellent analytics, problem-solving and debugging skills",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
16,Data Scientist (Remote Work Option),$64k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Relocation Assistance Offered Within Country
# 88040 - Topeka, Kansas, United States

Job Summary:

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our cross-functional teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Main Responsibilities:

Develop custom data models and algorithms to address business challenges
Assess quality of data sources
Evaluate technical feasibility of business problems
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Lead data automation projects to aggregate disparate data sources
Partner with IT to align on data architecture, tools and technologies

Main Requirements:

Bachelor's degree required; Certificate, Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field a plus
At least 2 years experience using computer languages (Python, R, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience communicating technical concepts to non-technical audiences
Experience with a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience with cloud services: GCP, AWS, etc
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, Nielsen, etc.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Tableau, Data Studio, etc

Equal Opportunity Employer
Colgate is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, age, disability, marital status, veteran status (United States positions), or any other characteristic protected by law

Are you interested in working for Hill's Pet Nutrition? You can apply online and attach all relevant documents such as a cover letter and resume or CV. Applications received by e-mail are not considered in the selection process. Become part of our team. We look forward to your application.

Work that matters, fueled by passion for pets! At Hill’s we have a purpose. Every day around the world, we transform the lives of millions of pet families through pioneering innovation, amazing nutrition, and the best and brightest people. Founded more than 75 years ago with an unwavering commitment to pet nutrition, Hills' mission is to help enrich and lengthen the special relationships between people and their pets.

HILL'S® Prescription Diet® therapeutic pet foods, HILL'S® Science Diet® and HILL'S® Ideal Balance™ wellness pet foods are sold worldwide. Hill’s is a division of Colgate-Palmolive, a leading global consumer products company, tightly focused on Oral Care, Personal Care, Home Care and Pet Nutrition, with sales of products in more than 200 countries. To learn more about Hill's and Colgate, please visit http://www.hillspet.com and http://www.colgatepalmolive.com, or find us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube.

Reasonable accommodation during the application process is available for persons with disabilities. Please contact Application_Accommodation@colpal.com with the subject ""Accommodation Request"" should you require accommodation.",4.1,"Hill's Pet Nutrition
4.1","Topeka, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1907,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
17,Quality Control Scientist,-1,"Position Summary:

The Quality Control Scientist will provide oversight of contract analytical labs and manufacturers. This includes, review of analytical data from release and stability studies and review of method validation protocols and reports. The candidate should have a strong understanding of cGMPs and relevant ICH and FDA regulatory guidelines. Prior hand-on experience working in a QC lab and thorough understanding of root cause analysis for investigations is required. This position will interact and work closely with cross-functional teams, including, manufacturing, quality assurance and regulatory.

Responsibilities:
Review analytical data packages generated during GMP release/stability testing of drug substance and drug product at the contract manufacturing sites
Assist in investigations and formulate a plan to identify/confirm root cause for anomalous results
Write and/or review method validation and transfer protocols and reports
Write and/or review protocols and reports related to stability studies as well as prepare tables summarizing results from stability studies
Track and trend release and stability data for batch analysis and shelf life establishment
Initiate change control for internal specifications and regulatory documents
Evaluate and perform risk assessment for change control documents provided by the contract manufacturing sites
Manage reference standard program for drug substance, impurities and degradants
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S in analytical chemistry or related scientific disciplines with 5+ years of experience in analytical development with minimum of 3+ years of experience in quality control
Skills, Knowledge & Abilities:
Hands-on proficiency and problem-solving skills with chromatographic techniques e.g. HPLC, UPLC and GC. Familiarity with mass and UV/VIS spectroscopic techniques is an advantage
Prior experience in interacting with contract labs and manufacturing sites is a plus
Hands-on experience with method validations and transfers in support of pharmaceutical manufacturing
Proficiency in performing root cause analysis for investigation
Experience with iStability software is a plus
Passion for learning, creating, relating, communicating, and leading cross functional teams
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience in a start-up environment preferred
Must be pro-active team player, flexible, and open to change
Working Conditions: Will work from the Company's San Francisco Bay Area office, with additional travel as required to oversee the virtual development and manufacturing network (estimated at 25%).

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

This is largely a sedentary role; however, some filing is required. This would require the ability to lift files, open filing cabinets and bend or stand on a stool as necessary.

This job operates in a professional office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.

Benefits and Perks:

Apellis offers a great benefit package which includes: health insurance with full premium coverage, 401K with company match, paid time off (PTO), long- term disability insurance, life insurance and more! Visit http://apellis.com/careerbenefits.html to learn more.

Company Background:

We are a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of novel therapeutic compounds to treat disease through the inhibition of the complement system, which is an integral component of the immune system, at the level of C3, the central protein in the complement cascade. We believe that this approach can result in broad inhibition of the principal pathways of the complement system and has the potential to effectively control a broad array of complement-dependent autoimmune and inflammatory diseases.

Visit http://apellis.com/about.html to learn more.

EEO Statement:

Apellis is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state and local fair employment practices laws. Apellis strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against employees, applicants or any other covered persons because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex (including pregnancy), gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender or transsexual individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, genetic information, marital status, AIDS/HIV status, smoker/nonsmoker, and occupational pneumocononiosis or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

#LI-BE1",3.5,"Apellis
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,Data Analyst,$34k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Onsite work only - Franklin, Tennessee

Are you looking for a career with a purpose? Do you want the opportunity to be part of a company that’s changing millions of lives for the better? Well, you’ve come to the right place. Ramsey Solutions exists to provide biblically based, commonsense education and empowerment that give HOPE to everyone in every walk of life. Our mission to change the world isn’t easy. We face resistance every day because what we believe is absolutely countercultural. We’re weird. We hate debt. And we actually cut up our credit cards . . . like, for real. We don’t use them in our entire business. Bottom line: We don’t use debt—period. Some of us are still fighting our way out of it, but we aren’t going back in.

Our Analytics and Insights Team has been one of the fastest-growing technology teams at Ramsey Solutions—they’re rocking it! They partner with our 15 digital product areas to help create data-driven solutions for our business problems so we can keep doing work that matters to change more lives. Performing mathematical analysis and using technology to put it into action, this team helps all of us at Ramsey perform at our highest level.

This is where you come in. We need your help to generate data-driven solutions to our business problems. We need a hardcore math nerd—someone who understands mathematical analysis and knows how to use technology to implement it. You’re someone who’s always itching to solve the problem, complete the puzzle, and answer the question. You’re never satisfied with a fluffy answer. You want the facts. You always back up your position with data.

Our data tells a story, and we need you to help us read it. You’ll help us pull back the curtain, notice trends, and apply data to drive change in our business models so we can help more people. If that sounds exciting to you, keep reading.

Skills Needed to Win:
3+ years of experience driving analytics initiatives to impact a business
Solid mathematical or statistics background
Experience with SQL (you’ll use it every day to get the data you need)
Experience with scripting languages like Python and R
Experience building and maintaining dashboards and reporting systems
Ability to translate data into actionable insights
Supporting business decisions through ad hoc analysis
Extraordinary passion to solve problems (you’re not satisfied until it’s solved and backed by data)
Nice-to-Haves:
Experience with data visualization tools like Tableau
Experience utilizing web analytics and Google Analytics tool set
Experience with optimization testing
About Ramsey Solutions:
We’re a debt-free company that was founded in 1992 by Dave Ramsey.
We have over 900 team members who are 100% dedicated to our mission.
We believe collaboration, innovation and a shared sense of mission come from being present with each other. That’s why all of our team members work together under one roof at our headquarters in Franklin, Tennessee.
Ramsey Solutions was recognized by Inc. Magazine as a Best Workplace in the nation for 2020.
And by the way, we're not stuffy or corporate around here. Here are some of the perks and benefits at Ramsey Solutions:
A 401(k) match of 4% after one year as a team member (you can still contribute in the first year)
Health insurance on day one with a $500 HSA match every year
One fully paid workweek of ministry time after one year to volunteer for your favorite charity or nonprofit
Generous PTO and paid sick time off
We prioritize work-life balance and rarely exceed a 40-hour work week
Weekly devotionals with world-renowned speakers, pastors and authors
$300/year to put toward achieving your fitness goals
Casual dress and work environment
It’s a calling, and we’re on a mission to change lives. Join the crusade! Apply now.

EEO/M/F/Veteran/Disabled",3.2,"Ramsey Solutions
3.2","Franklin, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
19,Senior Outreach Data Scientist,$104k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?

Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.

Why Salient CRGT?

We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?

We are seeking a senior level Outreach Data Scientist.

This role fullfills the following responsibilites:

implements a continuous review process to evaluate the effectiveness of processes and standards for identifying process improvements to drive improved efficiency and quality
evaluates quality issues, inefficient processes, product quality, customer feedback, and analyst recommendations to identify process and product improvements
identifies opportunities to eliminate duplication of effort, improve analyst effectiveness and efficiency, eliminate backlog, reduce accuracy issues, and improve general operations
conducts briefings on improvement recommendations, gaining approval for implementation, and coordinating implementation improvements
implementation of tools, scripts, algorithms, and techniques assesses the effectiveness of the improvements
assesses and reports on metrics

#cjpost

Required Qualifications:

The following are minimum requirements for the role:

10+ years of experience
MA/MS degree
Experience continuous process improvement (CPI) researcher and facilitator
Experience working in NCTC screening and vetting using NCTC IC databases
Analytical and critical thinking skills
Knowledge of SOPs and Government watchlisting and screening and vetting guidelines
Advanced communication skills including documentation and briefings
Knowledge of ODNI, NCTC, and IC mission, roles, and responsibilities
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance

#cjpost #super6

#muncyreqs

#crgt456 #jpreqs

Desired Qualifications:
Recognized expert in specific field

Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",3.5,"Salient CRGT, Inc
3.5","McLean, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
20,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,"Ecolab
3.7","Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
21,Data Scientist 3 (844),$128k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"Amyris has developed a high-throughput genetic engineering platform for designing and building custom microbes to serve as living factories. Using an industrial scale fermentation process, our microbes convert cheap sugars into a wide variety of high-value target molecules. Our end products directly impact millions of lives. We are pragmatic idealists seeking a profitable way to make the world a better place. We are convinced synthetic biology is here to stay and will have a major positive impact on our planet and everyday life.
Within Amyris R&D, we are searching for a highly energetic, curious, and self-motivated data scientist with a strong background in statistics, computing and biology to join our Data Science and Computing team. Research at Amyris is a highly multidisciplinary effort that needs brilliant contributions from life sciences and engineering disciplines in order to take projects from concept to market. From hacking directly on DNA in the lab to full scale factory production, every aspect of our work is facilitated and accelerated by quantitative science and software & hardware automation. The Data Science and Computing team works hand-in-hand with bench scientists and builds tools that enable genome engineering, protein engineering, metabolic modeling, omics experiment analysis, statistical design of experiments and machine learning models in pursuit of making better microbial strains or fermentation processes. In short, we help accelerate the design-build-test-analyze cycle in synthetic biology.
Key Responsibilities:
Iteratively develop computational algorithms, analyses, visualization tools and machine learning models to meet evolving scientific needs and to aid rapid data-driven decision making while working with a variety of data types including: genotype (NGS), phenotype (metabolomics, proteomics, GC/MS, spectroscopy, fermentation), material flow
Build version-controlled, computational workflows to analyze and model rich, high-throughput phenotype data
Interact closely with a cross-disciplinary teams of biology, analytical chemistry, and fermentation scientists to build data science products

Required Qualifications:
Degree in quantitative discipline such as computer science, mathematics, computational biology, electrical engineering, bioengineering or equivalent.
Ph.D. plus 1-3 years experience, or M.S. plus 3-6 years experience.
Experience in analyzing & visualizing large scientific datasets representing biological & chemical phenotypes
Intermediate (undergraduate level) understanding of biology topics including: genetics, cell physiology, biochemistry, evolution
Experience with programming best practices (unit testing, CI/CD, etc) and version control while contributing to or maintaining large codebases
Expertise with scripting programming languages (Python is preferred)
Hands-on experience with machine learning frameworks and concepts
Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and intellectually rigorous environment
Creativity, independent thinking, and passion
Preferred Qualifications:
Background in mass spectrometry informatics, high throughput sequencing, spectrophotometry, or industrial fermentation
Experience in a microbiology or synthetic biology setting
#LI-DJ1

Amyris, a leader in industrial synthetic biology, uses its innovative bioscience solutions to achieve renewable products by converting plant sugars into hydrocarbon molecules. Amyris’ molecules are used in wide range of specialty & performance chemicals, flavors & fragrances and in applications ranging from cosmetics to biofuels. Learn more at www.amyris.com.

Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”), Amyris is required to inform California residents who are our job applicants (“Applicants”) about the personal information we collect about you when you apply to a job on this site.

As an Applicant, you have the right to know and understand the categories of personal information we collect about you, and the purposes for which the categories of personal information shall be used, pursuant to the CCPA.

By clicking the “APPLY FOR THIS JOB” button below and submitting your job application, you agree you have reviewed the complete Privacy Notice for Employees, Independent Contractors and Job Applicants.

If you have any questions regarding this information, please contact Amyris at privacy@amyris.com

As a VEVRAA Federal Contractor, Amyris is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Amyris complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment.

If you are a recruiter or placement agency, please do not submit resumes to any person or email address at Amyris, Inc. prior to having a signed agreement. Amyris is not liable for and will not pay placement fees for candidates submitted by any agency other than its approved recruitment partners. Furthermore, any resumes sent to us without an agreement in place will be considered your company’s gift to Amyris and may be forwarded to our recruiters for their attention.",3.8,"Amyris
3.8","Emeryville, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
22,Population Health Outcomes- Data Scientist (Remote/ Virtual),$66k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Looking for an opportunity to use your applied predictive analysisis, Python, SQL and AI expertise? Apply to this REMOTE opportunity to join the growing Ascension Data Science Institute!

The Ascension Data Sciences Institute (ADSI) was created in July 2019 with the mission of supporting Ascension in achieving its Quadruple Aim with uniquely skilled, high-performing associates who develop analyses, models and applications to enable Ascension in providing higher value healthcare and making strategic decisions. ADSI is comprised of 6 domains addressing 1) Clinical quality and patient safety; 2) Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes; 3) Strategic Operations and Financial Analytics; 4) Actuarial and Managed Care Analytics; 5) Registry Abstraction Healthcare Solutions; and 6) Healthcare Data Intelligence. We recognize that the healthcare environment is a complex ecosystem of rapidly evolving clinical and economic practices that affect patient and provider experience and demands increasingly sophisticated and complex measurement. Our objective is for advanced analytics and data science to play a critical and foundational role in the transformation of care delivery, quality and financial outcomes to enable our organization’s competitive advantage.

We are hiring a Data Scientist on the Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes team to support Ascension’s Population Health Management and Value Based Care Strategy. In this position, you will be involved in predicting clinical and cost outcomes to identify cohorts of the population that represent opportunities for clinical intervention. You will be expected to develop a deep understanding of the business and design advanced analytics products that support the objectives of our stakeholders. In order for your work to drive action and directly impact population health outcomes, you will need to collaborate closely with IT, clinical and operational teams to implement patient identification tools.

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to develops predictive and prescriptive analytics models, creating efficient algorithms, and innovating use of data.

Responsibilities:
Validate the performance and generalizability of predictive models and risk scores available in vendor tools identifying gaps and prioritizing model development based on business needs.
Become the subject matter expert on available risk scores and consult with local analytic teams and business leaders on the tools appropriate for their use cases.
Leverage external research and internal clinical expertise to identify key predictors to capture and include in models.
Work with data management teams to develop standardized datasets used for predictive modelling.
Use EMR, adjudicated medical and pharmacy claims, health risk assessments and other data sources available to develop a suite of models that align with strategic initiatives.
Develop models that are applicable to our value based contracts including Medicaid, Medicare, Medicare Advantage, and commercial populations.
Clearly communicate the value to the organization of leveraging advanced analytics to drive health outcomes and success in value-based care.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Masters in Healthcare Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or other analytical related fields strongly preferred.
Work Experience:
3 years of related experience preferred.
At least 2 years of previous experience in applied predictive analytics preferably within healthcare preferred.
Experience applying leading machine learning methods (forecasting, neural networks, deep learning, optimization etc) to drive measurable improvements in health outcomes preferred.
Experience with Python and SQL required. Working knowledge of Google Cloud Platform (GCP) AI and ML tools a plus.
Experience working with EMR and adjudicated claims data a plus.
Business consultation experience required demonstrating communication and presentation skills.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Nashville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
23,Lead Data Engineer,$83k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a data engineer in Zipcar’s data engineering team, your mission is to build real-time and offline solutions to make data accessible and reliable while leveraging the largest-scale data processing technologies in the world -- and then apply them to the Zipcar's most critical and fundamental data problems.

What you will do:
Build and own mission critical data pipelines that power Zipcar’s business
Develop solutions in bleeding-edge data technologies on AWS eco-system
Partner with architects and data analysts to make the best technology decisions
Create and maintain data models, data catalogs, and data security
Mentor team members and assist them in developing, testing and deploying software
What you’ll love about being a Zipster in Engineering:
You’ll get to come to work every day knowing that you’re contributing to the success of the world’s leading car sharing network
You'll be joining a collaborative, diverse, passionate team of Zipsters
You’ll get to work in a flexible work environment that is innovative and resourceful
At Zipcar, we encourage new tools and ideas- your opinion always matters!
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer scienceor related field
5+years’ experiencewith data engineering or data warehousing, or an equivalent data-oriented software engineering background
5+ years’ experience with SQL, optimizing queries and tuning database performance
3+years’ experiencewith key AWS technologies (Redshift, S3, IAM;alsoKinesis, Lambda, EMR, Spark, Hive)
3+years’ experiencewith ETL technologies (e.g. Talend, Informatica,Matillion)
4+years’ experiencewith Java, Python,Scalaand other programming languages
Experience withdbtand Airflow a strong plus
Familiarity with data analysis and data science tools (Looker,Jupyter, R) is a plus
What tops off the tank:
Competitive Medical, Dental, Vision, Life and Disability Insurance and other voluntary benefits through our parent company, Avis Budget Group
Generous paid time off, including holidays, vacation, personal, sick, volunteer and Parental Leave options
Up to $5,500/year tuition reimbursement
Tax-free benefit for public transportation or parking expenses
Bicycle Reimbursement program
401(k) Retirement Plan with company matched contributions
Free Zipcar Membership and other employee discounts, including discounts on renting and buying Avis/Budget cars
Community involvement opportunities
Who are we?

Glad you asked! Zipcar is the world’s leading car-sharing network, found in urban areas and university campuses in more than 500 cities and towns. Our team is smart, creative and fun, and we’re driven by a mission – to enable simple and responsible urban living.

Being a Zipcar member gives you easy access to a car nearby without all the cost and hassle of owning one. Founded in 2000, Zipcar disrupted – or innovated – the traditional model of car ownership and independent studies show that Zipcar’s model of car sharing is proven to reduce vehicle ownership, freeing up more city space for people. Zipcar provides members with socially responsible, sustainable mobility options that support the global environment, their communities and city livability.

Zipcar is a subsidiary of Avis Budget Group, Inc. (Nasdaq: CAR), a leading global provider of mobility solutions. For more information, visit:www.zipcar.com.

The extra mile:

We encourage Zipsters to bring their whole selves to work - unique perspectives, personal experiences, backgrounds, and however they identify. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer – M/F/D/V.",3.2,"Zipcar
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Car Rental,Travel & Tourism,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
24,Data Science Technician,$60k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the opportunity:

Are you interested in helping to develop world-class machine learning models to assist with natural resource surveys and conservation efforts? SWCA Environmental Consultants is expanding their team and looking for a dynamic individual who wishes to make a difference.

Our Technology Solutions group offers a challenging work environment where you will be a part of a team supporting SWCA’s efforts to develop new and innovative survey methodologies.

Your role will be to assist the data science team in developing training datasets for model development. You should be able to work on an as-needed basis.

What you will accomplish:

Inspect, sort, and classify digital information assets (photos, sound files, etc) as required by the data science team's development priorities and schedule. This work will be performed from home under the supervision of the data science team members.

Experience and qualifications for success:
Strong desire to pursue a career in computer science or data science.
Prior experience with image viewers and audio players.
Prior experience with Zoom as a collaboration tool.
Demonstrated ability of data transfer, data analysis, data mining and data inventory using basic spreadsheet applications (ArcGIS, Access, Excel)

Preferred Qualifications:

Microsoft Teams experience.
Familiarity with Python, including simple script development.

Additional Information:

High speed home Internet connection (500 mbps or greater download, 10 mbps or higher upload).
This position will located as a distributed employee.
Ability to work up to 10 hours per week.

SWCA Environmental Consultants is a growing employee-owned firm, providing a full spectrum of environmental services. With offices across the United States, SWCA is one of the largest environmental compliance firms and ranks among Engineering News-Record’s Top 200 Environmental Firms.

If you would like to contact SWCA regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the online application process due to a disability, please email accommodations@swca.com or call 800-828-8517. This contact information is for disability accommodation requests only. All other inquiries will not receive a response.

EOE - women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and veterans are encouraged to apply.

#ind-swca",3.5,"SWCA Environmental Consultants
3.5","Albuquerque, NM",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
25,Machine Learning Engineer,$68k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Perspecta Labs

Perspecta Labs generates transformative applied research to fuel solutions for our customers’ unique challenges. We are a self-sustaining research center within Perspecta that provides applied research and engineering to enable government agencies, utilities and commercial enterprises to fully exploit the future of communications, analytics and cyber security.

Responsibilities

Perspecta has an exciting opportunity for a Machine Learning Software Engineer to aid on the development of machine learning models and the software that is needed for the training and deployment of these machine learning model. In addition, the qualified candidate will engineer both structure and unstructured data that will be fed to and taken from the machine learning models. Because the qualified candidate will be working closely with the Data Scientist, the candidate must have general understanding of machine learning. This position is located onsite at Picatinny Arsenal, NJ.

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree in Physics, Mathematics, Electrical, Computer, or Software Engineering
3 -5 years experience developing machine learning models in areas such as classification from video, object detection and classification, and reinforcement learning.
Experience with machine learning algorithms such as Neural Networks, Boosting algorithms, Decision Trees, etc.
Software development experience in Python and/or C++ Experience in software design and development Experience with TensorFlow and other machine learning libraries
Broad knowledge in current machine learning techniques and ability to adapt novel techniques to research questions

Preferred Skills:

Familiarity with reinforcement learning and computer vision techniques would be a plus
Good Communication and Presentation skills are a plus. E
xperience with Linux is highly desirable.

The successful candidate must be a U.S. Citizen and possess and be able to maintain a DOD Secret Security Clearance, as a qualification and condition for employment.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Wharton, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
26,Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist,$79k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Maxar is looking for a Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist join our team in Northern VA. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to the prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Geospatial Programmers with analytic teams in order to create custom-tailored web apps.

Life with Us
Project: Were improving upon models that use Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning (AI/ML) to search for and identify objects. You would be the leader in this effort to design a scalable cloud-based solution and turn it into a real-world solution.

Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor, and/or a mentor, to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be developing and enhancing a geospatial app and the supporting infrastructure. This app is used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:

Building and training Deep Learning models to accurately identify specified objects.

Accessing large and various data sets

Working with multiple mission partners to identify and evaluate data sources.

We work in a very Lean-Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum. Weve eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it!

We work together with our govt. stakeholders in their spaces in a very free-flowing and technology-forward environment.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph

Bachelor's degree in a related field, e.g. Computer Science, Systems Engineering, etc.

8 years of relevant experience

Recent experience with some of the following technologies:
AWS: EC2, S3, RDS, Lambda, Cloudfront

Programming and Data Science Tools: Python or Java & experience using PyTorch, TensorFlow, or similar Machine Learning packages

Experience building and training ML computer vision models, classification or object detection

Understanding of methods for labeling training data for Machine Learning models

Experience in data engineering and methods to handle large quantities of data for Machine Learning

Linux Terminal

Preferred Skills:
Willingness to learn new tasks and tools

Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) Pipeline techniques and tools

Experience in building and publishing anaconda packages

Experience performing AI/ML projects in a cloud environment

Experience in model deployment for enterprise applications

Experience leading other developers

Strong interpersonal skills.

Exposure to GIS technologies, e.g. PostGIS, Esri ArcGIS Enterprise

#cjpost",3.4,"Maxar Technologies
3.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
27,Data Science Support Analyst,$72k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
28,Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist),$62k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Battelles founding mission to translate scientific discovery and technology advances into societal benefit is as relevant today as when we opened our doors over 90 years ago. Our science and technology enhance society's well-being and create critical innovations that drive scientific advances for the future. We conduct groundbreaking research and development, design and manufacture leading-edge products, and deliver critical services for commercial and government customers. Our work meets the needs of the nation when it matters most, and Battelle is committed to driving innovation today and for generations to come.
JOB SUMMARY
Battelle’s National Security Business Unit is currently seeking candidates for a full time, permanent position as an Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist) to provide support to government and commercial programs focused on the development, testing, evaluation, and implementation of materials, devices, and techniques designed to detect, provide protection against, and mitigate the effects of explosives.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Execution, data analysis, documentation, and client communication assistance on various projects involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assistance in the resolution/troubleshooting of technical difficulties and safety hazards involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assist in the design and planning of projects, potentially including technical leadership of small teams of multidisciplinary scientists and technical support staff in the performance of selected tasks/projects within time and budget constraints.
Drafting of documentation of laboratory findings and results, including progress reports, final reports, and presentations.
Assistance with posters, articles, and presentations for technical conferences.
Assist with business development efforts, including cost estimation and preparation of white papers and proposals.
Oversee, mentor and train lower-level staff.
Domestic travel of approximately 10% of the time, with some travel events lasting 1-2 weeks.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Bachelor’s degree in chemistry, chemical engineering, mechanical engineering, or a related discipline.
Approximately 5 years of experience with munitions/explosives research, development, and/or test and evaluation
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Sole US citizenship, with the ability to obtain and maintain required government security clearances as a condition of employment.
Sufficient medical fitness to work in the laboratory and in the field to perform assigned duties, including working in test chambers, test ranges, munitions bunkers, and field environments.
The ability to work in a team environment.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Experience with modeling and simulation of explosive/energetic events
Safe handling practices for munitions and ordnance
Small arms handling, modification, armoring, gunsmithing
Experience with instrumentation for characterizing properties of energetic materials (e.g., DSC/TGA, bomb calorimetry, etc.)
Experience with flash X-ray and high-rate data capture (video, audio, pressure, electrical)
Experience with leading DOD contracted efforts including DFARS, IDIQ, and OTA contracted research
Explosives formulation, synthesis, handling, and passivation, including military, commercial, and improvised explosives
Experience with aerosol generation/measurement, sampling, characterization, air pollution analysis, and/or spray systems.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members. No statement herein is intended to imply any authorities to commit Battelle unless special written permission is granted by Battelle’s Legal Department.

BENEFITS

Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.

Battelle provides employment and opportunities for advancement, compensation, training, and growth according to individual merit, without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, age, genetic information, disability, veteran-status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable Federal, state, or local law. Our goal is for each staff member to have the opportunity to grow to the limits of their abilities and to achieve personal and organizational objectives. We will support positive programs for equal treatment of all staff and full utilization of all qualified employees at all levels within Battelle.

For more information about our other openings, please visit www.battelle.org/careers",3.3,"Battelle
3.3","West Jefferson, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1929,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
29,"Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing",-1,"Job Purpose*
Canventa has a new role for a Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing to provide scientific expertise for the development of multiple product lines for iPSC and iPSC derived differentiated cell types at Canventa Life Sciences. This role guides development strategies for diverse product portfolios and advances Canventa’s long-term success in current and emerging markets through product and technological innovation. This scientist drives collaborations both internally and externally to facilitate development of cutting edge products and scalable manufacturing processes.

Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for providing advanced scientific expertise for multiple product lines with particular emphasis on iPSCs, iPSC-derived cell types, organoids, and other culture-derived cell products.
Responsible for submitting new product proposals, setting performance criteria, experimental design, project planning, product optimization, and product launch .
Resolve complex scientific and technical investigations for cross-team and cross-functional operational activities.
Execute on department and corporate goals, projects and/or initiatives with the required stakeholders and subject matter experts. Contributes to the 5 - 10 year strategic plan.
Working closely with the Strategic Marketing and Marketing teams, participate in all aspects of the product lifecycle management and identify future trends to meet customer needs.
Evaluate new technologies, literature and patents independently, generate intellectual property, and respond to patent office actions with the Business Development Team; draft patent applications.
Identify and execute multiple product and process improvement projects including cost reduction and risk mitigation initiatives; responsible for initiating cost reduction projects.
Manage the assigned project research budget and report on monthly status updates.
Generate, review and approve technical documentation and provide pre- and post-product launch support.
Proactively research and analyze competitor activities, threats, and trends, and recommend new product development ideas to counter potential competitor threats.
Serve as a scientific ambassador of the company: i) deliver superior quality presentations to internal and external audiences; ii) promote the Canventa brand and mission; iii) facilitate and strengthen successful relationships with external experts at all levels.
Adhere to the Quality Management System (QMS) initiatives and requirements.
Proactively report and present on the product lifecycle activities to senior leaders across the company. Responsible for Executive reporting on corporate initiatives as needed.
Lead, manage, coach and mentor a cross-functional team to meet the deliverables and increase team productivity.
Qualifications
PhD with 4-8 years of relevant experience in iPSC generation, maintenance, differentiation and cell characterization.
Experience in creating master cell banks and cryopreservation is an asset.
Additional expertise in primary cell/ organoid/ organ tissue culture is an asset.
Additional experience in high-throughput screening, drug screening, disease modeling, or experience with bioreactor cultures is an asset.
Accomplished independent researcher with product, methodology, and/or technology development experience.
Proven record of complex experimental design and execution, including expertise in applying appropriate statistical analyses in complex data sets.
Broad technical expertise and knowledge of diverse laboratory techniques. Proven experience training staff on laboratory techniques and protocols.
Expert presenter with the ability to deliver technical summaries of data with critical thinking skills to provide in-depth analytical explanations and interpretations.
Managed successful collaborations with key opinion leaders.
Demonstrated expertise drafting business plans, patent applications, and related articles in the field of expertise.
Excellent communication skills (verbal, written and presentation) both in one-on-one and in group settings.
Personal Attributes
Ability to question and not always be satisfied with the status quo.
Willingness to learn and assume new responsibilities.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Self-motivated and independent work ethic.
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a fast paced environment.
Strives in a growing and changing environment.
Team orientated – ‘one-team’ behavior with demonstrated team leadership capabilities is a must.
Canventa Life Sciences is a company focused on the collection and processing of donated blood and bone marrow specimens into samples that are immediately used by researchers worldwide, increasing access to biologically relevant samples and accelerating the pace of research.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
All office and lab staff have access to plastic barriers, gloves, eye protection, masks, hand sanitizers, soap & water, and lab coats.

Experience:
Staff Training: 1 year (Preferred)
Cryopreservation: 1 year (Preferred)
laboratory: 4 years (Required)
Presentation Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Cell culture: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.Canventa.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/canventa/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Canventa Life Sciences,"Emeryville, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
30,R & D Scientist,$83k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"R&D Scientists apply the scientific method in one or more disciplines (e.g., Photogrammetry, Geodesy, Computer Science, Mathematics, Image Science, Human Terrain Analysis) to advance Geospatial Science and enhance Agency tradecraft. They conduct and develop novel scientific research projects and facilitate interdisciplinary collaboration to further scientific inquiry and application. They provide technical guidance and oversight, report results, and advise management on new and evolving technology. They address a variety of complex data-related analytical problems by applying quantitative and qualitative analytic methods.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Selected candidate will execute innovative research on automated exploitation of airborne, commercial, civil and other sources of radar data including but not limited to synthetic aperture radar (SAR) complex data related to NGA future radar processing and exploitation acquisition efforts. This position calls for extensive R&D experience in automation/machine learning using SAR data, RF Systems, Moving Target Indicator (MTI), and cross-sensor integration, which is key to the Agency achieving its strategic goals and mission imperatives. Duties also include a wide variety of cross-agency collaborations and Community leadership in radar R&D. Other duties may include: \* Lead a Radar research team in completing multiple projects \* Determine and define project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility. Manage execution of program/project cost/schedule/budget. \* Conceive of new start R&D activities and/or seedling concepts and seek internal/external funding sources. \* Maintain awareness of the state-of-the-art in radar technologies and communicate to leadership. \* Support requirements development, system verification, and concept of operations (CONOPS) development as well as working with system and mission analysts to ensure capabilities meet mission requirements \* Develop briefings and/or written reports that present complex issues and/or relevant analytic findings in an easily understandable way to a wide variety of audiences. \* Build and maintain professional relationships with other NGA offices and external partners to collaborate on effective GEOINT capabilities. \* Disseminate research findings to the broader DoD/IC communities. \* Possess the ability to think tactically and strategically and operate in a dynamic, fast-paced environment. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated experience as a subject matter expert in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and or Machine Learning (ML) (such as in Automatic Target Recognition (ATR) for radar applications, RF systems, RF in contested environments, and/or Moving Target Indictor (AMTI or GMTI) 2. Demonstrated experience in seedling new start R&D efforts (including idea conception, authoring and/or pitching proposals, and/or proposal execution utilizing the Heilmeier criteria) 3. Demonstrated experience in program management and execution (such as planning, resource allocation, risk identification & mitigation, and/or identifying transition partners) 4. Demonstrated experience in building and fostering strategic relationships between the IC, DOD, civil agencies, and academia (such as to coordinate integration of research technologies) EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Engineering, Mathematics, Physical Science, Computer Science, or a related discipline that includes 24 semester (36 quarter) hours in Mathematics, Science and/or a related Engineering Science such as Dynamics, Electronics, Mechanics, and Properties of Materials. Such coursework includes, but is not limited to, Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Programming, Data Mining, Cybersecurity, Geographic Information Systems, Remote Sensing, or Statistics. Although not mandatory, coursework in differential and integral calculus is preferred. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework as listed in option A, plus experience that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals to 4 years.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Doctoral degree in STEM 2. 15+ years' experience in the mandatory requirements 3. 10+ years' experience in a fast-paced R&D environment supporting contracts and programs of size, scope, and complexity similar to those at NGA Research 4. Experience in High Performance/Cloud Computing

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $142,701 - $170,800 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $142,701.00 - $170,800.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
31,"Data Scientist, Senior Level",$110k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Category: Data Scientist

Title: Data Scientist, Senior Level (50-277)

Location(s): Chantilly, VA

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with appropriate agency Polygraph

Salary: Maximum of $160,000/year

Geodata IT, a subsidiary of Freedom Consulting Group, is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist, in Chantilly, VA.

This position required a bachelor s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent and five to seven years of relevant work experience.

The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for producing innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. And applying knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to prototype development and product improvement. He or she needs to be able to use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data. You must have knowledge on generating and testing hypotheses and analyzing and interpreting the results of product experiments.

Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP is a plus. The ideal candidate will have experience in developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack and Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc. Excellent verbal and written communication and being a strong team player, capable of working collaboratively is required.

This position falls within the DoD 8570 baseline of IAT II. You must have an active TS/SCI and a CompTIA Security +. A copy of your certificate(s) will be required before you can be submitted for the position.

Geodata IT values quality and has an eye for unrecognized talent. Specialized knowledge will be given consideration when evaluating the years of experience requirement. We love coworkers that can bring forward new ideas to move the GIS community forward.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with an appropriate agency Polygraph is required

U.S. Citizenship is required

Applicant Federal & E-Verify Postings

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",4.4,"FREEDOM CONSULTING GROUP
4.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
32,Sr Principal Data Scientist,$150k-$239k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

OBJECTIVE:

The purpose of this position is to provide data science expertise in the following areas:

Understanding and effectively working with a wide variety of data sources, such as wearable device data (for example accelerometry and ECG), voice recordings, imaging data, electronic health records or social media postings. Gleaning insights from these datasets and accurately assessing their usefulness and limitations.
Applying a breadth of data science methodogies as needed for various projects and data types. Projects will require advanced analytical and statistical methods, such as statistical inference and modern methods for machine learning and AI.
Identifying and applying state-of-the-art data manipulation and analysis tools, in various programming languages, to develop bespoke analysis pipelines.
Independently designing studies, ranging from simple to more complex, and supporting all aspects of projects from data wrangling through to machine learning and statistical analysis.
Understanding how data science projects fit within Takeda’s preclinical and clinical efforts, with the goal of using data science to better understand the patient journey and to help us tailor interventions that maximize patient benefit.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Independently represent data science function on global project teams in support of pre-clincial and clinical studies and compound level programs.
Play a leadership role in the development and review of the study synopsis, protocol, statistical analysis plan, clinical study report, ensuring accurate and statistically valid deliverables.
Perform end-to-end data analyses, from hypotheses formulation, experimental design, writing analysis plans, data cleaning, executing analysis, and preparing reports and documentation.
Develop and support best data handling and data provenance practices utilizing reproducible, interpretable research approahces
Strengthen Takeda’s advanced analytics toolkit by identifying and applying emerging techniques, as well as by advancing the state of the art and developing novel analysis tools as needed.
Collaborate effectively within a matrix environment, with scientists in various therapeutic areas to understand disease biology and to identify or develop appropriate goals for data science work (for example identifying sensitive and specific endpoints for segmenting patient population, tracking disease progression, quantifying quality of life, etc.) as well as with with colleagues from pharmacology, chemistry, imaging, translational sciences, computational biology, experimental medicine
Work closely with Takeda statisticians to ensure statistical issues in data analysis are addressed as needed.
Anticipate and communicate internal and external resource and quality issues that may impact deliverables or timelines of the program. Propose and implement solutions. Escalate issues to management as appropriate in a timely manner.
Increase the internal impact of Takeda’s data science work by identifying opportunities across therapeutic areas.
Increase the external recognition of Takeda’s data science work by participating in conferences, publishing work and developing external collaborations.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:

Education in a relevant field, for example a) PhD in a field such as Biostatistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics with at least 6 years of experience and a clear interest in data science methods, or b) Master’s degree with at least 9 years of relevant experience
Expert-level knowledge of data science programming languages (Python and R, or similar) and experience with recommended practices for software development.
Signficant depth of expertise in at least one field relevant to the job (for example, machine learning, signal processing, etc.) and strong background in both supervised and unsupervised machine learning.
Ability to work independently on complicated datasets, including all aspects of data analysis (data cleaning, algorithm development, statistical analysis, and documentation).
Strongly prefer a working knowledge of UNIX operating systems, ideally with experience in high-performance computing environments.
Excellent oral and written communications skills.
Strong project management skills.
Willingness and ability to self-educate in new areas.
Strong collaborative skills and ability to work with a cross-functional team.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ability to sit and stand for long periods of time.
Carrying, handling and reaching for objects.
Ability to lift and carry over 25 pounds.
Manual dexterity to operate office equipment i.e. computers, phones, etc.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Access to transportation to attend various meetings held in proximity to the Takeda offices.
Able to fly to various meetings at investigator, vendor or regulatory agency sites.
Some international travel may be required.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
33,"Senior Data Scientist (Washington, D.C. or U.S. Remote)",$102k-$164k (Glassdoor Est.),"WalletHub, the #1 Personal Finance App in the US and one of Forbes’ Top 100 Best StartUp Employers in 2020, is rapidly growing and eager to add new members to our technical team. We’re looking for a highly skilled and motivated *Senior Data Scientist *for a full-time, permanent position.

The main objective of the Data Science Team is to improve WalletHub's services and core product. This has a direct impact on the overall user experience.

Making the right personal finance decisions by sifting through vast amounts of available information can be a daunting task for almost anyone. This is because a large number of interrelated factors need to be taken into account when making such decisions.

By designing and constructing data-driven models, the Data Science Team is able to provide our users with indispensable knowledge and meaningful advice on how they can achieve their personal finance goals.

Such goals include:
selecting the best financial products for your needs
taking the right actions to improve your credit score
anticipating your future financial health based on your current financial status and history
With these goals in mind, our Data Scientists use the latest cloud technologies and machine learning tools in order to exploit the potential of data analytics. We always have new and interesting projects on the horizon that aim to help our users reach their personal finance aspirations!
Responsibilities*
Modeling complex problems, discovering insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques
Participating in the areas of architecture, design, implementation, and testing
Proposing innovative ways to look at problems by using data mining approaches on the set of information available
Designing experiments, testing hypotheses, and building models
Conducting advanced data analysis and designing highly complex algorithm
Applying advanced statistical and predictive modeling techniques to build, maintain, and improve on multiple real-time decision systems
Qualifications*
You are the ideal candidate for this job if you have:
Min. 8 years experience in Python, MySQL (or any relational database) and Java (Spring)
Min. 5 years of experience as a Data Scientist
Experience with databases (including NoSQL)
Experience in machine learning frameworks and libraries
Supervised and Unsupervised learning
Machine learning concepts and techniques: Regularization, Boosting, Random Forests, Decision Trees, Bayesian models, Neural networks, Support Vector Machines (SVM)
Experience with the whole ETL data cycle (extract, validate, transform, clean, aggregate, audit, archive)
Computer Science or Mathematics or Physics degree
Excellent communication and analytical skills
Willingness to work hard (50 hrs per week)
Nice to have but not required*
Experience with Apache Spark
Natural Language Processing (tokenization, tagging, sentiment analysis, entity recognition, summarization)
R programming language
Compensation*
Very competitive salary based on prior experience and qualifications
Potential for stock options after the first year
Raise and advancement opportunities based on periodic evaluations
Health benefits (in case you will be working from our office in Washington, D.C.)
Visa sponsorship (in case you will be working from our office in Washington, D.C.)
Notes*
Although we appreciate your interest in working with us, due to the high number of applications we receive, we will only be able to respond to successful applicants.

Our company is CCPA compliant: https://wallethub.com/blog/ccpa-candidates/76644/.
More about WalletHub*
WalletHub is a high-growth fintech company based in Washington, DC that is looking for talented, hard-working individuals to help us reshape personal finance. More specifically, we are harnessing the power of data analytics and artificial intelligence to build the brain of a smart financial advisor, whose services we’re offering to everyone for free. The WalletHub brain enables users to make better financial decisions in a fraction of the time with three unique features:

1) *Customized Credit-Improvement Tips*: WalletHub identifies improvement opportunities and guides you through the necessary corrections.

2) *Personalized Money-Saving Advice*: WalletHub’s savings brain constantly scours the market for load-lightening opportunities, bringing you only the best deals.

3) *Wallet Surveillance*: Personal finance isn’t as scary with 24/7 credit monitoring providing backup, notifying you of important credit-report changes.

In addition to the valuable intelligence the brain provides, WalletHub is the first and only service to offer free credit scores and full credit reports that are updated on a daily basis absent of user interaction, rather than weekly or monthly and only when a user logs in. Some other services hang their hats on free credit scores and reports, yet they’re still inferior to what WalletHub considers minor pieces to a much larger puzzle.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Work Remotely:
Yes",3.8,"Wallethub
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
34,"Scientist, Autoimmunity",$74k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rubius Therapeutics is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing a new class of medicines called Red Cell Therapeutics™. Our proprietary RED PLATFORM® was designed to genetically engineer and culture Red Cell Therapeutics™ that are selective, potent and off-the-shelf allogeneic cellular therapies for the potential treatment of several diseases across multiple therapeutic areas. Our therapies can potentially be used to kill tumors in cancer and to regulate the immune system for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. We are currently enrolling patients in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial of RTX-240, an allogeneic cellular therapy for the treatment of patients with relapsed/refractory or locally advanced solid tumors or relapsed/refractory acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Additionally, we plan to file an IND for RTX-321 for the treatment of HPV-positive tumors by year-end.
We are proud of our passionate, high-performance culture – one based on a set of values that are the cornerstone of who we are and how we hold ourselves accountable. Founded in 2013, we are headquartered in Cambridge, MA, and our manufacturing facility in Smithfield, RI was named 2020 Top 5 Best Places to Work in Rhode Island among medium-sized companies by Providence Business News. We are currently expanding across all functions within the organization. Red blood cells are no longer just for carrying oxygen. Check us out at www.rubiustx.com, or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn or like us on Facebook.

Summary
We are looking for a Scientist to join our Autoimmune group to help drive key autoimmune programs. The candidate must be independent, goal oriented, technically competent and able to efficiently work across multiple projects. We are searching for enthusiastic, innovative, and highly motivated individuals, with deep scientific background in immunology, preferably autoimmune diseases, who are comfortable working in a fast-paced entrepreneurial environment.
Responsibilities
Work closely with a team of scientists in the Discovery teams to drive key autoimmune projects.
Design and execute experiments for non-routine in vitro immune assays, in vivo studies, and ex vivo assays.
Phenotyping immune populations, sample preparation for in vivo studies, sample analysis.
Independent data analysis and proper electronic notebook record keeping.
Communication of experimental plans and data to multiple cross-functional scientific teams.
Support the continued protection, creation, and expansion of company’s intellectual property.
Assist in maintaining a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture with a clear sense of urgency and focus on providing transformational therapies to patients.
Qualifications & Education
Ph.D. degree in biology, immunology, biochemistry, bioengineering or related discipline and 2+ years of relevant laboratory experience, pharmaceutical or biotechnology industry preferred.
Deep knowledge of immunology, preferably DC and T cell biology, and systematic approach to understanding inflammatory and tolerance molecular mechanisms.
Research background in autoimmune disease.
Strong experimental skills, including tissue culture, isolation and culture of primary immune cells, primary immune cell assays, flow cytometry, ELISA, and in vivo model development.
Passionate about working at the bench to independently contribute to research directions and solve challenging issues.
Detail oriented, self-motivated, and comfortable working with highly technical projects and personnel.
Ability to work on multiple projects simultaneously and deliver conclusive results.
Highly adaptable and responsive to delivering for challenging commitments.
Effective written and oral communication skills.
Team oriented with strong work ethic.
EEO Statement: Rubius Therapeutics is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
Recruitment & staffing agencies: Rubius Therapeutics does not accept agency resumes unless contacted directly by internal Rubius Talent Acquisition. Please do not forward resumes to our careers@rubiustx.com account, Rubius employees or any other company location; Rubius Therapeutics is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.7,"Rubius Therapeutics
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
35,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst - Cost and Utilization Analysis,$53k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst is responsible for providing analysis and recommendations regarding the Utilization and Cost of Behavioral Health Services at Community Behavioral Health.This position will provide analysis of based on Budget to Actual utilization and PMPM of services as well as coordinate with various departments including Finance, Data Informatics, Clinical and Provider Network Management in the determination of recommendations regarding Utilization and Cost findings.

Essential Functions:

·Coordinate with various CBH teams and departments through effective communication, report generation, solution development and team building.

·Provide or work with various departments to provide, and present various complex financial analyses and reports to Utilization Management Committee, the Clinical, Finance and Network Operations Departments.

·Maintain, modify and create SQL code used for financial analysis and reports.

·Identify, research and bring to resolution any issues with the financial data and reports.

·Develop detailed financial projections.

·Review monthly Quality Assurance Reports prior to issuance to Finance Executive Staff.

·Coordinate the processing of compliance claims adjustments and reporting results to the Compliance Department.

·Development of Value Based Contracting Models and Evaluation of Value Based Contracting.

Position Requirements:

·Education: Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Accounting, Economics or Mathematics

·License/Certification: N/A

·Relevant Work Experience: Minimum of 5 years of experience in financial forecasting and analysis

·Skills:

·Extensive knowledge of Microsoft Office applications

·Proficient in using SQL, including querying and troubleshooting

·Thorough understanding of data manipulations and reconciliation

·Excellent analytical skills

·Excellent interpersonal and verbal and written communication skills

·Able to work independently",3.2,"Community Behavioral Health
3.2","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
36,Data Scientist/Future Pricing Strategy,$88k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are

Our vision is to create technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere every person, every organization, and every community around the globe. This motivates us inspires us to do what we do. To make what we make. To invent, and to reinvent. To engineer experiences that amaze. We wont stop pushing ahead, because you wont stop pushing ahead. Youre reinventing how you work. How you play. How you live. With our technology, youll reinvent your world

What we offer
Exciting experience with data sciences and analytics hottest topics: HPs Analytics team is covering a wide range of exciting, fast-growing and business critical areas such as: Big data SKU level pricing (in a space of millions of transactions), SEM/Display optimization in the worlds leading channels platforms (e.g. Google, Amazon, JD) and predictive analytics in the area of sales management (which accounts to target, with what offer )
Career building platform- HPs analytics team has a large and global footprint across the world offering many possibilities to advance ones career
International, collaborative and dynamic team - We are a very dynamic, highly skilled and diverse global team consisting of economists, consultants, marketers, statisticians, engineers, scientists or even musicians united by the passion to create impact using technology
Position overview

In this position you would get the chance to
Shape HPs future of how we price and introduce new products
Develop and apply statistical methods and experimentation to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Collaborate and work closely with our internal business teams to drive action
Present results and recommendations to relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
About you:
You have deep interests in pricing, business strategy, and consumer behaviour
You are passionate about unveiling answers to most difficult questions using data and models
You feel accomplished seeing your recommendations being implemented while shopping for yourself
You cant stop thinking about learning something new every day and enjoy being surrounded by highly talented people
Requirements:

Must-haves:
At least 2 years working experience in data science in a business setting
Experience interacting with stakeholders and translating business questions to models
Ability to deploy, interpret, and troubleshoot linear regression models
Working understanding of causal inference methods
Proficiency with R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication for technical and non-technical audiences
Ability to think creatively and invent original solutions to business and modelling challenges
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Bonus points for:
Understanding of finance and product economics
Experience in deploying data science in a retail environment
Experience in designing, deploying, and analyzing in-market experiments and/or AB tests
Master's or PhD degree in Quantitative Marketing, Business, Statistics, Economics, Psychology, or other relevant quantitative discipline",4.1,"HP Inc.
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
37,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
38,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,$74k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
39,Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consultants,$33k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Language Assessment Division of the Center for Applied Linguistics has occasional need for qualified consultants to work with the Psychometrics and Quantatitive Research team. We accept CVs from professionals with Master’s degrees in statistics or other fields with strong quantitative content, or with PhDs in educational measurement. We also accept CVs from PhD candidates.

Consultants may be tasked with completing analyses, replicating analyses for quality control purposes, or supporting the production of technical reports.

Essential skills include experience producing analyses in a professional setting using SPSS and R. Desired skills also include experience with Rasch analysis and DIF analysis. Experience with language assessment is also a plus.

Application Process
Email a CV and cover letter indicating your experience with the skills listed above to jobs@cal.org, with the subject line: Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consulting.
CAL will add your information to our files and contact you as consulting opportunities arise that meet your qualifications.

For any additional questions or comments, please contact us at jobs@cal.org.",2.8,"Center for Applied Linguistics
2.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
40,Data Analyst,$43k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Develop, implement, and maintain leading-edge analytic systems, taking complicated problems and building simple frameworks
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate organizational methods and provide source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Create best-practice reports based on data mining, analysis, and visualization
Evaluate internal systems for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Work directly with management and users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Define and implement data and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible or scalable across data sets (1.) Suggest design solutions (2.) To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements. (3.) To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage. (4.) To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.) To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.

Required Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree in a related field and 2 years’ experience in Business Intelligence (BI) or Data Warehouses and 2 years’ experience working with SQL and Access. Four additional years of related experience will be considered in lieu of a Bachelor's degree.
5 years experience in quantitative analysis and statistical modeling (regression, correlation, clustering, etc.).
4 year of experience consulting or experience in a similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery.
3 years experience using analytics tools and languages R, Python, SAS, Oracle and SQL etc.
3 years experience combining data sets, extracting key variables, and creating new variables to enhance modeling.
3 years experience performing basic ETL functions and understanding of data quality steps/measures.
US Citizen; no dual citizenship.
Minimum of a Secret Interim clearance to start (Day 1 requirement).
CompTIA Security+ certification required to start (Day 1 requirement).
Adept at using Access, Excel, Power Point and Word.
General Data Warehouse / Business Intelligence knowledge including data modeling and Key Performance Indicators (PKIs) preferably in the SAP Business Objects environment.
AWS experience highly desired

#ind#

CDO is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.4,"CDO Technologies Inc
3.4","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
41,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Join a small, dynamic data-warehouse (DWH) team responsible for providing detailed documentation for the development of the company’s Data Warehouse. This position is not just a technical position, but a marketing/consumer/business person with strong analytical skill set. Must be hands on in this analytical role, with strong SQL skillset.

· Experience with use of data warehouse tables and operational data, to effectively write and modify SQL queries of moderate to difficult complexity.

· Support data analytic requests by gathering and documenting report requirements, validating the data, and presenting results to end customer. For involved data-extracts and reports – to precisely specify requests at a detailed field-level.

· Partner with IT, Marketing, Finance, Ecommerce, Inventory Planning, Executive team, and Merchandising for AmeriMark and Dr. Leonard’s to the information needed in order to solve business problems.

· Work with data warehouse developers to organize data in ways that will allow for more effective and accurate analysis.

· Work with IT teams to help support and troubleshoot data integrity issues utilizing the data warehouse. Work as the liaison between IT and Marketing to support internal software program.

· Develop and monitor on demand and Adhoc reports using Excel, SSRS, and SQL Server. Establish a sense of ownership of new and existing stored procedures and automated SSRS and legacy reports that are being utilized by the business.

· Become familiar with the tables and complex logic that was created to support the Analytic Data Mart load process and business rules.

· Run weekly Financial analyses of unit contribution considering various costs, scenario analysis for Finance and Marketing departments reports to management.

· Assist Marketing with financials to create factors based on prior year performance for completing their future Catalog budget plans.
Job Requirements*
· BA/BS degree or equivalent in customer science (or comparable) Database programming certification or equivalent is also acceptable.

· Advanced T-SQL skills (3+ Years)

· Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) or similar BI-reporting and dash boarding tools (Power BI, Tableau) – both from a report-design perspective and from hands-on delivery/refinement to end user needs.

· Data manipulation, transformation, and automation using SQL to transform files from outside vendor for very complex holdout (A/B) test scenarios.

· Complex problem-solving skills and ability to work with large amounts of data.

· Multi-dimensional cube (SSAS) experience a plus to support Merchandising who is utilizing the tool.

· Keep up to date documentation for all business requests and processes and data warehouse tables in modern data dictionary.

· Experienced in communication with peers and senior management.

· Strong computer skills in Excel and Microsoft Office Suite. Excellent mathematical skills.

· Strong work ethic.

· Good organization skills required. Ability to multitask and establish sense of urgency for challenging problems.

· Experience with catalog/direct mail industry, multi-channel selling, catalog planning and execution processes, merchandise management, promotion, design and reading of basic A/B market tests and test with varied factors, as well as development of key customer KPI’s is desirable.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
T-SQL: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Cleveland, OH 44130 (Required)
Application Question:
Are you local to the Cleveland area? Relocation may not be available for this position.
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.2,"AmeriMark Direct
2.2","Cleveland, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Other Retail Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
42,"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development",$86k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development
Location: Bedford, MA
Homology Medicines is seeking an outstanding Senior Scientist to assist in the advancement of viral gene therapy production processes for novel adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The individual in this role will be a highly-skilled, talented and motivated researcher who will lead the work to develop and characterize next generation plasmids for large scale manufacturing of AAV vectors. We seek candidates with proven ability to work independently and collaboratively who are driven to pursue cutting edge science and develop next generation therapies to transform the lives of patients.
Essential Functions and Duties
Design, development, and characterization of novel plasmids for AAV production using molecular and cell-based assays
Analyze vector specific characteristics including packaging efficiency and product quality, as impacted by packaging and inverted terminal repeat (ITR) plasmid and integrity
Advance technical understanding and development of critical parameters in mammalian cell culture production systems for AAV vectors
Collaborate closely with analytical characterization team to evaluate critical vector attributes and process performance parameters for AAV vector production
Lead a team of research associate and scientist completing assigned tasks and serve as scientific mentor to overseeing laboratory experimentation and data analysis
Author technical reports and technology transfer documents as needed
Skills and Experience
PhD or MS in molecular biology, virology, or related fields with 4+ (PhD) or 6+ (MS) years industry experience in viral vector production
Expertise in molecular cloning techniques preferably with AAV/ITR experience
Thorough understanding of virus characterization methods including nucleic acid and protein-based approaches
Familiarity with using lab-scale production platforms including adherent cell systems, shake flasks, and bioreactors for live virus or viral vector production
Adept at conducting routine testing and limited troubleshooting of multiple methods
Independently motivated, detail oriented, and good problem-solving ability
Excellent interpersonal written and oral communication skills
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line: www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
43,Data Engineer,-1,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
44,Data Analyst,$60k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What Youll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
allspark

BITS3

Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
45,Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations,$139k-$219k (Glassdoor Est.),"Guild is hiring a Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations. As the Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations you will partner with our leaders across the business and lead a team of data scientists to improve our students' Guild experience.

As Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations, you will:
Partner with stakeholders across the organization to identify opportunities to use data science solutions to drive improved outcomes.
Manage large-scale projects and prioritize the team's workload to ensure effective delivery and implementation of solutions which drive our strategies forward.
Work closely with Operations leadership to translate business needs and problems into analyses. This could include uncovering a problem, identifying data sources to quantify the problem, synthesizing findings and solutions, analyzing the business case and tradeoffs, and managing the implementation of recommendations.
Develop frameworks, approaches, solutions and recommendations that effectively and efficiently address the most impactful opportunities and challenges for Guild's Operations teams.
Lead a world-class team of analysts who are responsive to our business partners' needs, and are capable of working with data, performing complex analyses, and developing recommendations and strategies which drive our business forward.
Use data to tell a story, effectively explaining analytical findings and technical solutions to business partners.
Act as a thought partner to data scientists, helping to formulate analytical plans, prioritize initiatives, and operationalize the results of learnings from complex analyses, including A/B testing, NLP, segmentation, and other predictive models.
In this role you will report to Beth Hegland and collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Kevin Chan-A-Shing, Mae Podesta, Josh Hadden-Leggett, and Terrence Cummings.

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
8+ years of experience in an analytics/data science environment
5+ years managing high-performing technical and analytical teams
Strong technical and analytical skills, with high attention to detail and accuracy.
Strong experience with SQL, as well as Excel/Google Sheets, BI Tools (Looker a plus)
Ability to work cross-functionally to advocate for data science solutions, develop roadmaps, and ensure effective prioritization of analytical resources.
Extreme comfort presenting to and interacting with senior leaders, with the ability to win over strong personalities and reconcile competing points of view through data-driven storytelling
Preferred Competencies:
Familiarity with Operations teams in a sales or CRM environment
Proven business experience with a scripting language like Python or R
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,"Guild Education
3.5","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
46,BUSINESS ANALYTICS CONSULTANT - FINANCE,-1,"Overview:

Job Description
Type of Opportunity: Full Time
FTE: 1.000000
Exempt: Yes
Work Schedule: Days

Summary:
Support portfolio management of reporting/analytics solutions across the business units in the analytics organization. Identify business issues/problems, form hypotheses, plan and conduct interviews, whiteboard sessions & perform reporting/analysis to synthesize conclusions, transform them into recommendations and develop a solution. Lead and manage small cross functional team to implement, test and deploy the approved reporting/analytics solution in response to the business (clinical/operational/financial) needs. Identify reporting/analytics improvement opportunities and provide proactive, consultative strategic solutions. Responsible for mentoring junior analysts as well as coordinating various reporting/analytics initiatives with end business users. Support reporting/analytics projects prioritization and planning as well as cconduct due diligence concerning business implications of planned solutions.

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities:
Consultation and Communication:
Ability to collaborate and partner with management, project managers, and IT to develop, implement and manage reporting/analytics portfolio with the vision & goals of specific Hub/Spoke core teams
Effective communication skills across the organization and at different levels, strategic thinking and actions to influence key stakeholders and business decisions
Support day-to-day consultation to business users and participate and contribute cross-functional project teams
Work with business stakeholders to identify business needs and support creation of the use cases and user stories satisfying those needs
Project Management and Execution:
Coordinate with other departments across the AO such as IM governance & EDW and support conceptualization and development of reporting/analytical methodologies, solutions and initiatives
Aid in the development of project plans and strategies as well as execute assigned project plans to deliver solutions in a timely manner
Support collaboration on roadmaps, dependencies, and execution plans across analytical units and with applicable teams in the organization
Manage the intake requests across the business units; track and monitor the work to ensure critical milestones are met, identify and report/escalate risks to management appropriately; manage stakeholder relations
Obtain data, direct/execute reporting/analysis, perform interpretations and conclusions, and prepare recommendations.
Assist in determining business needs by effectively conducting fact-finding interviews and leveraging various tools and analytical methods and then summarize findings in a coherent manner to develop and propose appropriate solution
Conduct research studies that include collecting data from various sources, analyzing, trending and presenting the findings and recommendations to management
Support translation of business requirements and unstructured business issues into data analytic problems
Perform overall program evaluations (i.e., planning-implementation-completion/analysis-reporting) and other assessments such as change management assessments, workflow optimization assessments, etc.
Training and Guidance:
Manage and support teams to structure data and analysis to analyze issues and proactively identify improvement opportunities
Responsible for the work flow management of analysts and ensuring reliability, integrity, and timeliness of end products
Support coordination of training for analysts in core and expanded business department
Thought Leadership:
Support in development of presentations/publications/point-of-views with senior leadership within the AO
Contribute towards and assist senior leadership in developing a year-end value story to demonstrate value of the team and their contribution to progress towards the AOs and PHSs goals
Qualifications:

Preferred Qualifications:

Health Plan/Finance Experience
Strong Communicator
SAS/SQL Coding Experience

Other information:
SKILLS: Bachelors degree in a quantitative, business, or healthcare related subject. A Masters degree is highly preferred. Four or more years of combined experience in business intelligence, reporting and analytics preferably in a healthcare setting. Demonstrated project management skills as well as the ability to efficiently work and manage teams and resources. Experience working on complex analytical projects with diverse teams and developing data driven and outcome based initiatives to improve business decision making and operational efficiencies. Knowledge of health plan and delivery system operations, health care informatics, and healthcare benefits and terminology (e.g., care management). Understanding of operations in the Health Care industry and a strong acumen of business processes, including operations, delivery models and revenue models. Understanding of program evaluation life cycle, predictive modeling, data mining, and clinical best practices preferred. Content knowledge related to program outcomes evaluation, BI tools (e.g., BO), data visualizations tools (e.g., Tableau), statistical software such as SAS and Modeling techniques, as well as general health service research and outcomes reporting/analytics. Working knowledge of healthcare industry and healthcare information standards such as HL7, LOINC, FHIR, ICD 9/10 and CPT codes, industry standard groupers (e.g., ETGs, DRGs, DCGs, etc.) as well as of health care delivery system processes. Excellent written and oral communications is a MUST.

Competencies and skills:
Essential:
SKILL-Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively in person and via telephone with members, employer groups, brokers, physicians, and physician office staff using strong dialogue and customer service competencies.
SKILL-Written communication
Nonessential:
Analytics skills
SKILL-Decision Making
SKILL-Project management methods and tools in support of managing Scope, Time, Cost, Quality, Communication, Risk, and Procurement Management;
Benefits:

Benefits
Benefits are effective day-one (for .45 FTE and above) and include:

Competitive salaries
Full medical, dental and vision insurance
Flexible spending accounts (FSAs)
Free wellness programs
Paid time off (PTO)
Retirement plans, including matching employer contributions
Continuing education and career development opportunities
Life insurance and short/long term disability programs

About Us
Presbyterian Healthcare Services is a locally owned, not-for-profit healthcare system of nine hospitals, a statewide health plan and a growing multi-specialty medical group. Founded in New Mexico in 1908, it is the state's largest private employer with approximately 11,000 employees.

Presbyterian's story is really the story of the remarkable people who have chosen to work here. Starting with Reverend Cooper who began our journey in 1908, the hard work of thousands of physicians, employees, board members, and other volunteers brought Presbyterian from a tiny tuberculosis sanatorium to a statewide healthcare system, serving more than 700,000 New Mexicans.

We are part of New Mexico's history - and committed to its future. That is why we will continue to work just as hard and care just as deeply to serve New Mexico for years to come.

About New Mexico
New Mexico's unique blend of Spanish, Mexican and Native American influences contribute to a culturally rich lifestyle. Add in Albuquerque's International Balloon Fiesta, Los Alamos' nuclear scientists, Roswell's visitors from outer space, and Santa Fe's artists, and you get an eclectic mix of people, places and experiences that make this state great.

Cities in New Mexico are continually ranked among the nation's best places to work and live by Forbes magazine, Kiplinger's Personal Finance, and other corporate and government relocation managers like Worldwide ERC.

New Mexico offers endless recreational opportunities to explore, and enjoy an active lifestyle. Venture off the beaten path, challenge your body in the elements, or open yourself up to the expansive sky. From hiking, golfing and biking to skiing, snowboarding and boating, it's all available among our beautiful wonders of the west.

AA/EOE/VET/DISABLED. PHS is a drug-free and tobacco-free employer with smoke free campuses.

KM123",3.6,"Rev Hugh Cooper Admin Center
3.6","Albuquerque, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,1908,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
47,Data Analyst,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Data Analyst to work with product and business teams to find key metrics, monitor data quality/consistency, help identify problems, and propose data driven solutions. The analyst should have in-depth experience with SQL reporting and building dashboards, as well as be a self-starter who is curious and detailed in their problem-solving approach. This job will require heavy reporting in SQL Server.

Requirements
Create and maintain complex SQL reporting for product and business teams as well as external clients.
Create Health Check metrics for monitoring data quality and consistency.
Design and build automated reporting dashboards on our FoundryBI platform.
Use statistical analysis to generate clear and effective recommendations.
Proactively analyze data for key insights and metrics.
Ability to understand business operations as a whole and translate questions into effective analysis based on the goals behind the specified task.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree with a minimum GPA of 3.5 in Computer Science or a related field of study.
1-4 years of experience writing optimized and reusable SQL code.
Knowledgeable in either R or Python preferred.
Experience with performance tuning and query optimization.
Benefits

When you join Softheon, you will:
Have an opportunity to add value to a diverse team of innovative professionals
Rise to new challenges everyday
Receive competitive salary and career growth opportunities",4.4,"Softheon
4.4","Stony Brook, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
48,Business Intelligence Analyst I,$38k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"GreenState Credit Union

Business Intelligence Analyst I

US-IA-North Liberty

Job ID: 2020-2559
Type: Regular Full-Time
# of Openings: 1
Category: Information Technology
GreenState Credit Union

Overview

The Business Intelligence Analyst I is responsible for development, summarizing and presenting financial and business information to the credit union team from various reporting environments such as our database and data warehouse, financial ledger systems and 3rd party environments. With general and specific guidance, the BIA will conduct and present financial analysis and utilize data to identify process gaps and help implement master data management processes.

Salary range for this position is $71,379 - $107,068.50 with a progressive benefits package.

Responsibilities

Performs essential duties and responsibilities in the following areas which may include, but are not limited to those listed and are subject to change:

Adheres to the Credit Union's core values and Service Standards in carrying out GreenState's mission and vision.
Demonstrates teamwork in all interactions with coworkers and in the completion of all duties and responsibilities.
Ensures confidentiality of member information.
Presents a professional image from a personal and professional level that will be beneficial to both the Credit Union and GreenState Wealth Management.
Works with stakeholders to develop and/or modify reporting or processes to resolve simple business problems by using IT solutions, includes analysis of business and user needs, documenting business requirements and translating business requirements into functional solutions.
Develops reports, visualizations, and custom extracts using business intelligence tools including, but not limited to SQL Server Management Studio, Episys PowerOn, SQL Server Reporting Services, R, Python, Excel Power Query and Power BI.
Develops stored procedures, views, custom tables, and defined business rules for reporting and analytic solutions. Develop a combination of simple to complex SQL queries to fulfill stakeholder’s requests.
Evaluates and works to improve the capabilities of Business Intelligence tools through new methodologies, technology, and data management. Review reports to improve accuracy, functionality, and consistency.
Integrates data sources from multiple systems to provide seamless reporting. Understand database relationships and interconnections among data sources. Maintain and enhance data integrity of all information connection through the Data Warehouse.
Analyzes data extracted from the database and validate accuracy of data and collaborates with other Power BI Pros within the organization to resolve data integrity issues.
Assists in the coaching and development of Power BI Pros throughout the organization.

Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, Management Information Systems or related field, or equivalent combination of training and experience of at least six years, with three years of experience in report creation.
Proficiency in business intelligence tools such as SQL, Qlik, SSRS, R, Python, Excel Power Query and Power BI.
Ability to work with multiple data sources and validate accuracy of information.
Basic understanding of data modeling to assist DBA in development of new source data models to align with existing DW.
Inquisitive nature for data discovery and aligning solutions to business needs.
Ability to prioritize and organize a wide variety of assignments and duties and large volumes of details.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Experience in the financial industry a plus but not required.
Interpersonal skills to promote and represent the credit union and its products.
Must be able and willing to work a flexible schedule as needed to accomplish all duties.

Reporting Relationship
Reports to the Business Intelligence Director.

Supervisory Responsibilities
This position is not responsible for supervision of other employees.

Equal Opportunity Employment Statement
GreenState Credit Union is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

PI124654057",3.7,"GreenState Credit Union
3.7","North Liberty, IA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1938,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
49,Senior Data Analyst,$81k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Company:
Industrious is the largest premium workplace provider in the U.S. with nearly 100 locations in more than 50 U.S. cities. Its Workplace Experience platform, which pairs thoughtfully-designed spaces with hospitality-driven services and amenities, has reshaped the concept of coworking into a scalable solution for companies of all sizes and stages. Since its founding in 2013, Industrious has helped thousands of companies scale their businesses while maintaining the highest NPS scores in the industry. For more information, visit www.industriousoffice.com.
As we shape the future of workplace experience, we're looking for motivated, thoughtful, and collaborative people who are excited to join a high-growth, warm, and welcoming team. For more information, please visit www.industriousoffice.com/careers.

About the Role:
As the Data Analyst at Industrious, you are responsible for building the data-models that underpin our analytics and reporting. You have a flexible skillset: someone who is adept with SQL code, is experienced in ad-hoc data-modeling, and can partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse.

This is an amazing role for a curious, analytical mind who is excited to touch all elements of the business and lay the foundation for analytics and insights.

You are a great fit for this role if:
You are eager to sit at the intersection of technology and analysis
You are an independent operator who can build from the ground up
Data engineering? Data analysis? Data science? You want to work with all three pieces of the analytics cycle
Responsibilities:
Partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse
Develop the Redshift/Snowflake models that underpin our analytics and reporting
Serve as the bridge between our Analytics and Technology teams
Requirements:
Very strong SQL skills (preferably Postgresql)
Experience creating ad-hoc databases (e.g., using DBT or equivalent)
Experience transforming and analyzing large datasets
Demonstrated ability to learn new technologies and techniques
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science, Mathematics or similarly quantitative/technical field
Experience in analytics or a technical field
Preferred qualifications:
Experience with Data Lakes (e.g., (Redshift/Snowflake preferred) and proven ability to produce scalable solutions
Experience with connectors (e.g., FiveTran, Stitch)
Experience with visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Looker)
Experience working in a cloud-based environment (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google-Cloud)

Perks:

In addition to our incredible team, there are lots of other fun reasons to work with us.
Daily breakfast, snacks, coffee, tea, and drinks at all Industrious locations
Health care, including vision and dental
401K plan
Generous vacation time
Paid parental leave
Industrious in the News:
Industrious CEO Sees Company as Less Risky Than WeWork
Industrious' Jamie Hodari on the Return to Work
Coworking Spaces Prepare To Welcome People Back, Expect the Industry To Grow
Industrious is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. Industrious believes that diversity is critical to our success in delivering great workplace experiences and is committed to creating an inclusive, mutually respectful environment which celebrates diversity of our people. We seek to hire on the basis of merit, competence, performance, and business needs.

#LI-LC1",3.6,"Industrious
3.6","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Membership Organizations,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
50,2021 Data Science Fellowship,$89k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"2021 Data Science Fellowship
Department


Human Resources

Location


Alexandria, VA

Closing Date

1/29/21

Apply Now

Overview

The Institute for Defense Analyses (IDA) is a not-for-profit corporation that operates three Federally Funded Research Centers (FFRDCs). IDA’s Systems and Analyses Center is located in Alexandria, Virginia and is comprised of eight research divisions providing objective analyses of national security issues, particularly those requiring scientific and technical expertise, and conducts related research on other national challenges.

The IDA Data Science Fellowship provides recent graduates a unique opportunity to develop and apply data science skills to important issues in national security. Data Science Fellows will investigate the ways machine learning, artificial intelligence, statistics, and big data methodologies contribute to national security and gain experience developing advanced data science tools They will use their critical thinking and analytic skills to work on challenging real-world national security issues. In a collaborative team environment, Fellows perform data manipulation and statistical, econometric, predictive, descriptive, and other quantitative analyses to answer national security-related research questions. Fellows should expect to learn while creatively contributing to interdisciplinary project teams.

Fellows will have an opportunity to work research questions in areas such as:
Appraisal of current DoD investments in a broad range of areas: from human factors to autonomous systems, from materials science to nuclear weapons effects, from social behaviors to quantum computing;
Analyze and research questions on DoD personnel, military readiness and efficacy, and organizational efficiency topics.
Assessment of federal agency information and computing architectures that support data science applications (i.e., large, distributed data sets and computational assets);
Application of data exploration, text analytics, forecasting, statistical inference, simulation to areas of military personnel, manpower, and acquisition of DOD weapon systems.
Over the course of the three-year program, fellowship experiences will include:
Involvement in workshops and discussions on relevant topics
Mentorship from members of the IDA research staff
Training on specific analytical methods and tools
Attendance and presentation at select professional society meetings
Qualifications
This is a full time position and is only open to recent recipients of a bachelor’s or master’s degree. Candidates with degrees higher than a master’s degree will not be considered.
Candidate with recent Bachelor’s degree or Masters’ degree in economics, statistics, operations research, mathematics, physics, computer science, data science, or related disciplines with a strong foundation in statistics and/or applied mathematics are encouraged to apply.
Candidates must demonstrate experience with one or more programming language or statistical software used in research (e.g., Python, R, Julia, Stata, MATLAB, C, Java, etc.)
Candidates must demonstrate strong written and oral communication skills. Ideal candidates are able to contribute to and support team efforts.
Additional preferred skills include:
Training and/or experience in quantitative or qualitative information collection, data normalization, and text analytics
Experience as a research assistant in an academic or policy research setting
Experience or coursework in Bayesian statistics, machine learning, predictive analytics, and/or geospatial analyses
Experience with GPU, high-throughput, and/or distributed computing
U.S. citizenship is required.
In addition to the application, applicants at later stages in the process will be required to submit the following documents:
Personal Statement— explain in 1,000 words or less why you want to work in the area of data science and analytics in defense and national security and how your background/experience will contribute to IDA’s work
Writing Sample—5,000 word maximum
Transcripts - unofficial transcript is acceptable for consideration, but an official transcript is needed before any offer of employment will be made
Two Letters of Academic Recommendation—letters must be signed by the individual rendering the reference and delivered as PDF files.
U.S. Citizenship is required
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance is required
Equal Opportunity Employer",4.1,"Institute for Defense Analyses
4.1","Alexandria, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1956,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
51,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics",$145k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.8,"Livongo
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
52,Software Engineer - Data Science,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
53,"Assistant Director, Data Stewardship",$34k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Requisition Number 20-0025
Post Date 9/22/2020
Title Assistant Director, Data Stewardship
City Washington
State DC
Description Title: Assistant Director, Data Stewardship
Position Type: Full-Time (Two-Year Term)
Location: Washington, DC

What we do and offer our team

AGU is a global community of 118,000 Earth and space scientists, advocates and experts. As the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship, you will be part of a dynamic association that publishes peer-reviewed journals and scientific books and convenes the largest Earth and space science meeting in the world. Through our initiatives, such as mentoring, professional development and awards, AGU upholds and fosters an inclusive and diverse scientific community.

AGU offers our employees great benefits, including flexible work schedules, retirement savings options, as well as health, dental, life and disability insurance. AGU also provides exciting opportunities for professional development and tuition support.

AGU’s Workplace Values

We believe in accountability and ownership of work, by taking responsibility for decisions and results. We believe in member and customer service, and that they come first through providing high quality service.

We believe in excellence and giving it our all, through striving to be outstanding. We believe in integrity by doing the right thing, we achieve this by being honest and fair.

Our teams believe that with teamwork together we achieve more, we achieve this through collaboration. We believe in respect, that you earn it and give it, by open communication and collaboration.

What the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship does

AGU’s data and software policies associated with publications have evolved over the last few years to now require that data and software supporting the research in the paper are preserved in an appropriate repository, described in the availability statement and cited in the references. AGU’s editors and publication team are implementing the new policy with good results.

The Assistant Director, Data Stewardship position is part of the AGU’s Data Leadership program supporting AGU publications, editors, reviewers, authors, and the broader Earth and space science community with support to ensure that data and software supporting AGU publications, specifically those funded by the National Science Foundation EAR grants are preserved in an appropriate repository, included in the availability statement, and cited in the references of the papers.

The incumbent in this role will help to further develop best practices and to serve as a resource to the editors, reviewers, authors, and AGU publications team to support the full implementation of AGU’s data and software publication policies and the broader culture change around data and software sharing.
This is a two-year term position.

• Supports AGU authors in identifying repositories that are aligned with the FAIR guiding principles for data and software before, or at the time of, manuscript submission and ideally identified in the Data Management Plan for the research.
• Ensures that researchers include an availability statement and cite their data and software properly, in references for AGU journals.
• Ensures that AGU Journals tag the data and software citations properly and sends these to Crossref, CHORUS, and other downstream services.
• Develops best practices for the broad journal community, shares those practices, conducts outreach through AGU Data FAIR, Data Help Desk, AGU’s communication channels, and our partners.
• Supports AGU data and software sharing efforts for the purpose of making data and software open and FAIR as a common practice.
• Works with researchers to improve their awareness and understanding of research data management skills that better prepare them to make their data open and FAIR.
• Works with AGU publications staff, providing training and support to those working with editors, reviewers, and authors across all the journals.
• Reviews submitted papers (with priority to NSF-EAR funded research), assesses the viability of the author’s data and software products, determines if any data or software has been used but not included in the availability statements, and recommends improvements to data and software availability statements and citations.
• Supports authors by facilitating their understanding of what is required for their data and software to prepared for publication.
• Supports AGU’s Data FAIR and the Data Help Desk.
• Coordinates with the COPDESS community (https://COPDESS.org) and partners such as ESIP (https://esipfed.org), CHORUS (https://www.chorusaccess.org), Dryad (https://datadryad.org), and others.
• Develops and shares leading practices with the broad community around open and FAIR data and software.
• Supports content management on AGU and partner websites to make information easily available.
• Keeps abreast of new trends and needs through interaction with industry professionals; travels for outreach activities as needed.
• Other duties as assigned.

What the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship brings to the team
• Post-graduate study in the natural sciences or related field; Ph.D. is strongly preferred.
• Minimum of five years of experience with scientific data best practices to include: creation, analysis, management, curation, and preservation.
• Minimum of five years of experience with scholarly publishing process, knowledge of and experience with Earth, space, or environmental science related journals preferred.
• Broad awareness of data practices in the sciences and leading efforts to improve them.
• Breadth of knowledge in industry best practices and related data management technologies.
• Excellent oral and written communication skills.
• Ability to present content in webinars, videos, and other channels using tools such as PowerPoint.
• Ability to coordinate and manage video meetings, webinars, and other online and in person outreach activities.
• Must be capable of dealing calmly and professionally with numerous different personalities from diverse cultures at various levels within and outside of the organization.
• Excellent analytical skills, mathematical and organizational skills required.
• Strong attention to detail.
• Ability to execute responsibilities with minimal supervision required.
• Must be able to perform responsibilities with composure under the stress of deadlines; requirements for accuracy and quality and/or fast pace required.
• Ability to understand the complexity of the factors needed to produce successful meeting programs.
• Ability to travel.

To Apply:

For consideration, please submit your cover letter and resume to
https://rew12.ultipro.com/AME1056/jobboard/NewCandidateExt.aspx?__JobID=407

The successful candidate for this position will be subject to a pre-employment background check.

AGU proudly offers a casual work environment, excellent compensation, generous work-life opportunities, and an outstanding benefits package.

AGU is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP
here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.6,"American Geophysical Union
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1919,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
54,Data Analyst II,$41k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"We know why you are reading about this opportunity. You are driven to achieve goals. You are looking to make a direct impact. You want to work in a culture where your co-workers work as part of a diverse team, communicate across departments, and have a positive attitude. If we had to guess, you are innovative with great ideas, want to bring efficiencies to processes, and are looking to grow your career. Are we right? If so, let’s talk about who we are.

Who We Are

Greenphire is a leading provider of clinical payment and communication solutions. We provide software as a service (SaaS) to reduce costs, increase participant retention, and produce quantifiable results for our clients in the clinical trial industry. Our vibrant culture focuses on four key values: All In, As a Team, For a Purpose, Solving Problems.

We are a multi-year recipient of the Philadelphia Business Journal’s Best Places to Work award, and love to give shout-outs and awards to our employees. Our For A Purpose committee champions philanthropic activities throughout the year so employees can give back to our community. We have a diversity committee that focuses on breaking down barriers, recognizing that our uniqueness is what makes us so successful!

To Join Our Team

You must love numbers and manipulating large sets of data. You also must be analytical with experience extracting and uploading data into a system - paying special attention to detail and taking pride in accuracy. At the same time, you have to be able to excel in a fast-paced environment and love ever-changing and advancing work. If automating and making things efficient is your thing, look no further!

How You Will Contribute
Build internal relationships and deliver data science solutions to meet their needs
Extract and manipulate large amounts of data using SQL, Excel and visualization analytics software
Present analytics and data visualizations for stakeholders, with actionable insights
Provide ad hoc queries, and develop reports that provide insights and access to key performance metrics
Integrate data from multiple sources into reports for internal and external sources
Conduct quality control and auditing to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of data and configurations
Work cross-functionally with Operations and Technology to improve data quality and reporting
For Consideration You Will Have
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data science, finance or equivalent work experience
SQL and advanced Excel experience
Prior coding experience (a plus)
Proficiency with visual analytics software; MS Power BI, MS SQL Server Analysis is a plus!
Proven analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities
Passion for sharing your skills and data knowledge with others
Demonstration of high degree of productivity while handling multiple tasks simultaneously, and easily adaptable to urgent matters when required
Strong written and verbal communication, and research skills
Strong relationship building skills for collaboration",3.6,"Greenphire
3.6","King of Prussia, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
55,Data Engineer,$86k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
56,"Scientist III, Pharma R & D",-1,"The Scientist III develops and executes formulation strategies related to product development, such as project planning, experimental design and data evaluations. The Scientist III applies technical expertise and has knowledge of various formulation development approaches. Demonstrates leadership and experience in the area of pre-formulation, formulation and process development of immediate and modified solid dosage, Topicals (cream,gel), Oral liquid and /or Transdermal. The position reports to a Manager/ Principal Scientist as described in the current organization chart of the department.

Essential Functions:
Develops formulation strategy and designs experimental plan, formulation and process development work for oral controlled release and immediate release dosage forms, Topicals, (cream, gel), Oral Liquid, and Transdermal products.
Responsible for selection of raw materials, packaging components and process requirements based on sound scientific principles.
Reviews analytical and clinical data and makes scientific conclusions.
Writes and reviews protocols and batch records for process development and evaluation work, scale up and pivotal batch manufacturing.
Creates and reviews technical documents, reports and presentations for cross functional teams. Writes Modules of ANDA's for submission.
Maintain Design history files for combination products. Develop design and development plan.
Keeps updated on cGMP and current technologies.
Additional Responsibilities:
Provides scientific and technical direction to junior staff members (scientists I, II, technicians & operators) to ensure project deadlines and performance standards are met.
Identifies, analyzes and suggests corrective actions to optimize R&D processes, technologies and regulatory compliance issues.
Equipment: Becomix, Tube filler, Transdermal and liquid manufacturing equipment.
Reviews Junior Scientist work.

Qualifications

Education:
A Master Degree (MS/MA) in Pharmaceutical, Chemistry or related technical field is preferred
A Bachelors Degree (BA/BS) in Pharmaceutical, Chemistry or related technical field is required.
Experience:
3 years or more experience with a Master Degree in development of Pharmaceutical Dosage Forms is required.
5 years or more experience with a Bachelors of Science in development of Pharmaceutical Dosage Forms is required.
Skills:
Must have knowledge of Pharmaceutical product development and manufacturing process. - Intermediate
Must be precise and consistent in day to day developmental work, easily trainable and ready to learn. - Intermediate
Must be able to effectively communicate reports, problems or issues, verbally as well as in writing. - Intermediate
Must have good oral and written communication skills. - Intermediate
Must be able to work in a team environment and be flexible to easily adapt to changes in assignments. - Intermediate
Must follow safe practices as defined by the SOP's and MSDS. - Intermediate
Must be willing to work extended hours as and when required. - Intermediate
Strong interpersonal skills and maintaining cooperative working relationships with others. - Intermediate
Managing multiple projects, duties and assignments. - Intermediate
Specialized Knowledge:
Must possess in depth knowledge and trouble shooting skills with Wurster Bottom Spray Fluid Bed Processors from lab scale to Commercial scale.
Must possess expertise with the use and optimization of extrusion and spheronization manufacturing techniques.
Must have a good understanding of complex modified release dosage forms.
Must Possess in-depth knowledge of the operation and troubleshooting skills for various lab scale equipment to production scale equipment: including Blenders, granulators, planetary mixers, fluid bed dryers, fluid bed coaters, incubators, mills, vibrorotatory sifters, encapsulation equipment (Manual to fully automatic), tablet presses and tablet coaters, roller compaction, packaging.
Works independently once assignments and responsibilities are outlined and delegated. Effective in oral and written communication skills at all levels and cross functionally.

Primary Location: US-NJ-Piscataway
Work Locations: Piscataway 49 49 Colonial Drive Piscataway 08854
Job: Research & Analytics
Organization: Scientific Affairs
Schedule: Regular
Shift: Standard
Employee Status: Individual Contributor
Job Type: Full-time
Job Level: 1st Shift
Travel: No
Job Posting: Dec 4, 2019, 10:41:34 AM",3.2,"Amneal Pharmaceuticals
3.2","Piscataway, NJ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
57,Autonomous Driving Data Engineer,$99k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an experienced Big Data Engineer to help building up our large-scale data management system for the ADAS / Autonomous Driving team. This field allows contributions on various levels around the data pipeline and data processing, data annotation, machine learning, data ingestion, data pre-processing, integration of Deep Neural Network frameworks, efficient data search and high performance data manipulation.
You Will:
Work with a state-of-the-art data pipeline on the development and test process of the ADAS/AD features
Enable efficient data (pre-)processing in our cloud infrastructure
Contribute to the architecture and implementation of an efficient data ingestion process to transfer and store large-scale vehicle sensor data from our Lucid Air test vehicles efficiently into our data storage
Help to optimize the data storage, search and data processing based on a diverse mix of storage solutions, caching techniques and big data frameworks.
Contribute to the implementation of a secure distributed data access solution for data on-premise and via cloud providers to connect Lucid data with service providers and partners
Work with machine learning experts, testing engineers and software developers to solve challenging development problems
You Bring:
Knowledge of database systems, big data concepts and cluster computing frameworks (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, or other tools)
Excellence in C++, Python, Java or other related programming languages
Previous experience with big data applications or back-end software development
Experience with machine learning, data engineering, deep learning frameworks and related open-loop testing techniques
Strong communication skills
Great to Have:
Previous experience building efficient large-scale data collection, storage and processing pipelines
Understanding of cyber-security issues and best practices
Advanced degrees preferred
Education:
BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science/Engineering, Data Engineering or other related fields
4+ years of work experience or a PhD in a related field
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
58,Remote Data Engineer,$72k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Experience:
*Fully Remote** Must be US Citizen and able to obtain a TS/SCI
Develop standardized data architecture that includes data structure and transfer protocols to facilitate sensor integration and dynamically share information to improve situational awareness.
Develop a standardized architecture that supports a centralized data repository that advances all data analytics, and AIML capabilities enhance command and control decisions.
Design and build end-to-end data pipeline solutions (esp. streaming and batch processing, machine learning model training and updating).
Develop strategies for data acquisitions, archive recovery, and implementation of a database.
Define, design, and build dimensional databases.
Implements processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Writes unit/integration tests, contributes to engineering wiki, and documents work.
Performs data analysis required to troubleshoot data related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Works closely with a team of frontend and backend engineers, product managers, and analysts.
Designs data integrations and data quality framework.
Works closely with all engineering teams to develop strategy for long term data platform architecture.

Qualifications / Skills:

SQL/MySQL/PostgreSQL
Microservice deployment, cloud certification (AWS architect)

Education, Experience, and Licensing Requirements:

BS or MS degree in Computer Science or a related technical field
2-4+ years of experience as a data engineer
U.S. Citizenship with ability to obtain government security clearance",3.7,"Edgesource Corporation
3.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
59,Insight & Analytics Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Insight & Analytics Data Analyst will support our Sr. Analysts and Directors who are managing clients and project work. The position entails measuring business objectives against client KPIs and requires strong technical skills with data analysis and visualization, as well as the ability to craft key insights and findings and present work when required. The Data Analyst will also play a role in various research projects that require an understanding of earned media analysis, and social and web analytics, with a tool-agnostic approach. Multi-tasking and working on several projects at once will be part of the job experience.

Job Functions:
Develops strategy insights that are compelling, actionable, and statistically rigorous, identifying trends and anomalies, and triangulating data gaps
Understanding of project management elements and what role they play, meet deadlines and apply critical thinking to ask questions and help problem solve when needed.
Data visualization expertise and the ability to translate data from multiple data sources into a compelling story.
Has a collaborative mindset, is willing to work with others and take direction.
Applies sophisticated analysis to datasets to discern and identify patterns and recommend relatable actions.
Ability to multi-task and manage competing priorities in a time-sensitive environment.
Ability to ask the right questions to understand business problems and identify measurement or research objectives.
Other duties as assigned.

Minimum/Preferred Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative discipline (Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Data Science) or marking/communications (Strategic Communications, Marketing Communications, Market Research), or the equivalent combination of education and experience
2-3 years of data analysis, data visualization, and/or market research experience is required.
Proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Power BI
Has passion and ability to learn new technologies, tools and platforms. Experience with social analytics platforms such as Talkwalker, Audiense, Netbase, Sprinklr or similar platforms is a plus.
Additional Requirements:
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate actively and work in a team environment.
Solid organizational and project management skills.
Self-motivated and able to adapt quickly to changing priorities and tight deadlines.
Strong presentation and consulting skills along with the ability to read, write and speak English
Experience working remotely or with colleagues in multiple locations
Must be able to work more than 40 hours per week on occasion
Travel: may on occasion need to travel, up to 10%

Equal Opportunity: WE provides equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against an employee or applicant because of age, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, or other legally protected class status.
Diversity and Inclusion: WE values a diverse and inclusive workforce and is committed to creating a workplace where everyone thrives. We promote an atmosphere in which diversity of people and ideas are welcomed and valued. Diversity includes differences in race, religion, gender, age, lifestyle, ethnic background and sexual orientation as well as differences in experiences and ideas.
*LI-TQ1
WAG123",3.7,"WE Communications
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
60,Quantitative Analyst,$99k-$192k (Glassdoor Est.),"Quantitative Analyst

Are you ready to explore a world of possibilities?

Join our DTCC family, and you’ll grow your expertise and become the best version of you. As you embark on a new journey, you’ll tackle challenges with flexibility and grace, learning new skills and advancing your career while having the time of your life.

Why You’ll Love This Job:

Being a member of our Risk Management team, you’ll work to protect the safety and soundness of our systems and are responsible for identifying, managing, measuring and mitigating a spectrum of key risk types including credit, market, liquidity, systemic, operational and technology in all existing and new products, activities, processes and systems.

Responsibilities:

The candidate is primarily responsible for designing, developing, testing, and maintaining stress test models or tools and performing Stress Test related analyses and reporting.
Design and implement stress testing scenarios
Perform analytical analysis such as attribution analysis to explain stress testing risk metrics results
Conduct quality assurances and controls on data
Maintain stress testing related functions in QRM's Production System, including setting up scheduled jobs to perform stress testing calcuations
Aligns risk and control processes into day to day responsibilities to monitor and mitigate risk; escalates appropriately
**NOTE: Responsibilities of this role are not limited to the details above. **

Talents needed for success:
1+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferable in credit risk or market risk modeling
Minimum 6 years of related work experience
Excellent communication skills, both oral and written.
Must have excellent interpersonal skills
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Have a general knowledge about the financial market, products, risk management (such as VaR modeling) and risk metrics (such as back testing).
Solid programming skills in data processing language such as SQL, Python. R, Matlab are pluses.
Must have a Ph. D or a Master’s degree in a quantitative field, preferably in applied economics, econometries, statistics or financial engineering.",3.8,"DTCC
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
61,Healthcare Provider Data Analyst,$42k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

NYSTEC is a non-profit technology consulting company, advising agencies, organizations, institutions, and businesses since 1996. Were independent and vendor-neutral so we have our clients best interests at heart. At NYSTEC, we know that we succeed when individuals and teams flourish personally and professionally, so our benefits and perks support this mindset. Are you ready to contribute to our engaged workforce and deliver the NYSTEC Experience?

About the Role:

As a Healthcare Data Analyst in the Population Health Strategy practice, you will collaborate with team members to conceptualize, deliver, and support our clients through todays ever-changing healthcare landscape. NYSTEC is considered a trusted program advisor, providing subject matter expertise, and connecting the dots for our clients. Over the last five years, NYSTEC has consulted on some of the largest Medicaid initiatives and served in various roles across a multitude of New York State healthcare technology systems.

Serving as a Healthcare ProviderData Analyst, you will be supporting healthcare technology initiatives for our clients, partners and stakeholders by providing analytical expertise to evaluate provider data across New York State.

About You:

Required Qualifications
Experience in health informatics
Experience writing ad hoc queries in SQL
Strong critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills
Proficiency with translating complex analytic ideas into actionable insights for varied levels of audience.
Ability to develop relationships with stakeholders and understand their needs through excellent listening and effective written and verbal communication.
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, with strong skills in Excel
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Experience using SAS
Experience using provider data and/or payer data to inform decision making
Experience with data quality analysis
Masters degree in health informatics, public health, statistics, computer science, or a related discipline
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience is required. An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
If youre an effective communicator who enjoys working in complex and collaborative environments, utilizing your critical thinking and research skills to develop solutions for clients, providing support to customers, and have the required education, experience and skills, we want to hear from you.

It is NYSTEC's policy to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all individuals, regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition as defined by applicable state or local law, genetic information, military service and veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status, , or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal law and ordinances. NYSTEC is strongly committed to this policy and believes in the concept and spirit of the law.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.",3.9,"NYSTEC
3.9","Albany, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
62,Market Data Analyst,$31k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking a creative, data driven Marketing Analyst to join our fast paced, growing organization. Candidate is responsible for researching product and manufacturing trends, evaluating campaign results and making recommendations for growth and operating efficiency improvements to our management team. The ideal candidate will have experience with complex data mining/analysis and implementation. This is a growth position with upward mobility. Complete benefit package includes medical, dental, vision life insurance, student loan repayment assistance and a 401(k) company matched contribution.

Responsibilities:
Evaluate market trends and patterns to suggest new & complementary products
Manage Distribution Price List and analyze market data to identify cause and effect relationships
Evaluate product, pricing, placement (distribution channels) and promotion (advertisements/marketing campaigns) and present recommendations to management
Work closely with Distribution Channel Partners to grow market share in under-represented markets
Examine return on investment of marketing campaigns
Travel to customers and industry events to gather market intelligence
Visit other Amphenol Business Units domestically and internationally to learn best-practices and facilitate implementation internally
Work closely with Sales and Marketing to track competitive landscape and market trends
Requirements:
Undergraduate or Masters degree in Marketing, Business, Engineering or related field
Demonstrated aptitude for analytics
Proven record of leadership in a work setting and/or through extracurricular activities
Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Preferred:
1-3 years of experience in a fast-paced global manufacturing environment
“An Equal Opportunity Employer” Minority/Female/Disabled/Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity or National Origin"" Drug free workplance.

ITAR - The candidate must be able to legally work in the United States; we are unable to provide sponsorship. Position requires candidate to be a US Person as defined in ITAR, 22 CFR 120.15 (US Citizenship or Resident Alien Status) and defined by 8 USC 1101(a) (20).

Apply for This Position",3.5,"SV Microwave
3.5","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Public,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
63,Senior Bioinformataics Scientist OB/Gyn Research,$224k-$446k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Bioinformatics Scientist OB/GYN Research Needed!

This is a unique opportunity to conduct bioinformatic analysis on research projects for Inova, the region’s leading non-profit healthcare provider in the Northern Virginia area recognized in 2019 by U.S. News & World Report.

Position Highlights:
• Recognized leader: 923-bed nationally recognized regional medical center.
• Team Member centric: We create an environment or respect and growth, where contributions are recognized and rewarded.

What You Will Do:
• Conduct bioinformatic analysis on research projects.
• Develop new analytic approaches to complex human diseases, such as cancer, diabetes and heart disease.
What You Will Need:
• Candidates for this position will have an MD, Ph.D. or Master’s in Computer Science, Bioinformatics or related field.
• Experience working with large scale biomedical data and hands on experience developing software or information systems to manage and analyze biomedical data.
• PREFERRED: Hands-on experience working with Next and Third generation sequence data, proteomic data and microarray data from a tremendous breadth of clinical areas to gain new insights into human disease.
• Ability to interact with team members for project coordination
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills
• Strong software development skills
• Experience working with terabytes of translational biomedical data
• Strong informatics skills to include the use of programming and/or scripting languages such as Python, Perl, java, C/C++, and R.
• A Strong knowledge base of bioinformatics principles

M/F/Vets/Disabled

#LI-MT1
IND2
#LI-BQ1

IND2
#LI-KD1

Requirements

MD, PhD or Masters in Computer science, Bioinformatics or related field.

At Inova, safety is the foundation of everything we do. You’re always safe at Inova.

Our commitment to quality starts with the safety of our team members. We safeguard our patients, by safeguarding our employees.

Our commitment to keeping patients safe, means there’s no safer place for you to work.

 Inova is well stocked with the best and latest PPE

 Masks are provided to patients entering our buildings, and offered free to visitors

 Covid-19 patients are isolated in dedicated areas

 Inova operates curbside Covid-19 testing sites that are far removed from the main facilities

 All team members are trained in the latest screening guidelines

Work Site Location

INOVA FAIRFAX MEDICAL CAMPUS",3.5,"Inova Health System
3.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1956,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
64,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,$109k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
65,Lead Data Scientist with NLP,$108k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The MITRE Corporation has a new opportunity for an innovative data scientist. You will be challenged to creatively apply machine learning/deep learning and data science to natural language processing (NLP) and computer vision to provide MITRE-unique value to our sponsors.

One of our mission-critical projects is supporting the Department of Commerce (DoC), with visibility at the Secretary level. Our new data scientist will play a key role in this multi-agency project for the Investigations and Threat Management Service (ITMS) within DoC. ITMS conducts investigations and analyses to identify and/or assess critical threats to the Department’s mission, operations or activities, and prevents or mitigates such threats from adversely affecting Department personnel, facilities, property or assets through strategic and tactical approaches.

On this project, MITRE will work with ITMS to stand up a capability that (a) supports the execution of law enforcement, intelligence, threat management, and other activities intrinsic to DoC’s mission, and (b) proactively identifies system vulnerabilities and actors who may be exploiting permissible access or bypassing current security.

The successful candidate will:
Contribute to innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, data science, natural language processing, and computer vision in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science.
Provide thought leadership and collaborate with academia, industry and MITRE Technical Centers, portfolio and program divisions in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science.
Work with department leadership to develop and evolve an enduring, adaptive and forward-looking strategy and capability advancing the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to:
Adversarial information scenarios
Defining, detecting, and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models, and algorithms
Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing
Defining, detecting, and measuring bias in datasets and information
Information security and privacy
Data generation
Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and provide technical guidance and quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes, strong leadership and transition of research results to sponsor operations.
Provide exemplary leadership, caring mentorship, and collaborative technical advice to staff related to Department domain knowledge or capabilities
Basic Qualifications
BS in applicable major
8 + years of related work experience using machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, and cognitive science.
Must have an active TS / SCI for consideration.
Required Experience
Documented success using TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, and Dlib.
Hands on technical expertise programming & scripting using C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL.
Familiarity with cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data.
Preferred Qualifications
MS or PhD with a minimum of one year of related experience in computer science.
Travel Statement
Sponsor site support in Washington D.C. Metropolitan Area.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
66,"Data Scientist, Cloud Business Operations",$111k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"53303

About NetApp

NetApp provides software, systems, and services to manage, store and share data via on-premises, and private and public clouds to customers worldwide. NetApp is emerging as a leader in providing public cloud services on all major cloud platforms, including Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft , and Google Cloud Platform (GCP). These cloud services, such as Cloud Volumes; Cloud Insights, Virtual Desktop Service, Global File Cache, SaaS backup, and Spot, avails customers to consider many more options on how and where to manage their critical workloads and data for optimal business and financial outcomes. The NetApp Public Cloud Services business unit is at the forefront of our effort to transform NetApp into a leader in the cloud market.
Job Summary
About the Position

This Cloud Business Operations Data Scientist will be the primary go to person for all of NetApp Public Cloud Services needs for analyzing tons of cloud services usage and billing data to derive intelligent business insights for enabling NetApp’s highest growth business. This person will be an expert in both understanding the data, as well as architecting and developing business logic and code to deliver automation in business intelligence. This is a highly technical role with deep understanding of Azure programming, R, SQL databases, visualization on Tableau, and scripting, along with years of experience in cloud services business operations. Knowledge of public cloud-based transactions on the top 3 cloud provider marketplaces (AWS, Azure and GCP) is a must, along with experience and understanding of integrations with internal systems for CRM, CPQ, Subscriptions Billing and Finance.

This role will coordinate with product management, IT and operations, and other NetApp functions including sales, marketing, and finance to understand, analyze and improve product pricing, SKU design, and transaction processing of our existing cloud offerings and upcoming innovations. This role will also act as the primary operations liaison between product management teams and business operations. The right person for this role has deep understanding of public cloud marketplace transaction processing, billing, metering, and revenue/usage reporting. This person also has extensive experience in dealing with cross-functional business requirements and engaging with key stakeholders at both the executive/VP level and with delivery teams.
Job Requirements
Key Responsibilities
Analyze usage and billing data from multiple sources to derive business intelligence
Develop business logic and write code to automate BI output
Design and develop visualization dashboards in Tableau
Understand public cloud marketplace transaction processes and provide guidance to business operations teams on implementation best practices
Leverage business insights to provide guidance to product management for pricing and transaction processing design
Skills and Qualifications
10+ years of experience working with various cloud providers, software vendors and/or consulting organizations
5+ years of experience in data analysis and business insights
5+ years of experience in Azure programming, R, SQL databases and Tableau
Understanding of enterprise cloud solutions and related technical offerings
Collaborative personality; comfortable working across many functions and teams, and engaging with senior executives
A creative go-getter who is full of ideas and can execute on those ideas in a fast-paced, demanding environment with excellent interpersonal and social skills
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.
Travel Required

20% (includes domestic and int.)
Education
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.

Nearest Major Market: San Jose
Nearest Secondary Market: Palo Alto
Job Segment:
Operations Manager, Scientific, Database, Cloud, Operations, Engineering, Technology

Apply now »",3.7,"NetApp
3.7","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1992,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
67,Data Scientist - Intermediate,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, Intermediate level, St. Louis, MO

**No C2C or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee**

Required Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, or another highly quantitative discipline; or Masters degree plus two years of post-graduate experience.
Demonstrated ability to apply advanced statistical methodology and data science solutions to real-world problems
Strong proficiency in Python
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability, with demonstrated ability to build, test, and iterate on a variety of model forms
Demonstrated ability to work in cross-functional environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Applied experience with agricultural science and/or agricultural datasets
At least 1 year of work experience applying statistics and data science to real-world problems
Machine learning experience
Experience in SQL, PySpark, or SparklyR/Spark
Ability to translate complex technical concepts to collaborations, decision makers, and non-technical audiences
Strong drive to learn new topics and skills and to develop innovative products for our customers
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
68,Business Intelligence Analyst I,$54k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

As an integral member of our client's report delivery team, the Business Intelligence (BI) Analyst role identifies business intelligence, reporting, and data analysis needs. They work closely with clients and COE teams to turn data into critical information and knowledge that can be used to make sound business decisions. It is essential that the BI Analyst builds an understanding of the business at a level of detail that enables them to identify and address critical issues. They must provide data that is accurate, congruent and reliable, as well as ensure the information is easily available to users for direct consumption or integration with other systems.

The BI Analyst works with clients to determine business requirements, priorities, define key performance indicators (KPI), and develop BI and data warehouse (DW) strategy. This includes working with business and development teams to design and document dashboards, alerts, and reports.

This BI Analyst must have an in-depth understanding of the business environment and an interest in going beyond the obvious, delving into the source, the definition, philosophy, and foundational roots of a data element in order to create information.

This is a full time position within Rational's Technology Practice. This position is not available for Visa sponsorship or C2C work.

What You Will Do:
Working with cross-functional teams, you will participate in requirement gathering, documenting, and development of reports and dashboards to meet business needs.
Responsible for translating business requirements into specifications that will be used to implement the required reports and dashboards, created from potentially multiple data sources
Translate business requirements into specifications that will be used to implement the required reports and dashboards, created from potentially multiple data sources
Be accountable for providing leadership and independent initiatives in facilitating information gathering, structured documentation and presentation of findings to all levels of management.
Conduct analyses of functional business processes and requirements and participate in the development of business cases in the support of process changes and/or projects.
Be an ambassador within our client for data and reporting capabilities
Be responsible for creation and support of mission critical reports and dashboards
Provide technical assistance and cross training to other team members.
Provide assistance to users for generation of ad-hoc reports
Educate and train clients to use the data in an analytical tool, displaying the information in new forms and content for the purpose of analysis and exploration.
Participate with other developers to convert legacy reports (primarily SSRS) to SpotFire or other BI solutions as directed.
Must be able to perform duties with moderate to low supervision
Ability to manage multiple priorities, and assess and adjust quickly to changing priorities
What You Will Bring:
Minimum of 2-3 years of report development required
At least 3 years of experience with PowerBI
BI certifications desirable, preferably related PowerBI
Experience in biotechnology / pharmaceutical environment or similar industry preferred, but not required
Demonstrable proficiency with PowerBI, including a high degree of skill in the DAX language and competence in the M language
Knowledge of logical and physical data structures (relational and dimensional)
Programming / scripting experience and knowledge of software development life cycle is preferred.
Requires strong analytical, conceptual and problem-solving abilities
Experience in developing and maintain validated reports and dashboards preferred
Ability to work in a team environment with both technical and business members.
Attention to detail in issue resolution, demonstrated ability to diagnose and resolve issues proactively in a fast-paced environment.
Who You Are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Collaborative to the Core. Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment, as a leader and member.
Well-rounded Professional. You have amazing communication and organizational skills along with high EQ.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Bellevue, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
69,Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,"American Bureau of Shipping
3.5","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1862,Other Organization,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
70,Data Modeler II,$45k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT MEDIACOM DATA WAREHOUSE:

The Mediacom Data Warehouse (DW) is looking for an experienced individual interested in joining a growing team of professionals as it undertakes a complete refresh of its current DW environment. This is a unique opportunity to join a greenfield migration project at the ground level. The environment refresh includes Active Batch Automation and Scheduling, Informatica Data Integration tool, and Oracle Exadata running a 12c database. Mediacom’s Data Analytics tools of choice include Oracle OBIEE and Tableau. Mediacom’s data modeling environment is maintained through the erwin Data Modeler tool. The right person for this position will be able to work and thrive in a truly collaborative environment, be an eager learner, self-motivated and not afraid to work in partnership for all areas of the DW as needed.

GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES

The Data Warehouse Senior Data Modeler will work with ETL developers, DBAs, business user personnel and project managers to gather data requirements and create logical data models for applications, including those with specialized or complex requirements. Develop, manage, and update data models, including physical and logical:

Develop and maintain logical and physical data models using best practices and company standards to ensure high data quality, reduced data redundancy, and good query performance.
Reverse and forward engineer data models in an Oracle Exadata environment.
Optimize and update logical and physical data models to support new and existing projects and ensure business users are working in a clean safe data environment.
Assist in the creation of best practices for standard naming conventions and coding practices to ensure consistency of data models.
Document database processes that currently extract the data from the existing system for reporting purposes.
Define and document the technical architecture of the data warehouse, including the physical components and their functionality, data models and data dictionaries.
Coordinate activities with the rest of the data warehouse team including developers and testers; Assist in promoting database objects from lower to higher environments.
Lead design reviews of data models and other relevant metadata to ensure consistency, quality, accuracy and integrity.
Recommend opportunities for reuse of data models in new projects.
Consult with Database Administrators concerning the creation of physical data schema from the logical model by making recommendations, designing referential integrity, and ensuring business requirements are satisfied.
Consult with ETL developers, report developers, end users concerning how to use the database as designed and how to navigate efficiently within the database.
Guide System Analysts, Engineers, Programmers and others on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces, and system integration challenges and solutions.
Mentor a junior data modeler

Required Skills:

Data modeling in Oracle Exadata (5 years)
Analyzing and generating technical requirements and design (8 years)
Creating and maintaining data models in a data warehouse environment (8 years)
Database tuning techniques (8 years)
Analyzing source databases, source data, source database referential integrity and profiling source data (8 years)
Hands-on data warehouse project experience (5 years)
erwin data modeling software (6 years)
Oracle PL/SQL developer experience (6 years)
Informatica PowerCenter experience a plus
Experience in team management, communication, and presentation (8 years)

Mediacom endeavors to make mediacomcable.com/careers accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our careers website, please contact careersassistance@mediacomcc.com or dial 845-443-2408. Any inquiries regarding employment application status, resume submittal, open positions and any other general inquiries will not receive a response.",3.4,"Mediacom Communications Corporation
3.4","Blooming Grove, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
71,RESEARCH COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - MISSION DEVELOPMENT,$70k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Develop, maintain, and enhance complex and diverse software systems (e.g., sensor network operations, processing-intensive application, analytics on various sized data sets, real-time systems, data visualizations and user interfaces, etc.). This development will include life cycle activities that include analyzing customer requirements, creating solid designs, developing innovative implementations, systems and network integration and ongoing customer interaction. Will be responsible for the translation of complex customer requirements into soundly designed and implemented technical solutions with emphasis on building software products for the Department of Defense, Intelligence Community and allied customers. Design and implement services and applications including software and systems that process SIGINT data, apply signal processing algorithms, develop, store and distribute processed results, and provide user visualization of analytical results. Responsibilities include: Participation in full life cycle software development tasks utilizing primarily Java and C++ development environments. Develop embedded, high-performance systems, as well as, web service and user interfaces. Participate in requirements analysis, software design, coding, unit testing, integration, installation and maintenance. Operating as a nonprofit since our 1947 inception, we work in the public’s best interest and toward the betterment of mankind. Southwest Research Institute’s benefits program ranks among those of top private employers.


Education/Experience:


Requires a MS degree in Computer Science with 2-7 years of Software Development, Software Engineering, Sensor Network Systems, SIGINT, Geolocation, Information Exploitation, or Information Engineering experience. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. SwRI is seeking an experienced Software Engineer for collaborative work with the government customer and other SwRI software engineers to design, develop, install, deploy, operate, and manage software systems. Should have experience developing improvements for next-generation SIGINT systems and geolocation networks. Must have a working knowledge of software development processes including analysis of software requirements, application design, coding, unit and integration testing, software/hardware integration and software documentation with an emphasis in Java and C++ for application development ranging from embedded, high-performance systems to web service and user interface development. Candidates must have the ability to cross-train in multiple software development domains. Must be able to develop new ideas and solve complex problems based on technical and domain experience. Must be able to work in teams and independently. Must have strong communications skills and should have demonstrated capabilities in software development leadership. A current TS/SCI FS Poly is required. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Hanover, Maryland. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Hanover, Maryland


For more information about this division, visit the Defense & Intelligence Solutions home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","Hanover, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
72,R&D Food Scientist,-1,"Golding Farms Foods is a specialty sauce and condiment manufacturer with facilities in Winston Salem NC and St. Louis MO. Golding Farms produces private label, branded and co-packed products for an array of national and international customers. The company is aggressively growing its product portfolio and its customer base and requires a Food Scientist to contribute to the team. This position is well suited for you if you enjoy (i) being a part of a small organization where you can have a meaningful impact on business results; (ii) working closely with colleagues from all functional areas of the business (e.g. sales, finance, manufacturing, logistics, warehouse and customer service) and (iii) a team-oriented culture where colleagues work collaboratively to solve problems and deliver corporate objectives. This role also offers the opportunity for personal growth, as employees receive cross-training and experience in multiple areas of the business to provide redundancy; in addition, the role will provide the candidate with direct exposure to senior management, both at the site and corporate level.
Summary: *The Food Scientist is responsible for supporting the growth of new and existing products in the marketplace.
Primary Tasks/Responsibilities: *
Partner with Marketing and Sales to identify and develop new product platforms and improvements which delight customers and support business strategies.
Source raw ingredients and specifications that meet company standards.
Develop formula and processing specifications and costing for new product prototypes.
Determine special processes in order to ensure safe products.
Develop tests to make sure products meet quality standards and legal requirements.
Support new product launch to plant startup until quality standards are established.
Provide sales samples of new products as requested by Sales and Marketing.
Set up sensory panels to evaluate new products or existing products.
Conduct shelf-life tests on new products.
Generate nutritional data, assuring compliance with regulatory nutritional and label compliance.
Identify and implement cost reduction opportunities through reformulation.
Comply with all company work and safety rules and regulatory compliance rules and regulations.
Maintain a clean, sanitary, and safe work area.
Follow all Good Manufacturing Practices and Standard Operating Procedures.
Adhere to all safety and security policies and procedures.
Follow all food safety and quality system requirements by committing to meet all pertinent regulatory, customer and Safe Quality Foods (SQF) requirements.
Qualifications: *
Bachelors degree in food science or other relevant field required.
2-5 years of experience in R&D, regulatory, or quality role in food industry required.
Other Skills and relevant considerations: *
Project Management experience beneficial, creativity is critical.
Strong attention to detail.
Exceptional sensory capability.
Must be able to frequently stand, walk, kneel, reach, climb, pull, and bend with full range of body motion.
Must be able to work independently and/or on a team in a fast-paced environment.
Must be able to work in a wet and/or humid environment. Occasional exposure to fumes or airborne particles; toxic or caustic chemicals will occur. Exposure to nut allergens.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $20.00 - $24.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.goldingfarms.com
Work Remotely:
No",1.5,"Golding Farms Foods
1.5","Winston-Salem, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
73,Fire Safety Specialist / Staff Scientist I - Healthcare,$71k-$85k (Employer Est.),"EH&E, the Company:
EH&E is an employee owned company that provides businesses, agencies and institutions with innovative and cost saving solutions for their health and safety, environmental and engineering needs. We protect hospitals, higher education institutions, biotech/ pharmaceutical companies and governmental agencies against pollutants/contaminants such as mold, ensuring safety in the workplace. Headquartered in our aesthetically beautiful, remodeled office in Newton, Massachusetts; EH&E is a trusted, recognized partner engaged with international governmental agencies, large scale enterprises, and leading education and healthcare facilities. www.eheinc.com

Job Description:
As a representative of EH&E's Healthcare team, a Fire Safety Specialist /Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who will work with one of our healthcare clients in Boston, MA. This role educates, trains, and provides support to hospital operations in the development and execution of consistent fire and life safety programs. This role will provide the environmental health and safety department depth and knowledge in building code and emergency egress compliance, ILSM program elements, construction safety, fire drills, permitting, investigations, fire and life safety inspections with regulatory agencies, and the capability of leading recurring meetings. This role will participate in other various environmental health and safety programs consisting of but not limited to indoor air quality, environmental investigations and sampling, emergency response, risk assessment, accident investigation, developing and tracking fire and life safety incident trends, and developing and managing programs for improving performance primarily related to fire and life safety. As a member of the environmental health and safety department, this role shares responsibility in ensuring compliance with all safety and environmental programs. This role leads an important safety component within the department, which the client views as critical to its values and mission in providing a safe and compliant work environment enabling the hospital to provide best in class healthcare. This role assists in leading a proactive safety and environmental program and improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Project Manager. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, and respectful image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Regularly consults with members of the Facilities department and fire and compliance specialist personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance.
QA/QC:
Participates in and may lead fire and life safety specific recurring meetings
Conducts and oversees the hospital fire drill program with internal qualified personnel within the department in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies;
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Coordinates and implements programs aimed at mitigation and/or control strategies of fire and life safety vulnerabilities.
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online EH&S training programs focused primarily in fire and life safety, and may be called upon to deliver training content in other safety-related areas as needed.. Updates written materials with code compliance changes as needed
Conducts follow-up with various stakeholders as needed.
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a valuable team member.
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Has familiarity with TJC, CMS, and NFPA standards, and has desire to expand knowledgebase in each
Performs code compliance risk assessments for work that may alter, buildout or remove portions of healthcare buildings
Conducts environmental monitoring related to leaks and floods to mitigate risk to patient care
Participates as an after-hours emergency responder; has the ability to respond to chemical, biological, and other after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information.
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintaining context and understanding the audience.
Financial Management:
Be able to work within timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals.
Key Skills:
NFPA knowledge and experience, preferably in a healthcare of closely related environment
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers).
Education / Training:
Bachelor of Science (BS), with fire and life safety experience as a responsibility in past roles. Experience in a fire and life safety focused role in a healthcare environment; or, at least experience working in a healthcare environment for a facilities or safety department with an understanding and familiarity of the importance of this role. Background working with TJC and NFPA standards, specifically related to building code compliance.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:
HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification
Experience / Background / Knowledge:
Must have at least 2-5 years of experience in an EH&S department, preferably in a healthcare environment or closely related field with a strong background in fire and life safety code.
EH&E, an employee-owned company, offers a competitive salary, excellent growth potential, and a robust benefits package including profit sharing, Employee Stock Ownership Plan, tuition assistance, and 401(k).
Environmental Health & Engineering is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, disability or veteran status.
Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
74,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
75,Geospatial Data Scientist,-1,"GEOSPATIAL DATA SCIENTIST*
\*\*\*Must have an active DoD Top Secret / SCI Security Clearance\*\*\*
Job Description: *
We currently have an immediate position available for a Geospatial Data Scientist to support a large task order for the Department of Defense at our customer site in Washington, DC. As a member of our core team, you will have an exciting and challenging opportunity to work with emerging technology and a large collection of data sources, engage with a large team of highly skilled professionals, and enjoy a healthy and friendly workplace.
Minimum Requirements: *
8+ years MINIMUM of experience in Intelligence Analysis
Bachelors or Masters degree in Intelligence Analysis, related field, or equivalent experience.
Ability to create high quality finished geospatial intelligence products requiring minimal revisions or modifications.
Must have experience using geospatial intelligence analysis and imagery tools such as ArcGIS, Analyst Notebook, Q-GIS, Image Product Library, and Intelink.
Familiarity with Modernized Integrated Database (MIDB), NES, M3, Data Xplorer suite, Target Profiler, and other community systems are desirable
Ability to work with and identify patterns of life in very large data repositories and cross-correlate metadata across multiple data sources.
Ability to identify new emerging data sources that provides value to the overall mission requirements.
Python scripting and Jupyter experience a strong plus.
Ability to work independently with minimal oversight.
Strong communication and leadership skills.
Responsibilities: *
Conduct research and analysis of data and create finished intelligence products.
Review data ingest streams for anomalies in support of QA/QC activities.
Validate accuracy of geolocations in big data systems using sampling and vetting techniques.
Coordinate data requirements with collection teams and developers.
Perform light scripting in support of analysis and QA/QC.
Populate various databases with results of analytical findings.
Disseminate a broad array of intelligence data analysis products dealing with subject profiles, networks, facilities, and resources.
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)

· A competitive salary based on experience

· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional

· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%

· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables

· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company

· Education Assistance

· 529 College Savings Plan - optional

· Healthy Rewards Program

· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional

· Gym Reimbursement

· Pet Insurance - optional

· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things

· Flexible Hours

· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks

· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Team members will eventually report to a specific work site in Washinton D.C. but for the time being we are working from home for the safety of our team members.

Experience:
Intelligence Analysis: 6 years (Preferred)
MIDB: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20032 (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
76,Research Scientist,-1,"ABOUT THE COMPANY*
At Scout Bio (www.scoutbio.co) our mission is to create innovative medicines for companion animals that are more convenient, effective and safe than those currently available.

In collaboration with the Gene Therapy Program at the University of Pennsylvania, we're applying cutting-edge gene therapy technology from the world of human medicine, to companion animal health (dogs and cats).

Our world-class team of human and animal health biotechnology veterans has an enviable track record of success, and now we're looking for a Research Scientist to join our growing, international team.

Join us and play a key role in bringing gene therapy to veterinary medicine, to improve the quality of life for companion animals and their owners.

Our labs are based in the cool, ultra-modern CiC building at 3675 Market Street, Philadelphia (https://cic.com/philadelphia).
ABOUT THE ROLE*
This role within the Research Group of Scout Bio will be responsible for the evaluation and development of novel gene therapy and protein-based therapeutics for companion animals. Reporting to a senior scientist, this role will help lead the progression of projects from discovery to clinical development.

Key duties
Develop and execute experiments to generate preclinical data for product candidates
Develop and optimize purification procedures for therapeutic protein candidates and research reagents
Develop analytical assays to monitor product quality, potency and stability of therapeutic candidates
Provide vital product-development support by performing appropriate analytical assays as required
Participate in scientific meetings with CRO’s and other organizations
Provide technical support for product development activities
Record and organize data for senior scientific staff
Communicate and troubleshoot scientific challenges as they arise
Prepare experimental protocols, scientific reports and SOPs
Communicate data clearly in a variety of contexts, including team meetings, company presentations, writing/publications, and in scientific strategic discussions.
This role will have a close working relationship with all other scientific staff at the company.
ABOUT YOU*
You will have:

_Essential skills knowledge and experience_
A PhD in Biological Sciences with at least 2 years of laboratory experience
Cell culture and aseptic technique
Protein purification at small and medium scale (100ug to 500mg amounts) using HPLC
AAV and antibodies is preferred but not essential
Interpreting Biacore and/or other biosensor data
Analytical assay development
Good communication skills
Good computer skills. Proficiency in the use of Microsoft Office programs
Demonstrated ability to work independently
Excellent attention to detail
Willingness to work as a team
_Desirable skills knowledge and experience_
Formulation and stability protocols
Molecular biology techniques eg cloning, PCR
Immunological techniques
Regulated biotech environments
Writing scientific reports
Excited to work with a diverse, multicultural group of scientists
Ability to adapt to rapidly evolving research environments
Job Type: Full-time

Salary: $55,000.00 - $69,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Laboratory: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.scoutbio.co
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Scout Bio,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
77,Data Analytics Manager,$32k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Curant Health is blazing a trail in medication care management and personalized healthcare and we are looking for a Data Analytics Manager to join us as we continue our amazing growth trajectory.
We are not only committed to improving the lives of patients we serve, but yours as well. Curant means CARE, and that is just what we do.
Our culture of caring is evident by being recognized as one of Inc.’s fastest growing healthcare companies, receiving the Georgia Fast 40 and Atlanta Business Chronicle Trendsetters awards every year since 2013. Our medication care management programs and processes are proven to improve outcomes while reducing overall healthcare costs for our patients.
The Data Analytics Manager role is in our Smyrna, GA Headquarters and will be responsible for working across the organization with all teams to ensure Curant Health (CH) leaders are empowered with optimal business intelligence information.

This role leads a team of Business Analysts and SQL Developers to facilitate internal and external business insights. Responsible for leading strategic design and maintenance of Business Intelligence applications. Identifies, researches, and resolves complex business analytics. Ensures that business intelligence systems and processes enhance business decision making, demonstrate outcomes, support efficiency projects, and enhance sales.
Build and lead a team of business analysts and data scientists to facilitate internal and external business insights.
Provide data analytics support to drive Sales, Finance, Operations, and Outcomes.
Acts as a leader to assist in providing independent review and evaluation of business information.
Identifying business problems and developing analytic techniques to provide solutions to internal and external teams.
Institute standard development methodologies to ensure that the team is using best practices for collaborative coding, modular efficiency, version control, QA and release management.
Draw on strong business and statistical knowledge to organize research or development projects, including identification of relevant data points, data extraction and transformation, data model building, and visualizations.
Lead the BI team to build the roles, skills, processes and collaboration with other teams necessary to improve solution delivery speed and improve end user satisfaction.
Expert guidance – Understand underlying business challenges and communicate accurate data insights that enable confident, effective decision making.
Manage BI request backlogs and report on development progress to stakeholders.
Develop an advanced understanding of industry trends, metrics, and KPI benchmarks.
Driving multiple technical and data-related projects of varying scopes and complexities.
Interfacing with other business units within CH, vendors, and executives to represent and drive our organization's strategy.
Using data visualization and other data-gathering methods to either provide internal strategic direction or guide decisions for other teams.
Leads report development for operations areas as assigned in order to increase efficiencies.
Prepare data strategies and provide business object solutions as per requirements.
Supervise efficient working of all Business Intelligence projects, analyze requirements and perform appropriate tests on same.
Administer BI projects, prepare updates and implement all phases for project to achieve project objectives.
Analyze all complex data and identify requirements for business enhancement in project.

Bachelor’s Degree, preferably in Business Analytics or similar.
Advanced degree in management, healthcare, mathematics, or other related field preferred.
5+ years related experience with progressive growth in responsibility and scope. With 2 years managing a BI team.
Leadership of a BI or software development team.
BI practices and concepts, data modeling, ETL processes, and data warehousing.
Advanced understanding of the full reporting delivery life cycle, from requirements definition to report development and testing required.
Comfortable working with sales, billing, and financial information.
Advanced data visualization tool knowledge (Power BI, Tableau, etc.).
Experience with SQL Server Reporting and SSIS (Power BI preferred).
Ability to interpret analytic results.
Advanced MS Excel knowledge.
Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook).
Project management skills.
Demonstrated ability to turn end-user requirements into actionable tools and insights.
Why Work for Us?

We offer competitive pay, paid holidays, generous benefits, paid and volunteer time off and a work/life balance.
While our perks and benefits are generous, the people are what make Curant Health great. Curant Health employees have passion, are collaborative, and resilient. We are enthusiastic, productive, and problem solvers.
Our Core Values consist of ICARE; Integrity, Communication, Accountability, Relationships and Excellence, and we take pride in you embodying those traits. You will help write the next chapter in healthcare.
Curant Health is an equal opportunity employer. We promote a team atmosphere that provides excellent opportunity for growth as well as work life balance.",4.4,"Curant Health
4.4","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
78,Clinical Research Scientist (Social Work),$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Ph.D level Clinical Research Scientist (Social Work) at the Center for Child and Family Traumatic Stress (CCFTS) will support leadership through a research agenda and projects focused on individuals, children, and families. This published Ph.D Social Work Researcher will focus on traumatic stress, impact of race, mental health disparities within a multicultural context, and the promotion of social justice. The incumbent will work with federal and state grant funded research/projects and be a part of the department’s clinical practice with communities of color or other minorities. In coordination with the Vice President, Research Director, and key CCFTS leadership this position will assist with research direction. The Clinical Research Scientist may also have administrative and clinical care duties as assigned.

Qualifications:

EDUCATION:
Must possess a Ph.D. in Social Work with an emphasis on data, evaluation, and research.
EXPERIENCE:
 Must have demonstrated an active portfolio of funded research and leadership in the field.
 Must have at least five (5) years’ experience conducting research and publishing in a peer
reviewed journal.
 Must have at least one year of Supervisory or Management experience.",3.4,"Kennedy Krieger Institute
3.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
79,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,$130k-$150k (Employer Est.),"****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

Individuals seeking employment at KnowBe4 are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
80,Data Scientist,Employer Provided Salary:$80k-$120k,"About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
81,Data Scientist,$80k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"E.W. Scripps is a company rich in media history focused on the future. We are one of the nation's largest independent TV station owners with 60 stations nationwide, and we are working to stay ahead of the ways in which people use technology to find news and information. Our commitment to the future means that discovery is commonplace, the status quo is challenged, iteration and collaboration are the norm and new ideas are welcome. Join a team of top performers and help shape the future of the most strategic and well positioned media company – E. W. Scripps. This position will be located in Cincinnati, OH or Washington, DC.

At Scripps, you’ll:
Have a complete modern data science/analytics software stack at your disposal.
Enjoy a broad scope of responsibility – with projects and questions from every part of the business and new businesses under consideration.
Know that your work will have an impact on key strategic decisions – changing and shaping the way we do business. This is why we are so selective in our hiring process.
Grow your talent with constant learning – with substantial investments in on-site and hands-on training and eLearning formats used to fill in the gaps.
Work on projects that are important and interesting to you – with focus on modern media and marketing strategies
Expand your horizons by attending and giving talks at conferences and professional networking opportunities with senior analytics professionals.
Become a leading expert in applied data science for media.
We are looking for someone who knows how to use the latest data analytics tools, will thrive in our fast-paced innovative environment, will deliver results and has the following experience and credentials.

Primary purpose:

The Data Scientist blends the skills of a business thinker with those of a data analyst: asking questions, turning data into knowledge, forming conclusions, and making recommendations that enable the company to innovate, differentiate itself from its competitors, work smarter, make better decisions, and enhance profitability. This individual will partner with the analytics team, analytics products and services director, business leaders and end users to be a change agent - teasing out the questions that are important to our business, and then use statistical analysis and data mining techniques to inform the answers and communicate conclusions both visually and in writing, along with recommendations and next steps. The Data Scientist will also participate in the creation and measurement of new business processes, tools, and products.

Key responsibilities:
Influence the course of the business as a trusted advisor to business leaders, users and clients, using data and analytics as a basis for better, more informed decision making
Creation of analytics and measurement roadmaps
Identify impactful choices or courses of action that drive value for the organization
Evaluate the big picture and solve business problems in addition to focusing on metrics
Influence the direction of the business by effectively communicating conclusions to cross-functional groups
Create automation applications to replace tasks for critical revenue generating teams decreasing time dedicated to non-revenue generating
Mine large amounts of data and perform data analysis to extract useful business insights for a wide range of topics including product development and performance, market dynamics, consumer and audience knowledge, internal operations, and external research
Initial study design, acquisition of data, prototyping and production roll out
Ongoing tracking, monitoring, and periodic follow-up studies
Support the design and implement of reporting dashboards that track key business metrics and provide actionable insights
Use software and other tools to develop analyses that identify patterns, influences, correlations, relationships, predictive factors, risk factors, and that provide better situational awareness
Creation of models, simulations, and optimization routines
Develop of data flows and acquisition strategies to facilitate the capture and sharing of data and analytics within the organization
Support the development of Scripps analytics products and services by providing input into product roadmaps
Be a positive force to cultivate a culture that is passionate about developing analytics as a business competency
Drive accountability for value recognition and business results
Create and contribute to a quality work environment that motivates team members to perform at their highest levels and positively affects employee and business partner relationships
Be a publicly visible presence, including creating communications and leading training sessions, advocating for the benefits of analytics in Scripps and the products/services of the analytics team
Education / work experience:
Bachelor's required, Masters preferred. Applied statistics, Computer Science, business analytics or a related field.
Minimum 3 years, 5+ years preferred, experience in solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches apply to this requirement.
Experience and demonstrated success presenting complex analyses and final recommendations to business leaders and external clients.
Statistical method experience:
Analysis techniques such as marketing mix modeling, scenario modeling, pattern detection, A/B testing, nearest neighbor, cluster analysis, sentiment analysis, decision trees, optimization, simulation, regression analysis, agent-based modeling, ensemble models, collaborative filtering and other types of analysis
Software Proficiency:
Python, RapidMiner, R
Database skills (Snowflake, MySQL) experience preferred
Tableau
About Scripps:

The E.W. Scripps Company (NASDAQ: SSP) advances understanding of the world through journalism. As the nation’s fourth-largest independent TV station owner, Scripps operates 60 television stations in 42 markets. Scripps empowers the next generation of news consumers with its multiplatform news network Newsy and reaches growing audiences through broadcast networks including Bounce and Court TV. Scripps runs an award-winning investigative reporting newsroom in Washington, D.C., and is the longtime steward of the Scripps National Spelling Bee. Founded in 1878, Scripps has held for decades to the motto, “Give light and the people will find their own way.”

As an equal employment opportunity employer, The E.W. Scripps Company and its affiliates do not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender, color, religion, age, genetic information, medical condition, disability, marital status, citizenship or national origin, and military membership or veteran status, or on any other basis which would be in violation of any applicable federal, state or local law. Furthermore, the company will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities unless doing so would result in an undue hardship for the company.

If interested, please apply at www.scripps.com/careers.

#LI-CH1

#GD-CH1",3.6,"The E.W. Scripps Company
3.6","Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1878,Company - Public,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
82,Associate Data Scientist/ Data Scientist (Remote Work Option),-1,"Relocation Assistance Offered Within Country
# 86732 - Topeka, Kansas, United States

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our cross-functional teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Responsibilities for Data Scientist

Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.

Qualifications for Data Scientist

We’re looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models,
Bachelor's degree required; Certificate, Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field a plus
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Familiarity with the following software/tools:Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: Java, R, Python, SQL
Experience with cloud services: GCP, AWS, etc
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Data Studio, Datalab, Redshift, etc

Equal Opportunity Employer
Colgate is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, age, disability, marital status, veteran status (United States positions), or any other characteristic protected by law.

Are you interested in working for Hill's Pet Nutrition? You can apply online and attach all relevant documents such as a cover letter and resume or CV. Applications received by e-mail are not considered in the selection process. Become part of our team. We look forward to your application.

Work that matters, fueled by passion for pets! At Hill’s we have a purpose. Every day around the world, we transform the lives of millions of pet families through pioneering innovation, amazing nutrition, and the best and brightest people. Founded more than 75 years ago with an unwavering commitment to pet nutrition, Hills' mission is to help enrich and lengthen the special relationships between people and their pets.

HILL'S® Prescription Diet® therapeutic pet foods, HILL'S® Science Diet® and HILL'S® Ideal Balance™ wellness pet foods are sold worldwide. Hill’s is a division of Colgate-Palmolive, a leading global consumer products company, tightly focused on Oral Care, Personal Care, Home Care and Pet Nutrition, with sales of products in more than 200 countries. To learn more about Hill's and Colgate, please visit http://www.hillspet.com and http://www.colgatepalmolive.com, or find us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube.

Reasonable accommodation during the application process is available for persons with disabilities. Please contact Application_Accommodation@colpal.com with the subject ""Accommodation Request"" should you require accommodation.",4.1,"Hill's Pet Nutrition
4.1","Topeka, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1907,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
83,Principal Data Scientist,-1,"The Principal Data Scientist will be a data science subject matter expert and provide team leadership in their area of responsibility. The Technical Team Lead will lead selected projects or activities, as required, and will collaborate with other disciplines and teams.

Qualifications:
• MSc/PhD degree in in a quantitative field (such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering) or BSc in a related discipline and 7 years of industry experience
• 5+ years of professional experience in data science, computer vision or related fields
• 3+ years of professional experience leading data science or related discipline teams
• Subject matter expert in the areas of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence
• Advanced quantitative and analytical skills around applied research, mathematical modelling, and statistical modeling
• Practical software development skills in one or more programming languages, such as Python, Scala/Java, C++, etc.
• Fluency with one or more machine learning frameworks (such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, Caffe)
• Experience leading and mentoring senior, mid-level, and junior data scientists
• A passion for AI/ML, overcoming difficult challenges, and accomplishing great things
Bonus:
• Proven experience developing and evolving novel/new DNN architectures
• Strong publication background (Company will support publication work)",4.5,"Infinite Resource Solutions
4.5",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
84,Data Science Manager,$101k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Science Manager will manage a team of statisticians in research and development of new predictive models and new analytical techniques related to insurance pure premiums, customer life time value, customer buying behaviors and related topics using internal and external data. You will start your Data Science Manager role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Provide analytics for setting price, underwriting and products strategies.Implement analysis and modeling tests.
Develop and enhance models used in a variety of contexts within the product management structure.
Advance modeling capabilities.
Work with colleagues in various departments to facilitate the application of models developed considering the regulatory and competitive contexts.
Ensure models are understood, implications are appropriately assessed, implementation plans are defined,validation of results are undertaken and adjustments are made.
Qualifications and Education
Master's degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering or related field (willing to accept foreign education equivalent) and a minimum of seven (7) years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Alternatively, will accept Ph.D. and five years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Demonstrated expertise in SAS.
Demonstrated expertise in Bayesian statistics.
Demonstrated experience in developing multivariate predictive models in an insurance environment.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
85,Senior Data Scientist,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Senior Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
3+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
86,Business Intelligence Analyst,$58k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Opportunity

Rodan + Fields® is looking for a Business Intelligence Data Analyst to deliver insights through data solutions to business groups across multiple domains. You will work with a team of committed Data Analytics professionals, applying your business intuition and technical knowledge. The BI Data Analyst will be required to develop and enhance in-depth knowledge of R+F’s data and systems utilized by the business teams. This person will be responsible for hands-on collaboration with business partners to understand and meet their needs for data and insights. With an understanding of the core business needs in hand, you will use SQL and data visualization skills to develop solutions to move the business forward and enable effective and timely decision-making.

Responsibilities
As part of the Strategic Planning and Analytics team, partner with technical teams and business partners to ensure close collaboration between tech teams and the business
Develop a deep understanding of the company’s current data needs, and shape the future data strategy
Collaborate on engineering and documenting data and analytics process flows
Create and manage dashboards, scorecards, and other analytical services
Train business partners on self-service data solutions and reports
Develop analytics solutions that bring data to life by using design thinking concepts in a timely manner
Effectively coordinate work and collaborate across various cross-functional groups and levels in the organization
Succinctly and effectively communicate complex technical solutions to non-technical users
Support internal Data Science team with data extraction, validation and deployments
Qualifications
BA or BS degree required; MBA preferred
Proficient in MS Office, Data Management Platforms
Experience working with datasets hosted in Cloud preferably GCP is a plus
7+ years in business analytics, insights, brand strategy, management consulting
3+ years of experience with modern analytics tools such as Microstrategy, Looker, Tableau, or similar tools
Fluency in SQL
Experience in common data, analytics, and visualization technologies
Ability to self-prioritize and work in collaboration with multiple partner managers, product managers and marketing managers as a front-line analytics partner
Experience interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and gaining a deep dive understanding of key data
Ability to answer unstructured business questions and work independently to drive projects and create new processes
Possess a high degree of natural curiosity to drive the next levels of business questions and insights
Demonstrate resilience and flexibility, in the midst of ambiguity, to drive business impacting change
The Company

Rodan + Fields was founded in 2000 by Stanford-trained dermatologists Dr. Katie Rodan and Dr. Kathy Fields with a passion for giving people the best skin of their lives — and the confidence that comes with it. With effective products, a unique business model and a powerful community of Independent Consultants, Rodan + Fields has disrupted the skincare category to become a leading skincare brand in North America. The company has grown its innovative line of products and expanded into Canada, Australia and Japan. Headquartered in San Francisco, CA, R+F now employs 500+ people, has more than 300,000 enrolled Independent Consultants and over two million Preferred Customers.

At Rodan + Fields, you will be challenged to make an impact, inspired to do more, and rewarded for your contributions. We are transforming skincare, and we welcome your big ideas to fuel our ambitious growth plans! If you are looking for a life-changing career opportunity, we've got your prescription. You’ll become part of a positive, passionate movement that celebrates greatness and encourages employees to be catalysts for change. We provide a creative, vibrant workplace outfitted with all of the technology, tools and training you'll need to learn, grow and thrive! We create life-changing impact in our communities through our non-profit, Prescription for Change®, the heart of Rodan + Fields. By funding empowerment programs for students, we teach them how to use their skills to make life-changing differences in their lives and the lives of others. Join us and share your talents as we develop innovative solutions for your skin and empower entrepreneurs. In addition to working arm-in-arm with industry leaders, employees at Rodan + Fields enjoy rich benefits plans and perks.

Rodan + Fields is an equal opportunity employer that champions diversity, inclusion and equality for all. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, military/veteran status, or disability status.

We welcome employees to be their true, authentic selves, without exception and believe individual differences add value to our team. Join our team; we know it will be a life- changing experience!

Regarding COVID-19
With the spread of COVID-19 globally, our Bay Area offices will remain closed until further notice with the exception of phase 1 employees that require access to hardware and lab equipment.

Our primary concern is for the health and well-being of our employees as well as candidates. We have transitioned all interviews and new hire onboarding to be conducted virtually via Zoom video conferencing.",2.2,"Rodan and Fields, LLC
2.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,Data Scientist / Quantitative Research,-1,"Overview

PicnicHealth is all about making medical records easy to access and using data to power the next frontier of medical research. We work directly with patients to give them the only tool anywhere that truly provides all of their medical records from any doctor or healthcare system in the USin an easy-to-use, secure online dashboard. Not only that, but patients can choose to contribute their incredibly important data to scientific research, which helps researchers accelerate breakthroughs in care. To date we've helped tens of thousands of patients, partnered with some of the world's largest biopharma companies, and raised more than $35M from Felicis Ventures, Amplify Partners, Foresite Capital, Refactor Capital, and Y Combinator.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, Data Scientists on the Quantitative Research team are responsible for translating, assessing, and augmenting our Real World Data (RWD) to develop actionable insights and evidence for our life science partners. We're seeking an experienced data scientist to join the team to deliver bespoke analytics, create internal and customer tools, and develop predictive models to improve our research data product.

As a Data Scientist on the Quantitative Science team you will:
Use PicnicHealth's large, multi-disease multi-modal real-world dataset to answer critical clinical questions;
Become a subject matter expert on our data and its capabilities. Lead technical initiatives that further our understanding of RWD and methods to generate real-world evidence;
Transform real-world clinical data into actionable insights using data analytics, robust statistical methods, and compelling data visualizations accessible to a wide range of end-users;
Work with a cross-functional team to define and clarify analytic requirements, develop analysis plans, ensure data quality standards, and create publication-ready methods and results;
Conduct research to assess our data quality, identifying gaps and proposing solutions.
Develop and manage relationships with external partners (including life science companies, regulatory agencies, academic institutions, and health technology assessment bodies) to advance the integration of our analytic products, including through peer reviewed scientific publications.
Must haves:
At least 4 years of industry experience in a quantitative/statistical position in the life sciences industry
You hold a degree in a quantitative discipline, such as biostatistics, epidemiology, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
Advanced experience with R (tidyverse) and preferably have built an R package before
You have some training in statistics
You are familiar with command line tools
You have experience working with medical data, longitudinal EMR data, and/or data ontologies (OMOP, etc.)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
Ability to work independently, and experience leading the development of analytical features
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical and thoughtful eye
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and professional
You enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines. You are passionate about our patient-centric mission to improve healthcare for all
You'd be an amazing candidate if you had some/any of the following:
You've built an interactive data visualization app using the shiny package
You have advanced experience with with SQL
You have strong experience in statistics or biostatistical methods
You have a track record of producing scientific publications
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.8,"PicnicHealth
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
88,Scientist– Protein Purification and Characterization,-1,"Arcellx (http://www.arcellx.com/) is a venture-backed, early-stage biotech company focused on the development of novel cell-based cancer therapies. The company is located in Gaithersburg, Maryland and has assembled a team of biotechnology professionals with expertise in biologics discovery, characterization, and development. Lead products will incorporate proprietary technologies that enhance tumor-specific killing by genetically engineered human immune cells. *Primary Objective* The Scientist position is open to innovative and highly motivated candidates with a Ph.D. degree and 2+ years post-degree experience in protein purification and characterization. A successful candidate will work with a cross-functional team responsible for discovery and development of novel therapeutic proteins. The successful candidate will be a result-oriented self-starter with a commitment to teamwork and reliability. The incumbent will be a result-oriented self-starter with a commitment to teamwork and reliability. *MAIN ACCOUNTABILITIES: * * The main responsibilities will include but are not limited to: * Provide organizational and hands-on technical support for the production and characterization of preclinical recombinant proteins. * Implement and execute the purification of novel and diverse recombinant proteins, containing HIS, FLAG or Fc fusions. * Perform characterization and quality assessments (e.g. SDS-PAGE, HPLC and endotoxin) of purified proteins. * Perform protein/small molecule conjugations. * Independently plan, design, execute, record and analyze experiments. * Write and review technical protocols and reports. *Preferred Qualifications: * * PhD in the life sciences (e.g. Biochemistry, Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, Biology, immune-oncology), with minimum of 2 years post-degree experience in protein purification and characterization. * In-depth understanding of recombinant protein expression, purification, analytics and characterization. * Experience designing and utilizing purification schemes for recombinant proteins derived from multiple protein expression systems (e.g. bacterial, yeast or mammalian systems). Experience with purification from bacterial inclusion bodies. Familiarity with the operation and maintenance of AKTA (or related) FPLC chromatography systems. * Experience developing and utilizing appropriate methods for assessment of protein quality and biophysical characteristics, such as HPLC (IEC, RP, SEC), surface plasmon resonance (Biacore) and mass spectrometry. Knowledge and experience with biopharmaceutical quality attributes. *Competencies: * * Commitment to ethical scientific investigations and rigorous experimental methods. * Ability and desire to multitask and function in a fast-paced entrepreneurial environment. * Demonstrated ability to think critically and analyze and interpret data independently. * Sense of urgency in performance of duties. * Interpersonal skills that promote a collaborative and productive lab environment . * Effective and efficient written and oral communication skills. Without exception, applicants must submit both a cover letter and resume to be considered for these positions and must have experience in one of the fields listed above. Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * Dental Insurance * Health Insurance * Paid Time Off Schedule: * Monday to Friday Additional Compensation: * Bonuses Work Location: * One location Company's website: * www.arcellx.xom",-1,Arcellx,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
89,Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
90,Data Warehouse Developer,$82k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"The *Data Warehouse Engineer* is responsible for the maintenance, improvement, and movement of data in the Enterprise Data Warehouse, Operational and Analytics databases. The Data Engineer works with software engineers, other data engineers, data analysts, and data scientists in order to understand and aid in the implementation of database requirements, performance tuning, and resolving issues.
The Data Engineer: *
must be an expert in SQL development, database design, data flow and analysis activities
using SSIS, defines and builds data pipelines that will enable faster, better, data-informed decision-making within the business
creates Business Intelligence solutions using Microsoft SQL Server BI Stack
must have a delivery first mentality and a firm grasp of Agile Development methodology
must demonstrate the ability to work as a team member
Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities: *
Manages his position by maintaining databases optimized for performance, implementing schema changes, and maintaining data architecture standards across all of the business's databases.
Tasked with designing and developing scalable ETL packages from the business source systems and the development of ETL routines in order to populate databases from sources and also to create aggregates.
Leads innovation through exploration, benchmarking, making recommendations, and implementing data technologies.
Responsible for performing thorough testing and validation in order to support the accuracy of data transformations and data verification. The Data Engineer strives to ensure proper data governance and quality across the Data and Analytics organization and the business as a whole.
Support analytics where he/she performs ad-hoc analyses of data stored in source and Data Warehouse databases. Further, he/she writes SQL scripts, stored procedures, functions, and views.
Will troubleshoot data issues and present solutions to these issues. He/she proactively analyzes and evaluates the databases in order to identify and recommend improvements and optimization.
Will analyze complex data elements and systems, data flow, dependencies, and relationships in order to contribute to conceptual physical and logical data models.
Perform other duties as assigned
Education and/or Experience: *
Required to have a bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, or any other technology related field. An equivalent of the same in working experience is also accepted for the position.
A candidate for the position will have as at least 5 years of working experience as a database engineering support personnel or a database engineering administrator within a fast-paced a complex business setting.
The candidate must demonstrate experience working with large and complex data sets
A suitable candidate will also have had experience in the creation and debugging of database applications critical to the business's mission.
The candidate will have strong working and conceptual knowledge of building and maintaining physical and logical data models and experience with business intelligence tools.
Skills/Specialized Knowledge: *
Experienced in design, implementation and maintenance of SQL Server databases
Experienced in design, deployment and maintenance of complex ETL processes using SSIS
Adept at providing ongoing maintenance support through SQL query tuning and optimization
Ability to maintain and enhance OLAP cube artifacts using SSAS
Experienced in design and deployment of complex reports using SSRS
Well versed in working in a Visual Studio in source-controlled development environment
Excellent customer service and interpersonal skills; ability to relate to and get along with others
Professional verbal and written communication skills
Strong organizational and time-management skills
Ability to multi-task and maintain flexibility and creativity in a variety of situations
Ability to analyze and resolve problems
Ability to set and meet goals and consistently meet deadlines
Ability to maintain confidentiality
Other Requirements: *
Must maintain professional appearance.
Ability to be at work on a regular and consistent basis; Overtime may be required for this position.
Physical and Mental Demands: *
This position will spend long hours sitting and using office equipment and computers.
The position may also entail light lifting of supplies and materials occasionally, up to and including 20 pounds in addition to reaching, stooping, standing, and walking.
This position requires the ability to talk, hear, compare, compute, compile, copy, analyze, coordinate, synthesize, negotiate and communicate.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential job functions.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Database engineer: 5 years (Required)
SSIS: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Dallas, TX 75201 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://careers.invitationhomes.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.2,"Invitation Homes
3.2","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Senior Data Scientist,$116k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,"Recursion Pharmaceuticals
4.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
92,Member Experience Data Analyst,$48k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Start a Rewarding Career with Alliant


What will your day look like?

You will be responsible for breaking down complex data sets into structured analysis and offering “Insights as a Service” to key stakeholders across the organization. This individual will create recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards and deliver findings that result in actionable recommendations that positively impact and influence operational efficiencies and the member experience. You will have a passion for problem solving, an intellectual curiosity to dig deep into root causes, along with the ability to think conceptually, analytically and creatively.

Responsibilities


Do you see yourself doing this?
Extract data from multiple complex data sets including internal and external sources.
Build, update and maintain databases.
Verify information integrity, and make recommendations to remediate potential gaps/errors in data.
Understand key stakeholder objectives and the metrics that impact their area of the business.
Prepare and distribute recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards comprised of key metrics from across the organization.
Derive actionable insights through critical analysis and data visualizations.
Create innovative visuals using Tableau (or other supported visualization tools) to enable more effective consumption of data.
Apply business analysis skills to complicated business wants/needs and make recommendations for optimal solutions.
Adhere to the enterprise responsibilities and standards of a Business Intelligence lead and support the Enterprise BI Community.
All other duties as assigned by Sr. Mgr. Member Experience Design & Insights.
Qualifications


What makes you a great fit?

You’ll be a great fit if in addition to the completion of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Systems, Data Analytics/Data Science, or a related major, required, and you have:
4+ years of experience in data analysis, interpretation, report preparation and presentation of results, required.
Experience presenting findings to all levels of leadership.
Strong proficiency in Microsoft Excel/PowerPoint/Access, Tableau, SQL and extracting data from various sources.
Experience with relational databases and data warehouses.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong proficiency in time management and organizational skills.
High level of detail orientation and analysis.
Experience in customer/member experience analytics.
When you’re happy, we’re happy!

As a thank you for joining our team, you’ll benefit from:

Competitive medical, dental, and free vision benefits
Competitive compensation plan
Contributions towards gym memberships
Generous PTO and banking holidays off
Still not convinced?

We’re on the list of 100 Best Medium Companies to work for, check it out here. For more details you can also visit our Glassdoor and LinkedIn profiles.",3.6,"Alliant Credit Union
3.6","Rolling Meadows, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1935,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
93,"Clinical Laboratory Scientist (CLS), Full Time, Nights",$27-$45 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Adventist Health is more than an award-winning health system. We provide whole-person care to our communities and champion the greater good - from the operating room to the boardroom, we are driven by our unique passion to live God's love through health, wholeness and hope. From Oregon to Oahu, we have a calling to always do more. Now is your chance to apply your passion to our mission.

Nestled at the western edge of Little Lake Valley in Willits, California, Adventist Health Howard Memorial features key services including 24-hour emergency care, intensive care, surgery, an orthopedic joint center, diagnostic imaging and laboratory services, to name a few. It is also the first hospital to pilot-test the AMA’s 2017 Healthy Food Options in Hospitals policy. Howard Hospital’s Nutrition team is serving wellness daily, with fresh fruits and vegetables from the hospital’s Commonwealth garden in partnership with the Howard Foundation.

A charming rural town, Willits is considered the ""Gateway to the Redwoods"" nestled among majestic redwood trees and close to the coastal towns of Fort Bragg and Mendocino. Home to excellent trails and nature areas for hikers, campers and bicyclists, Willits is an outdoor enthusiast’s dream. It is also known as the home of the legendary racehorse, Seabiscuit.

We're looking for someone to join our team as a Clinical Laboratory Scientist who:

Prioritizes and performs a wide variety of clinical laboratory tests on various biological specimens. Reviews, evaluates, documents and reports results. Preserves confidentiality of patients and follows lab safety and maintenance protocols. Trains and supervises trainees, laboratory assistants and clerks as needed.
Essential Functions: *
Employs positive patient identification procedures to ensure the integrity of each specimen for pre-analytical, analytical and post-analytical testing. Performs proper specimen collection (including phlebotomy procedures as necessary), labeling, handling, preservation or fixation, processing or preparation, transportation and storage. Adheres to Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and other patient confidentiality guidelines and regulations.
Prioritizes lab orders according to type (STAT, ASAP, routine and timed studies) and performs various testing (including chemistry, coagulation, hematology, special chemistry, urinalysis, blood bank, serology, immunology, bacteriology, microbiology, referral testing and more) following prescribed quality assurance policies and procedures. Performs, evaluates and documents quality control checks. Reviews testing results evaluating validity of test results in comparison to anticipated results indicated per procedure manual.
Reviews and evaluates the validity and accuracy of test results, recognizing the interdependency of tests, the physiological conditions affecting results, patient age and normal values, controls, linearity errors, instrument codes, delta checks and more. Correlates test results with diagnoses and questions incompatible results. Thoroughly documents and communicates test results, expediting all critical values and results to appropriate clinicians.
Disposes of contaminated materials and equipment in accordance with policy and assures that work area is properly cleansed after each test. Performs equipment and instrumentation maintenance, troubleshooting and calibration as needed. Inventories and restocks reagents, calibrators, controls and supplies as needed.
Participates in the collection and evaluation of data for Performance Improvement evaluations. Documents adverse events using incident reporting tool. Orients, instructs and supervises laboratory assistants and clerks as needed.
Performs other job-related duties as assigned.
You'll be successful with the following qualifications:
Education: *
Bachelor's Degree in medical technology, clinical laboratory science, biological sciences, chemical sciences or allied health technologies or equivalent: Required
Work Experience: *
Clinical laboratory experience: Preferred
Required Licenses/Certifications: *
Valid Clinical Laboratory Scientist (CLS) license in state of employment: Required
Current certification from American Society for Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or National Credentialing Agency for Labs (NCA): Preferred
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Night shift
License/Certification:
Clinical Laboratory Scientist License (Preferred)
ASCP Certification (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",3.5,"Adventist Health
3.5","Willits, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1973,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
94,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"We are always looking for new talent to join us in our mission to optimize time tracking. As one of the largest, award-winning, and top-selling app vendors in the Atlassian Ecosystem, we hire only the best and brightest.
What does Tempo do? We enable companies to grasp the true value of time and get meaningful insights into their operations. With our products, managers know exactly how their teams are spending their hours each day. From billing, to resource management, to cost tracking, we are proud to give our customers data they can use. Lately we have been expanding into new ecosystems, most recently Zendesk. It’s an exciting time, with lots of innovation and growth on the horizon!
Our reach is wide: we are happy to support more than 13,000 customers all over the world. We are looking for candidates to bring fresh perspectives to our amazing teams located in Iceland, Canada, and the USA.
Join us and discover the joy of being part of a team that builds a product our customers’ love!
The position is currently fully remote due to COVID19.
About the Job
We are looking for an experienced and enthusiastic Data Engineer to join our growing team. This position will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data ingestion and processing pipelines, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data manipulator who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.
The Role
Develops and maintains scalable data pipelines and builds out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data sources, volume and complexity.
Collaborates with analytics and business teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increasing data accessibility and fostering data-driven decision making across the organization.
Implements processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Writes unit/integration tests, contributes to engineering wiki, and documents work.
Performs data analysis required to troubleshoot data related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Process unstructured data into a form suitable for analysis.
Analyze processed data.
The ideal Candidate
BS or MS degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
5+ years of industry experience in data engineering or other related field.
4+ years of Python development experience.
5+ years of strong SQL experience.
Experience building workflows as Directed Acyclic Graphs (DAGs) using Apache Airflow.
Experience with big data tools: Bigtable, BigQuery, Airflow, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience with GCP and/or AWS cloud services.
Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres, Bigtable, etc.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems
Experience with AWS Glue, AWS Firehose, AWS Kinesis, Avro / Parquet file formats, Snowflake, or data lake architecture is a plus.
Proven abilities to take initiative and be innovative
Analytical mind with a problem-solving aptitude
Great communicator
Team player
What's in it for you?
Remote work options
Unlimited vacation!!
Great benefits plan including health, dental, vision and more
Great office spaces in Canada, Iceland and USA
Diverse and dynamic teams
Challenging and exciting work
An opportunity to have a real impact on our business
Free breakfast and snacks
A great range of social activities
And so much more!!
Come and join our amazing & high-performing tech team!
Applicants must have a valid work permit for Canada",3.6,"Tempo Software
3.6",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,Senior Data Analyst,$85k-$115k (Employer Est.),"About Sysco Labs

Sysco LABS is a technology-focused division within Sysco, dedicated to reimagining foodservice through innovation. An extension of Sysco’s commitment to deliver exceptional products and services to the foodservice industry, Sysco LABS uses customer and market intelligence, data-driven insights and agile technology development to rethink the entire foodservice ecosystem.
Our innovation will improve everything from the ordering process, inventory, pricing and automation to the in-restaurant customer experience. Operating with the mindset of a startup and backed by the authoritative expertise of an industry leader, Sysco LABS’ mission is to improve the Sysco customer experience and consistently deliver cost savings and new innovations through technology.

About the Role

As a Senior Data Analyst at Sysco Labs, you will be responsible for driving strategies and tactics to optimize Sysco products using quantitative data, find answers to broad questions, identify patterns and trends, and make informed decisions to influence product strategy and direction.

Responsibilities
Utilize a combination of exploratory and descriptive analytics to inform product strategy and roadmap, and provide ad-hoc analyses that uncover root cause of recent business trends.
Understand data infrastructure and coordinate with Data Engineering to deliver data models and structures to meet business demands.
Design relevant data models, including outlining dimensions and measures needed, for answering business questions.
Establish and implement product data standards and best practices in order to optimize the data collection, fidelity and accuracy. Develop product measurement plans and dashboards to monitor metrics and KPIs.
Ensure optimization and validations initiatives are implemented, tracked and reviewed postproduction.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools.
Maintain a presence in the broader data and analytics community.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools, such as Tableau and Redash.
Other duties as assigned.
About You

Minimum Qualifications:
6 years’ experience in using data and analytics to drive decisions and insights.
Experience with SQL.
Experience with MixPanel or Google Analytics.
Experience with digital marketing tools such as Google Search Console, Adwords, Marin, Google DoubleClick stack, Tealium, or similar.
Experience with Tableau
Experience with JavaScript tag management.
Experience with Python Analytics/Viz packages.
Experience with R-Studio.
Experience with Data Mining tools such as RapidMiner, Opera, ProM, or similar.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science or related field.
Experience with programmatic media.
Experience with structured and semi-structured data.
Perks at Sysco LABS:
Competitive base & bonus packages
Fun, casual, fast-paced work environment filled with talented colleagues
Brand-new high-tech office space located in the heart of East 6th St, (walking distance to the MetroRail)
Generous PTO policy
Flexible work environment that encourages work/life balance
Fully stocked break room & weekly catered lunch
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits and company 401(k) program
At Sysco LABS you will be part of a team that values trust, learning, and working together to solve problems. Your efforts will help to build groundbreaking experiences for our customers. Come join us!
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity in a serious way. We are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Sysco Labs
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
96,Sr. Data Scientist,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Medifast is seeking a full-time Senior Data Scientist to join our team.
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for anticipating future business needs, solving real-time business questions, and identifying new applications for complex analysis.
The candidate focus will be using Machine Learning for the following use cases at Medifast:
Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, Natural Language Processing, AB Testing, and Customer Segmentation (Unsupervised Learning).

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to generate new features to feed into our data core. Key Models include: Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, and Customer Segmentation
Use storytelling to bring out the insights derived from machine learning and statistical modeling making the complex easy to follow and digestible
Perform automated market analyses to dynamically react to changing market conditions
Discover new predictive insights in our datasets and design measures that compute new predictive models while using data visualization methodology
Assist the Insights Center Manager in using Data Science to enhance the Insights Roadmap and assist in the selection of Data Science products to help enable and maintain the Data Science stack
Create measures that monitor inputs and performance on a real-time basis to inform the insights council when unexpected changes arise.
Be active in communications with business users and data management resources to collaborate through a project lifecycle as data changes occur
Aid and train end super users to effectively use the Data Science platform
Coordinate with offshore technical resources

PHD degree or equivalent preferred in Applied Statistics, Mathematics or a related data field
5-8 years related experience
Executing solutions to business problems using advanced statistics, testing methods, data analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, optimization, and machine learning techniques;
Design and run end-to-end experiments with statistical rigor for test and learn, apply appropriate sampling methods and probabilistic simulations to hypothesis testing and parameter estimation including bootstrapping
Perform data exploration and visualization (using Tableau and other visualization tools), apply machine learning and statistical inference to seed hypotheses, identify opportunities, define metrics, provide interpretability to multi-dimensional scoring, regressor and classifier models, and decision tree learning, using novel methods;
Employ statistical programming through, Python, R, Dataiku, and toolkits (Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, PySpark, Jupyter Notebook and kernel, Macro) across disparate environments including Linux/Unix command line and shell scripting, virtual and clouds
Execute and automate data preprocessing via relational systems (AWS, Redshift, SQL Server, MySQL, Postgre, and, Oracle), and parallel computing for big data, using analytics engine and cluster computing frameworks: Apache Spark and Hadoop MapReduce, Apache Tez, and Yarn.
#LI-JP1
#LI-LW1",3.0,"Medifast, Inc.
3.0","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Company - Public,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
97,Senior Data Scientist - Algorithms,$96k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description: Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $93MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, and Polaris Partners, Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States — Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, and New Jersey.

Role Description: As a Sr. Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work in collaboration with other data scientists, bioinformaticians and platform engineers. In this role, you will build machine learning models and recommendation services to enable our applications to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll work with datasets that include millions of detailed medical, pharmacy, lab claims, EHR, and application data. You will help with development and validation of new algorithms that enhance our system in terms of scalability, reliability and accuracy. The ideal candidate will be an entrepreneurial, motivated data scientist who is well-versed in data analysis and algorithm implementation and eager to learn new things and make an impact on the industry. Health data experience is a plus, but it's not necessary.

Responsibilities:
Work with an interdisciplinary technical team to develop statistical models in Quartet’s platform.
Apply data mining and machine learning techniques to develop better personalization and recommendation for patients’ and doctors’ needs.
Design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets - user activity, EHR, ADT, medical claims, pharmacy claims, lab test claims etc.
Derive insights from descriptive analysis that drive a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes.
Qualifications:
Experience building high quality data products.
7+ years experience as a data scientist, software engineer with predictive modeling, or similar experience of solving real problems with data mining and machine learning techniques.
PhD or Master’s Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied statistics, physics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Proficiency in building Machine Learning (supervised and unsupervised) models and recommendation systems.
Strong knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Ability to execute, starting from problem definition, to a working implementation.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Proficiency in Python and code versioning systems like git.
Expertise with data science toolkits like scikit-learn and pandas.
Knowledge of software architectures and tools such as Scala, Hadoop.
Familiarity working in a Linux server-based environment.
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, catered lunches, snacks, team events and outings, full medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental leave, commuter benefits, 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements for mental healthcare, 401K, ESPP, gym benefits.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team. Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet. Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.7,"Quartet Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
98,"Scientist, Allogeneic CAR T Cell Research",-1,"Allogene Therapeutics, with headquarters in South San Francisco, is a clinical-stage biotechnology company pioneering the development of allogeneic chimeric antigen receptor T cell (AlloCAR T™) therapies for cancer. Led by a management team with significant experience in cell therapy, Allogene is developing a pipeline of “off-the-shelf” CAR T cell therapy candidates with the goal of delivering readily available cell therapy on-demand, more reliably, and at greater scale to more patients. For more information, please visit www.allogene.com, and follow @AllogeneTx on Twitter and LinkedIn.

Allogene Therapeutics is seeking a highly motivated Scientist to evaluate CAR T cell therapies against solid tumors. The successful applicant will support the preclinical in vitro and in vivo characterization of CAR T cells and potential antibody combination studies for solid tumor indications. The ideal candidate is an individual who is excited to take on new challenges in a dynamic and highly collaborative environment.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Cell culture, including cell line maintenance and CAR T cell generation
Set up in vitro assays including CAR T cell phenotyping, short and long-term cytotoxicity assays to evaluate the function of CAR T cells against tumor targets
Execute in vivo studies to assess CAR T cell anti-tumor efficacy and safety using mouse models
Harvest and process mouse tissues, and perform immunophenotyping ex vivo as needed
Analysis and interpretation of experimental data
Work collaboratively with other biologists and protein engineers
Maintain detailed records of experimental protocols and results
Stay up to date on latest scientific and technology advancements in the field
Present at group meetings and project team meetings
Other duties as assigned

Position Requirements & Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in Biology or related field with at least 5 years of experience or a Master’s degree with at least 3 years of experience in an academic and/or industrial setting
Academic experience in immunology or cellular biology
Experience with aseptic technique and good cell culture practice is essential. Experience with primary T cell culture is highly preferred
Experience with immunological assays such as multi-color flow cytometry, ELISA and cytotoxicity, is highly preferred
Proficiency in mouse handling is essential. Experience with in vivo techniques such as dosing (e.g. subcutaneous, intravenous and intraperitoneal), blood collection, bioluminescent imaging, caliper measurement, and tissue harvesting is highly preferred
Proficiency in the use of software tools to support data analysis tasks (e.g., Prism, FlowJo, Word, Excel and PowerPoint)
Ability to take initiative, willingness to learn and adopt new experimental skills as needed
Excellent organizational skills and an ability to maintain detailed documentation
Comfortable in a fast-paced small company environment with minimal direction and able to adjust workload based upon changing priorities
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Strong interpersonal skills including verbal and written communication are essential in this collaborative work environment
Candidates must be authorized to work in the U.S.

As an equal opportunity employer, Allogene Inc. is committed to a diverse workforce. Employment decisions regarding recruitment and selection will be made without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, gender, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, genetic information or characteristic, gender identity and expression, veteran status, or other non-job related characteristics or other prohibited grounds specified in applicable federal, state and local laws.

#LI-MT1",5.0,"Allogene Therapeutics
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
99,Data Scientist,$72k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist, you will have the unique opportunity to work on a program developing target models and advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This program will develop and train machine learning models to detect and discern features in scenes and develop an adversarial patch framework to defeat the trained classifiers.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos(DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:
Develop, train and evaluate Machine Learning models
Develop strategies for data augmentation and synthetic data
Utilize models to detect and classify targets within scenes
Develop adversarial attacks to defeat trained classifiers

Requirements:
TS/SCI clearance required
5+ years of related experience
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch, Tensorflow or MXNet
Prior experience with the Intelligence Community and methodological experience in some of the following areas
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing target data)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of real-world-system to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it can be fooled)
We're looking for a motivated Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment
#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
